 JOURNAL. Many of my friends having been solicitous
 for the privilege of a perusal of the minutes I
 preserved in the course of my late visit to the
 Western Indians, I have been induced to devote
 a small portion of leisure time to the purpose of
 attempting such an arrangement of them, as
 would convey, intelligibly, both the route we
 took, and the various circumstances attending
 upon our journey. The judicious reader will doubtless make
 proper allowances for the difficulty there is in
 composing an entertaining diary over that of a
 history, where circumstances are not necessarily
 confined to day and time. As a suitable introduction to my Journal, I
 deem it proper to insert the following letter. It
 will serve to show the intercourse which had
 previously taken place between the Indian
 Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting and
 some of the Indian chiefs of the Western tribes. The Little Turtle's Town, Sept. 18th, 1803.
From the Little Turtle , The Five Medals , and
 others, to Evan Thomas , George Ellicott , and
 others.
Brothers and Friends of our hearts, -We
 have received you speech from the hand of our
 friend, Wm. Wells , with the implements of
 husbandry, that you were so kind to send to his
 care,-all in good order. Brothers, it is our wish that the Great Spirit
 will enable you to render to your Red Brethren
 that service which you appear to be so desirous
 of doing them, and which their women and
 children are so much in need of. Brothers, we will try to use the articles you
 have sent us, and if we should want more, we
 will let you know it. Brothers, we are sorry to say that the minds
 of our people are not so much inclined towards
 the cultivation of the earth as we could wish
 them. Brothers, our Father, the President of the
 United States, has prevented our traders from
 selling liquor to our people, which is the best
 thing he could do for his Red Children. Brothers, our people appear dissatisfied, be-
cause our traders do not, as usual, bring them
 liquor, and, we believe, will request our Father
 to let the traders bring them liquor, and if he
 does, your Red Brethren are all lost forever. Brothers, you will see, from what we have
 said, that our prospects are bad at present,
 though we hope the Great Spirit will change the
 minds of our people, and tell them it will be
 better for them to cultivate the earth than to
 drink whiskey. Brothers, we hope the Great Spirit will per-
mit some of you to come and see us,- when you
 will be able to know whether you can do any-
thing for us or not. Brothers, we delivered you the sentiments of
 our hearts, when we spoke to you at Baltimore,* *See Appendix.
 and shall say nothing more to you at present.
 We now take you by the hand, and thank you
 for the articles you were so kind to send us. Signed,
 THE LITTLE TURTLE , Miami Chief. THE FIVE MEDALS , Potowatamy Chief. This letter having claimed the solid consider-
ation of the Committee on Indian Affairs, at a
 meeting held in the city of Baltimore, the 6th
 of 2d month, 1804, the following conclusion
 and minute was, at that time, the result of their
 deliberations: The subject of a visit to the Indians, agreea-
bly to the desire they express in the foregoing
 letter, being solidly considered, the Committee
 are united in judgment, that visit to them at
 this time would be the most likely means of ob-
 
taining a knowledge of the disposition they are
 in, and enable Friends to ascertain what would
 be the best course to pursue to be useful to them.
 The following Friends are therefore nominated
 to that service, and requested to proceed in the
 visit as soon as convenient, to wit: George
 Ellicott, Gerard T. Hopkins, Joel Wright, and
 Elisha Tyson. They are also authorized to take one or more
 suitable persons with them to reside amongst the
 Indians, to instruct them in agriculture and
 other useful knowledge, if there should appear
 to be a prospect of such an establishment being
 beneficial to them. My name having been entered upon the minute,
 and thus placed upon this very interesting appoint-
 ment, was to me a subject of much thoughtful-
ness and exercise; and believing finally that the
 peace of my own mind was concerned in a pas-
sive submission to the judgment of my friends,
 I accordingly made provision for the journey,
 and on the 23d of the 2d month, 1804, left my
 home; first witnessing those sensations due to
 human nature, in an affectionate farewell to my
 family connexions and friends; rode to Ellicott's
 Mills, and joined my friend, George Ellicott ,
 from whence we proceeded on our journey; taking
 with us Philip Denis , a member of our So-
ciety, who has concluded to accompany us, for
 the purpose of residing with the Indians, in order
 to instruct them in agriculture; reached Brooke-
ville, and lodged at Caleb Bentley's -making
 27 miles. The weather cold, with some snow.
 Nothing remarkable occurred, except that, in
 crossing a miry glade, my horse fell and threw
 me; neither of us received a hurt. 2d mo. 24th. Bade farewell to my relatives
 and connexions at Brookeville, and rode to Now-
land's Ferry-28 miles-a very muddy and cold
 day. The high wind preventing us from cross-
ing the Potomac river, we rode to the house of
 George Lepley , a neighboring farmer, where we
 found good accommodations, and were kindly
 entertained. 25th. Crossed the Potomac early this morn-
ing, passed over the Catoctin mountain, taking
 the village of Waterford in our way; thence
 through the gap of the Short Hill, over the Blue
 Ridge to Warmsley's Ferry over the Shenandoah
 river; thence across the Shenandoah to the
 house of our friend, John McPherson , a dis-
tance of 29 miles. This day's journey has been
 highly entertaining; mountain rising above
 mountain, and farm above farm, till we reached
 the summit of the Blue Ridge, from whence
 a most extensive and beautiful prospect of the
 country, both on the east and west side of the
 mountain, was full in view. From the top of
 this commanding eminence, we were the specta-
tors of a beautiful natural scene. A cloud, small
 in its appearance, passing nearly upon a level
 with our elevation, cast its shadow upon the
Goose Creek settlement below, for several miles
 in extent. The precise shape of the cloud, with
 all its indentations, was visible in the shadow;
 the indentations bearing the same enlarged pro-
portions, with the shadow, to the cloud. An extraordinary deceptibility in human
 vision is evident, in a view of the Shenandoah
 river, from the summit of the Blue Ridge. The
 river, in the estimation of some of our company,
 did not appear to be further from us than the
 distance of half a mile and it proved to be not
 nearer than three or four miles. 26th. Passed across the Shenandoah valley,
 a body of excellent limestone land. This valley
 is several hundred miles in length, and general-
ly from 20 to 25 miles in width, lying between
 the Blue Ridge and the North Mountains.
 Many parts of it retain to this day the name of
 barrens, though now heavily timbered, being at
 the time the land was taken up, covered with
 scrubby bushes. On our way we crossed a small
 river called the Opekon,-and it being the first
 day of the week, we attended the Ridge Meeting
 of Friends, after which we spent the remainder of
 the day, and lodged at night, at the house of our
 friend, David Lupton , at the foot of the North
 Mountain,-having travelled 18 miles. One of
 our horses faltered this morning, having been
 too well fed at last night's quarters. 27th. This day travelled 31 miles, and lodged
 at Clayton's Ordinary,* *An Ordinary, is another name for a house afford-
ing indifferent entertainment. having crossed the
 North Mountain, Timber Ridge, Sandy Ridge
 and Capon Mountain; also forded Great Capon
 river and North river. Our road led us through
 several long and narrow valleys, which were well
 timbered and rich; we have also passed large
 tracts of mountainous, uncultivated, and doubt-
less never to be cultivated land. It is said deer
 are very plenty in the tract through which we
 have passed to-day, but none were discovered by
 us. Upon some of the mountains, and also in
 the valleys, we observed a few tolerably well-
looking farms; we have also noticed several
 small sugar camps in the course of this day's
 journey. 28th. Continued our journey,-forded the
 Little Capon river, the south branch of Poto-
mac, Patterson's creek, and the north branch of
 Potomac. We also travelled over Little Capon
 Mountain, South Branch Mountain and North
 Branch Mountain, passing through Springfield,
 Frankford and Cresapsburg villages, reaching
 Musselman's tavern, near the foot of the Alle-
ghany Mountains; making a journey of 37 miles. A snow has been falling for some hours upon
 the remains of a former snow ten inches in
 depth. Our journey to-day has been very en-
tertaining, notwithstanding the severity of the 
 weather, and the danger at this time attendant,
 on climbing up and descending precipices. There is much in a journey over these moun-
tains to puzzle, as well as amuse, the naturalist.
 Many extraordinary natural curiosities have
 fallen under our observation, in the diversified
 appearance of mountains, rocks and valleys. We
 have passed to-day the most ponderous, craggy and
 over-jutting rocks we have heretofore met with,
 many of which were elevated several hundred
 feet above our heads, and seemed to threaten us
 with impending danger; which was not a little
 magnified, in our apprehensions, from observing
 cast bodies of rock, which had evidently tum-
bled from their lofty summits into the valleys.
 Had we been disposed to indulge fancy, we
 might have figured to ourselves, in a view of
 these rude mountains of rocks, many of those
 descriptions met with in Roman, Greek or
 Egyptian history, of amphitheatres, obelisks,
 pyramids, &c. &c; whilst many others exhibit-
ed such regular, wavy appearences, interspersed
 alternately with oaks and pines, and soil of
 various hues, as seemed to challenge the painter
 with his diversified shades of coloring. And could
 we have observed here goats, white bears and
 reindeer, with now and then a human being
 clothed in skins and furs, and with weather a
 little colder, we might, perhaps, have been led
 to suppose ourselves in Lapland. A few settle-
ments are made in this tract, which are mostly
 in the valleys. Deer are said to be very numerous
 upon these mountains-several were seen by us.
 We also observed seats erected in the branches
 of the trees by the hunters, twenty feet in height,
 being concealed stations for the purpose of shoot-
ing deer at the Salt Licks. We have also seen
 several flocks of turkeys and pigeons in vast
 numbers. 29th. Travelled thirty miles upon the Alle-
ghany Mountains, and at night lodged at Smith's
 Ordinary. We have to-day passed through land
 heavily timbered, tolerably level, and said to be
 rich and clear of stone; of this, the snow pre-
vented us from judging. We also crossed over that
 part of the Alleghany ridge which divides the
 eastern and western waters of our continent-
 the streams all bearing a right hand direction:
 Near this part of the mountain, our road led us
 through the most beautiful and lofty forest of
 spruce and pine I ever saw. This forest is call-
ed the Shades. The trees are generally from
 108 to 180 feet in height, with a body not
 more than 12 inches in diameter at the surface
 of the earth. We also forded one of the branches of the
 Youghiogany river, called the Little Crossings.
 The principal ridges which we passed are called
 by the mountaineers the Back-bone Ridge, (from
 its sharp elevation,) the Winding Ridge and the
 Negro Mountain. On inquiring into the origin
 of the name of the latter, we were informed
 that many years ago, a white man and a negro
 who were hunting together, accidentally fell in
 with an Indian upon this ridge who was armed;
 both the negro and the Indian betook them-
selves to trees, presented their guns at each
 other, and fired at the same moment, and both
 fell dead. Thier images are cut upon the trees
 behind which they fell, as a memento of the
 circumstance. The ridge has ever since been
 called the Negro Mountain. Deer and turkies are numerous upon these
 mountains. The hunters have in many places
 erected seats, as heretofore described, for the pur-
pose of shooting deer. Over the greater part of our journey to-day
 we have found snow two feet in depth. A tolera-
ble track is however beaten for us by a descrip-
tion of pedlars, who pass by the name of Packers.
 These people carry on a considerable trade be-
tween the Redstone settlements and Winchester,
 in Virginia, as also with several other villages
 in the western part of that State. They take with them upon horses, bags of
 flax, which article they purchase at Redstone at
 a low price; this they dispose of at an advance,
 and in return carry salt, for which they are well
 paid at Redstone. It is not unusual to meet a
 Packer, having under his direction half a dozen
 loaded horses. These animals on meeting travel-
lers, do not turn aside from the beaten path. We
 were several times under difficulties in making
 our way through the snow on their account. 3d mo. 1st. This day we travelled thirty six
 miles, passed through the villages Woodstack
 and Uniontown, and after night reached the
 house of our friend, Jonah Cadwalader , in the
 neighborhood of Redstone, Old Fort, and near
 the Monongahela river. On our way we passed
 a place called the Great Meadows, upon the
 Alleghany Mountains. This place is noted for
 an entrenchment, cast up by General Washing-
ton, then Colonel Washington, when retreating
 from a defeat given to a small force under his
 command, (near the junction of the Alleghany
 and Monongahela rivers,) history says by a much
 superior body of French and Indians. We also
 passed over the spot where Gen. Braddock was
 buried. His army of 1200 chosen men was de-
feated near Fort Du Quesne, in an unexpected
 attack by the Indians. We are told that the
 General and half this number were killed, and
 sixty-four out of eighty-five of his officers; of
 those who escaped was Washington , at the time
 Aid-de-Camp to General Braddock . The de-
feated army brought off their dead commander
 and buried him in the road, in order to elude
 the search of the Indians for his dead body. It may be remarked that the land in the
 neighborhood of the Great Meadows is very
 level and the timber heavy, which indicates the
 goodness of the soil. A considerable body of
this land was owned by Washington at the time
 of his death. This day's journey has been very disagreeable
 and cold, owing to a continued fall of snow.
 We greatly regretted that the clouds prevented
 a view of the Redstone settlements from the top
 of Laurel Hill, this being that part of the Alle­
ghany Mountains from which a descent is made
 into the country below. From this commanding
 eminence the prospect, we are told, is beautiful
 beyond description. Our disappointment, however, was in some
 measure recompensed by finding ourselves, when
 upon the top of this hill, not only above the
 clouds, but also so elevated in a cloud as to find
 the particles of snow resembling fog; a proof
 that large spits of snow, as they are called, ac­
quire their size by an accumulation of particles
 on their way from the clouds to the earth. I may
 here mention, that the difficulties and fatigues
 of our journey thus far have been rendered light
 by the agreeable company of my brother-in-law,
 Thomas Moore , and our esteemed friend, Israel
 Janney, the former joining us at Brookeville,
 and the latter in the Shenandoah Valley. They
 are complying with an appointment by our late
 Yearly Meeting, in a visit to a Quarterly Meet­
ing at Redstone. From the 1st to the 8th of the month, we
 rested at Redstone, a rest useful to our horses
 as well as to ourselves. In the course of this
 interval, we attended Redstone Quarterly Meet-
ing. There were present several Friends from
 the State of Ohio, who reside upon a part of the
 tract of country called the Seven Ranges. They
 informed us that the Indian Chief, Tarhie ,* *This was Tarhie , (or the Crane,) Chief of the
 Wyandots, whom Evan Thomas , and other members
 of the Indian Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meet-
ing, visited at Upper Sandusky, in the 6th month,
 1799, and of which a report was published in that
 year. See Appendix. a
 Wyandot of great distinction, with about one
 hundred hunters, mostly of the Wyandot nation,
 were hunting bears upon a branch of the Big
 Beaver, called Mahoning, within about twenty
 miles of their settlement, and that a fall of snow
 three feet in depth had placed them in a suffer-
ing condition, they not making provision at their
 camp for such an event. In this situation the
 Friends received the following letter from Tar-
hie. My dear Brothers, Quakers, listen to what
 I now say to you. You always called us Indians
 your brothers, and now, dear white brothers, I
 am in distress, and all my young men who are
 with me. Brothers, will you please to help me to fill
 my kettles and my horses' troughs, for I am afraid
 my horses will not be able to carry me home
 again. Neighbors, will you please to give, if it is 
 but a handful a piece, and fetch it out to us, for
 my horses are not able to come after it This is all I have to say at present. TARHIE. 
To my Brothers, the Quakers. About the time of the reception of this letter,
 some Friends, who resided nearest to their hunt-
ing camp, furnished them with a small supply
 of provisions, which occasioned a second letter
 from Tarhie , as follows: Brother Quakers, I have a few more words
 to say to you. Brothers, I want that you should all know
 what distress I am in. Brothers, I want you to know I have got
 help from some of my near neighbors. Brothers, I would be glad to know what you
 will do for me, if it is but a little. Brothers, if you cannot come soon, it will
 do bye and bye, for my belly is now full. Brothers, I hope you have not forgot our
 great fathers; when they first met, it was in
 friendship; we are of the same race. My Brothers, Quakers, I hope our friendship
 will last as long as the world stands. All I have
to say to you now is, that I shall stay here until
 two more moons are gone. TARHIE. 
Addressed to my Brothers, the Quakers. A considerable quantity of provisions were
 furnished by the Friends to these Indians, for 
 which they expressed great thankfulness. Tar-
hie himself divided the presents between man
 and man, making no difference for distinction
 in rank. These Friends were informed by Tarhie , that
 several years ago he had sent a talk to the In-
dian Committee at Baltimore, accompanied by a
 belt of wampum, worth fifty dollars, and had
 long been waiting for an answer, but had not
 yet received one. In consequence of this information, a confer-
ence was held at Redstone, between such of the
 members of the Indian Committee as could be
 convened there. The result was a request made
 to four Friends of the neighborhood adjacent to
 the Indian camp, to visit Tarhie , and inform him
 that his talk was not received by the Indian
 Committee, and that his belt of wampum never
 came to their hands. Also, if he had any thing
 now to say, he must write again to the Indian
 Committee. During our stay at Redstone, we had an op-
portunity of seeing and admiring the richness
 of the land between the foot of the Alleghany
 Mountains and the Monongahela River. The
 people here seem to live in ease and plenty, and
 there is scarcely a plantation that does not afford
 stone coal and sugar trees. The coal is, I think,
 fully equal in quality to the best Liverpool coal,
 and is generally used for fuel in the place of
wood; it being much easier and cheaper to pro-
 cure a supply of coal, than to procure wood, not-
withstanding that article is in great plenty here. The sugar trees afford sugar in plenty to those
 who are sufficiently industrious to make it. Many
 families, we are told, make from five hundred to
 a thousand pounds, and others make from eight-
een to twenty-five hundred weight, every spring.
 The trees do not appear to be injured by draw-
ing off the sap. Molasses of excellent quality
 is also made from this tree, and also small beer,
 equal to any thing of the kind we met with at
 this place, produced from the sap. Shall I say, a proof of the instability of the
 human mind, under the most bountiful supply of
 temporal blessings, is to be drawn from the pre-
sent disposition of the inhabitants of Redstone?
 Blest with a country rich and fruitful, and posses-
sing other great natural advantages, there is
 nevertheless a general feeling of discontent. The
 new country beyond the Ohio, lately opened for
 sale, has set the general mind afloat. We saw
 people who were well settled, and who some
 years ago, too, had passed the meridian of life,
 strongly affected with the prevailing mania. 9th. The river Monongahela not having yet
 risen, we are greatly disappointed in our wish
 and intention to take boat at Redstone for the
 mouth of the Miami of the Ohio. We have,
 therefore, no other alternative than to prosecute
 a long and doubtless fatiguing journey by land.
 This morning, whilst we were preparing to pro-
eed on our route, two young men arrived at our
 quarters, for the purpose of accompanying us;
 one of them a blacksmith, and a member of our
 Society, the other a carpenter, and a steady young
 man. They are under the pay of government,
 and have engaged to reside in the neighborhood
 of Fort Wayne, to be employed for the benefit
 and instruction of the Indians. Previous to our
 leaving home, we had reason to expect that we
 should be overtaken by these young men, and
 were glad to have our expectations realized. Again proceeding on our journey, we passed
 through Brownsville, a village on the Mononga-
hela River; crossed over that river in a boat, and
 rode about twenty-six miles to Washington, an
 inland town. Our ride to-day has been through
 a very hilly country, tolerably rich, though badly
 watered. It is said that one of the first survey-
ors of this tract of country, when questioned re-
specting its general appearance, replied, It is
 like a large meadow filled with stacks of hay.
 A comparison very apropos. It is worthy of remark, that near Brownsville,
 on the Monongahela, are the remains of an old
 fortification, including several acres of ground.
 Mussel shells are yet very abnndant within the
 intrenchment; and nearly opposite to the forti-
fication are two fish pots extending quite across
 the river; they are made of stone, weighing gene-
rally from thirty to forty pounds. It is said that
 the Indians who resided near the spot at the time
 of its discovery by the white men, had not even
 a traditional knowledge of the making of these
 fish pots, nor of the erection of the fortification. This day, in passing along, my mind has been
 involved in much serious reflection on the im-
portance of our mission. And I trust I have in
 no small degree felt the responsibility we are
 under, not to men only, but to the Great Author
 of all good, with an ardency not to be expressed,
 that we may indeed discharge the trust reposed
 in us, and perform the duty required of us with
 propriety. 10th. Travelled thirty-four miles, and after
 night were glad to reach the house of our friend
Jonathan Taylor , in the State of Ohio; on our
 way we passed through the small villages of Tay-
lorstown and West Liberty. The tract of coun-
try through which we have travelled is generally
 fertile and is mostly settled. In the course of
 this day's ride, it is observable that limestone is
 to be found on the tops of the highest hills, but
 is rarely found in the bottoms. It may now be noted that the hills between
 the Monongahela and the Ohio rivers are gene-
rally of a very singular description, having two
 or three circular elevations, the surface of each
 elevation flat for the space of twenty-five to
 thirty feet in diameter. These flat appearances
 extend quite around the circumference of the
 hills, and seem to vie with art for regularity. This day we crossed in a boat the great river
 Ohio. On approaching it, I felt no small degree
 of awe. The slow and majestic movement of so
 vast a body of running water, added to the re-
collection of the blood which had been spilt re-
lative to its shores, enforced the sensation. With
 what obstinacy the poor Indians resisted the de-
signs of the white men in making settlements
 west of this river! Having been driven further
 and further westward, relinquished claim to tract
 after tract, they here made a stand, fixed in a re-
solve, hitherto ye may come, but no farther!
 This river shall be the boundary between us!
 It shall limit your encroachment! The resist-
ance they made, and the blood which was split,
 sufficiently prove the reluctance with which they
 gave up the contest. The bottom upon the west
 side of the river where we crossed, which was at
 the junction of Short Creek, is very rich, but not
 wide. In this bottom we observed a mound of
 earth cast up to the height of fifteen feet, its
 diameter at the base forty-five feet, and said to
 be a burial place, but whether made by the In-
dians or not is not ascertained. It is said that
 two miles below this is a square fortification
 containing several acres of ground, enclosed by
 a bank of earth thrown up by art to the height
 of eight feet. Along the east shore of the river great de-
struction was made a few years ago by a species
 of caterpillar which infested the trees. They
 fed upon the leaves, and thus killed trees of
 enormous size. Their havoc extended for many
 miles along the river, and reached about seven
 or eight miles from the shore. 11th. This day being First-day, we rested
 ourselves and horses, and were glad to have an
 opportunity of attending a meeting of Friends,
 called Short Creek Meeting. A Monthly Meet-
ing is lately established here by Redstone Quar-
terly Meeting. About forty Friends were at
 this meeting, and most of them were new settlers.
 The greater number had moved from North
 Carolina. The meeting was held in a log house
 or cabin, situated upon a beautiful hill, covered
 with lofty timber. The difficulties and incon-
veniences of a new settlement, are rendered the
 more easy and tolerable, where, as in the instance
 of these Friends, a number of families, by agree-
ment, form a settlement in the same neighbor-
hood. In the afternoon several of them visited
 us at our lodgings, and expressed sympathy with
 us in our undertaking. 12th. Proceeded on our journey; travelled
 thirty-one miles and reached Randallstown; part
 of the day has been rainy, and the riding very
 disagreeable. We have passed through a body
 of land heavily timbered and very rich. There
 are yet but few settlements made on this tract.
 The first settlers in this new country erect small
 log cabins, which they cover with split timber
 called puncheons; these they pin to the rafters
 with wooden pins. Nails are rarely to be found
 in any part of the house. Their floors are hewn
 out of the timber, and pinned to the sleepers
 with wooden pins. They clear their land by
 killing the timber, which is done by girdling the
 trees, that is by cutting the bark around the
 trees to the wood. They then proceed to the
 cultivation of the soil, which produces them abun-
dant crops. It is a common practice with them to sow
 small grain upon the original surface, which is
 harrowed in, and such is the looseness and light-
ness of the soil, there seems but little necessity
 for the plough in raising the first crop of grain. Our road led us across a water of the Ohio
 called Captena; also several streams belonging to
 a river called Stillwater; thus named from its
 slow, silent progress to the Muskingum. 13th. This day we travelled twenty-five miles
 and reached Beathe's Ordinary. We have had
 a very disagreeable day's ride. A continued fall
 of rain, hail, and snow, and the road very miry
 and fatiguing to our horses. The land through
 which we have passed not quite so good gene-
rally as that noted yesterday. We, however,
 saw considerable bodies of excellent land, parti-
cularly of bottoms. Some of them were of far
 greater extent than any we have heretofore met
 with, being heavily timbered and very rich.
 Scarcely a settlement has yet been made in this
 tract; deer are very plenty here. It is to be re-
marked, that in riding the last fifty miles, we
 have scarcely seen one of any of the descriptions
 of the feathered tribes, except owls. Birds love
 to resort to the haunts of men. Squirrels appear to be very numerous, and
 are mostly of a deep black color. In the notes
 made on crossing the Alleghany Mountains, I
 omitted to observe that the squirrels we saw
 there were mostly red, and less in size than the
 grey squirrels of Maryland. They are the most
 active squirrel I ever saw, and are called by the
 mountaineers the Chipparee Squirrel. We this day crossed several of the branches of
Will's Creek. This creek we understand derived
its name from Will, a famous Indian, who former-
ly had a town upon its banks called Willstown. 14th. Travelled twenty-five miles, crossing in
 our way the main branch of Will's Creek and a 
 water called Salt Creek; at night reached Zanes-
ville, and lodged at M'Intire 's tavern. This is
 a town lately laid out on the Muskingum river,
 opposite to the junction of Licking creek. Its
 situation is very level and handsome, and will
 doubtless command the trade of this new coun-
try. As we approached the Muskingum, our road
led us upon a hill of about 200 feet elevation,
 upon which we rode for a distance of seven
 miles; both upon our right and left hand, were
 chains of hills about ten miles from us, in
 view, bearing the same westerly direction, with
 that upon which we travelled. The appearance
of these hills revived the recollection of the
Blue Ridge, and its parallel mountians. Several
 mounds or burial places were to-day observed
 by us. 15th. This day we travelled thirty miles and
 lodged at a small hut called Trimble's. We ferried the beautiful river Muskingum at
 Zanesville, where it is about 600 feet wide, rode
 through a tolerable tract of land, till we reached
 a creek called Jonathan's creek. From this
 creek to the end of this day's journey, a distance
 of twenty miles, we rode through land which we
 think preferable to any tract we have yet passed,
 being more level, the timber heavier and the soil
 very rich; many Germans are making settlements
 here. Several mounds fell under our observa-
tion to-day; we also saw many deer; seventeen
 of these were together in one wheat field. 16th. Rode thirty-two miles, and at night
 were permitted to lodge under a roof called
 Gray's. We passed through New Lancaster, a
 town lately laid out, and situated on the great
Hock-hocking river, as it is called upon the
 maps. Its size greatly disappointed me; an ac-
tive man may jump from one of its banks to the
 other at New Lancaster. This town as well as the neighboring country,
 is being rapidly settled by Germans. During
 our day's ride, the extraordinary beauty of the
 country, as well as the superior excellency of the
 land, excited our admiration. Now and then a
 prairie or natural meadow containing from fifty
 to two hundred acres, apparently a perfect level,
 having neither tree, shrub, stump, or stone, and
 the soil the deepest black I ever saw in any com-
position of earths, attracted our notice. These
 were surrounded by higher ground, covered with
 lofty timber, extending to the next prairie, and
 thus on till we reached a tract called the Piqua
 Plains. Here our admiration was afresh excited
 by a view of the most beautiful scenery we had
 yet met with. This tract is perfectly level; it is
 situated upon the Scioto river, is seven miles in
 length, and generally three miles in width, hav-
ing neither tree, stone or shrub, and composed
 of the black earth above described; it is in part
 under cultivation. About the centre of the
 prairie is a circular mound of large diameter,
 and about forty feet in height, cast up by art.
 It is covered with lofty timber. The people
 who cultivate these plains find them to produce
 from eighty to one hundred bushels of Indian
 corn, and from forty to fifty bushels of Indian
 corn, and from forty to fifty bushels of wheat
 per acre. They plant corn at the distance of
 two and a half to three feet apart, having six to
 eight stalks in a hill. In the course of this day's journey we have
 seen deer and turkeys in abundance, and for
 several days past have seen vast numbers of
 pigeons. 17th. Travelled fifteen miles and arrived at
 the town of Chilicothe, where we were well en-
tertained at Tiffin's tavern. The governor of
 the State of Ohio resides here, who having
 heard of our arrival, paid us a visit in the even-
ing and supped with us. We were pleased with
 his friendly affability. In the course of this
 day's short ride, our road led through a continua-
tion of the finest lands. It is remarkable that there are uniformly
 three gradations of elevation, from the banks of
 the Scioto river. The first is a bottom of about
 one mile in extent, very level and covered with
 black walnut, buck eye, blue ash, honey locust,
 and sugar trees. Then upon another elevation
 of about fifteen feet, a second bottom, which ex-
tends from one to two miles, covered with the
 same descriptions of timber, though heavier, and
 the trees standing nearer together. Then an-
other elevation about the same height, which ex-
tends for many miles, being a little inclined to
 hills; the timber composed of a great variety.
 People are settling fast upon this tract, and
 several mills are already erected upon a creek
 belonging to the Scioto, which we crossed, called
 the Killakanik. On our way we turned aside from our road
 to view an ancient fortification. This fortifica-
tion is on the Scioto bottom adjacent to the river,
 and is shaped thus. Map of an ancient fortification along the Scioto River Ancient Fortification on Scioto River. A pictorial representa-
tion of this Indian antiquity has been published in the Smithson-
ian Contributions to Knowledge, vol, I, plate xviii. The bank of earth thrown up around the for-
tification is about six feet high, surrounded by
 a ditch upon the outside, now four feet in width,
 and as many in depth. The bank is covered
 with lofty timber, as is also the ground within
 the intrenchment. There are several mounds
 such as have heretofore been described in the
 vicinity, and within the town of Chilicothe there
 is another fortification of which the diameter is
 about 450 feet. Near this is the largest mound
 we have seen, being 100 feet in diameter, and
 thirty feet in height, and is a globular figure of
 great regularity. Three miles below the town
 of Chilicothe, and between the Scioto and Paint
 Creek, and near their junction, is a fortification
 of the following figure: Map of a fortification between the Scioto and Paint Creek Containing 30 Acres. The banks of this ancient work are about six
 feet in height. The eight small circles opposite
 the openings or gates are mounds of considerable
 size. I had omitted to mention, that on the east
 bank of the Scioto, nearly opposite Chilicothe,
 we measured to-day a sycamore tree which was
 sixteen feet in diameter. The tree is hollow,
 and measures thirteen feet across the hollow.
 New settlers have frequently encamped in this
 tree with their families, whilst they were making
 choice of land to settle upon. 18th. Proceeded upon our journey fifteen
 miles and lodged at Platter's tavern. On our
 way we passed many mounds. Several of them
 were of the shape and size of the one described
 in the town of Chilicothe. Our attention was
 also arrested by the appearance of a bank thrown
 up at some distance from the road; on riding to
 it we found it to be a very extensive fortifica-
tion. It is situated upon a level plain near
 Paint Creek, one of the waters of the Scioto
 river. As this is a work of great labor and curi-
osity, I shall be minute in my description and
 give the following figure. Map of fortification on Paint Creek Ancient Fortification on Paint Creek, near Chilicothe, contain-
ing within the embankments nearly one hundred acres. The bank which is cast up for the fortification
 is now fully four feet in height, and thirty-three
 in width, at the base covered with lofty timber. The figure marked (A) is a very regular oval
 mound 500 feet in diameter, from one extremity
 to another the longest way, and 300 feet in
 diameter the other way; perpendicular height is
 about thirty feet. This mound is paved over
 with stone, and has upon it trees of large size, as
 well as the remains of decaying trees, which
 after acquiring their full growth have fallen.
 The two circles marked (B) are very perfect
 globular figures. They are one hundred feet in
 diameter, and about thrity feet perpendicular
 height. The remaining eight small circles represent
 mounds which are from eighty to one hundred feet
 in diameter, and from twenty-five to thirty feet
 perpendicular height, being also globular figures,
 and all covered with lofty timber. The semi-
circle (C) is a bank of earth thrown up to the
 height of about three feet, its diameter about
 one hundred and fifty feet. Near the outer banks of this extraordinary
 fortification are many large holes in the earth,
 at least one hundred feet in diameter, and of
 considerable depth. These are no doubt places
 out of which the earth was in part taken for
 making this work of labor. The land through which we have passed to-
day, is a continuation of a country, very level 
 and beautiful, being situated on Paint Creek;
 the soil, the same in appearance as that de-
scribed yesterday, nothing seeming to indicate
 its superior richness, unless it be the size of its
 timber. The heaviest and most towering trees
 we have seen, we met with to-day. Our progress
 was impeded by our curiosity to take the girth
 of many trees; we measured white oaks
 which were from seven to eight feet in diameter;
 walnuts, six to seven feet four inches; elms, six
 to six feet eight inches; ash, five feet, and
 honey locusts four feet in diameter; the girths
 taken eight feet above the surface of the earth.
 These trees carried their thickness to an amazing
height. We also measured a few sycamore trees, and
 most of them were from eight to ten feet in
 diameter; one of the sycamores we measured
 which was eight feet in diameter, continued its
 thickness forty-five feet without a limb, its top
 very branching and large. While we were admir-
ing it, Philip Dennis * suggested an opinion
 that this tree, could it be split into cord-wood
 after the common manner, would measure forty
 cords. At first we questioned the statement,
 but upon making a calculation, became con-
vinced that his estimate was within bounds. These were not trees singled out as the only
 monuments; we turned not aside to search for
 them, but measured such as fell under our own
observation in passing over our road. It is more
 than probable that there are trees in the same
 tract larger than any we saw. Few settlements
 are yet made here. 19th. Rode seventeen miles, and reached the
 residence of our friend William Lupton , upon
 Lee's Creek, one of the head waters of Paint
 Creek. Our road led us eight times across Paint
 Creek; passing a great part of the way through
 the bottoms of Paint Creek. The land the same
 in appearance as remarked yesterday. In the
 course of our ride, we saw many hundreds of
 poplars which were the more observable, as we
 have scarcely noticed a poplar since we crossed
 the Ohio. These trees are generally seven to
 eight feet six inches in diameter, many of them
 continuing their thickness for fifty feet in height,
 and very handsome and sound. On the bot-
toms we saw deer in abundance; they were
 so gentle as to allow us to pass by them
 quite within gun shot. They appeared to be
 busy in cropping the young grass. We have
 also observed several mounds and fortifications
 near the falls to Paint Creek, and others nearly
 adjacent of which the banks are about three and
 a half feet high. Upon this Creek there are many beaver
 dams, and beavers are still caught here by the
 Indians. For several days past we have seen
 many hunting camps but no Indians. Several
 families of Friends have settled in this remote
 quarter of the Western Territory. They have
removed from Virginia and North Carolina, and
 expect to be followed by others. They tell us
 that an indulged meeting is held in one of their
 houses. There is much to induce Friends of the South-
ern States, to remove to this new country; for,
 added to the consideration of the superior quality
 of the land, and the cheap and easy terms upon
 which it is to be purchased, there is an invalu-
able regulation in the Constitution of Ohio, pro-
hibiting the introduction of slaves. The Con-
stitution has also provided that no person with-
in the State shall voluntarily relinquish his right
 to freedom. Its framers have even gone further;
 they declare that they have made these regula-
tions to be binding both upon them and upon
their posterity. This truly valuable country is forbidden ground
 to the Virginia slave holders. Many of them
 have approached as near to its borders as they
 have dared, by settling along the east shore of
 the Ohio river; their murmurs induced several
 persons in the State of Ohio, to offer themselves
 as candidates to the late State Legislature, de-
claring their determination to use their influence
 in obtaining an alteration in this part of the
 Constitution. We are told that on account of
 this avowal, they met with the most pointed and
 zealous opposition; the people declaring gene-
rally, that one of the inducements which led
 them to emigrate to the State, was the Constitu-
tional provision by which slavery was interdicted,
 and that any alteration therein would be an in-
supportable grievance. 20th. This day rode fifteen miles, and reached
 Hugh Evan's , upon Clear Creek, one of the head
 waters of the Rocky Fork of Paint Creek. The
 country through which we have passed is up-
land and lies level. The timber is heavy and
 much interspersed with blue ash, hackberry,
 walnut and sugar trees. There is scarcely a set-
tlement yet made here. 21st. Our progress has been impeded for
 several days past, two of our horses belonging
 to our company having faltered. This day we
 concluded to rest them by continuing at the
 house of Hugh Evans , who is hearty and cheerful
 at seventy-four years of age, his wife equally
 so, and seventy-two years of age. The old man
 appears to make me welcome at his house, say-
ing he knew my father, having early in life been
 his neighbor, and has made many inquiries after
 the families of the people who were his old ac-
quaintance. He says he has six children, all of
 whom have married to his satisfaction, and that
 they lately removed with him from Kentucky,
 and are settled around him, each of them upon
 five hundred acres of land which he has given
 them. He says that it affords him great conso-
lation now in the decline of life, to reflect that
 his acquisitions are the fruits of his honest in-
dustry. 22d. This day rode twenty-three miles, and
 lodged at Sewell's Cabin,-a day of snow and
 rain. We crossed the ridge which divides the
 waters of the Scioto from those of the Little
 Miami river. Passed several of the head
 branches of the latter, as also a considerable
 creek called the East Fork of the Little Miami.
 On one of the bottoms of the creek we noticed a
 fortification. The bank cast up around was about
 four feet high. We also observed within a few
 rods several mounds. It is truly a beautiful
 country through which we have passed to-day;
 the land is level, covered with lofty timber, and
 the soil very rich, scarcely a settlement yet
 made. 23d. Continued our journey, and after riding
 fourteen miles, reached the house of Samuel
 Linton, at Wainsville, upon the Little Miami
 river, where we were kindly received. At this
 place we rested ourselves and horses, acquired
 information respecting our future route, and
 equipped ourselves for the increasing difficulties
 of the wilderness. The settlement made here is composed cheifly
 of Friends; about thirty families reside in this
 neighborhood. A Monthly Meeting is held
 here called Miami Monthly Meeting, to which
 about thirty families more belong who are scat-
tered over an extensive tract of country. Our attention was attracted to-day by the ap-
pearance of the stone, not only in the beds of
 the rivers and creeks, but also upon the hills
 and in the valleys. They are limestone, and are
 composed altogether of marine shells. The stone
 when broken discovers the size and shape of the
shells very perfectly. These shells are of the same description with
 those I have formerly obtained from the banks
 of the Chesapeake Bay, in the lower part of the
 State of Maryland. It may be remarked, that
 no shell-fish of this description are at present to
 be found in any of the waters of our Continent. The country west of the Ohio river through
 which we have passed is a limestone country,
 the very pebbles and even sand in many places
 are limestone. Heretofore I have omitted to mention that in
 the neighborhood of Chilicothe, we amused our-
selves with the earths and stones, which were
 dug out of the ground in sinking wells. There
 are several layers or strata of limestone, gravel,
 and sand, within a few feet of the surface of the
 earth. Some of the stones contain the above
 description of marine shells, and in breaking
 some of the large gravel we found appearances
 of the same shells. The stones as well as the
 gravel have evident marks of their having been
 washed with water, their shape inclining greatly
 to rotundity. 24th. Again proceeded upon our journey, and
 after riding eight miles reached Dayton, where
 we lodged. This town is newly laid out, situ-
ated upon the Great Miami river, nearly op-
posite to the junction of Still Water and Mad
 river, with the Miami, which is here about one
 hundred and sixty feet in width. We have
 passed to day the Ridge which divides the waters
 of the Little and Great Miami, and crossed
 several of the streams belonging to the Great
 Miami. The tract of country between the
 two, through which we have passed to-day,
 is of the most beautiful and desirable de-
scription. The land lies in waves of great regu-
larity, is crossed with heavy towering timber,
 and the soil inexhaustibly rich. At Dayton
 were two block houses, which were erected by
 the white men, as places of retreat and defence
 against an attack by the Indians. 25th. Rode twenty-one miles, and reached a
 small village called Staunton, situated upon the
 Great Miami river. The country continues to
 exhibit a beautiful appearance, though the tim
ber is not generally so heavy as noted yesterday.
 We passed several extensive and rich prairies,
 and forded Mad river a little above its mouth.
 The river derives its name from its swift current.
 We also crossed several streams belonging to the
 Great Miami. 26th. This day after riding fifteen miles, we
 reached Flinn's ordinary, where we were disap-
pointed in finding no feed for our horses. We
 also received the information that there was no
 probability of our obtaining provision for them
 short of Fort Wayne; we therefore despatched
 a part of our company to a house we had passed
 about four miles, in quest of corn. They obtained
 four bushels, and hired a man and horse to travel
 with us and bring the corn along. For many
 days past our horses have suffered for want of
 hay, and being fed altogether upon corn they
 have lost their appetites. The face of the country in the course of this
 day's short journey is a continuation of beautiful
 land; being level, and finely timbered. We
 passed through a handsome prairie containing
 several hundred acres called the Lower Piqua
 Plain, crossed Honey Creek and Lost Creek,
 two considerable streams of the Great Miami. Thus far in our route we have been favored
with respect to the waters, no rain having fallen
 lately to raise the creeks and rivers to a height
 sufficient to detain us. In fording some of the
 streams we have thought that even six inches
 greater depth would take our horses off their feet.
 There is considerable danger in fording many of
 the streams we have passed, from the uneveness
 of the stony bottoms of the rivers. The beds of
 the rivers are mostly limestone, and being worn
 smooth by the washing of the water, horses are apt
 to fall. This was to-day the case with my horse in
 fording the Miami, from which accident I got
 very wet. During our detention here this afternoon, we
 observed a flock of birds alighting from the trees,
 different in appearance from any we had seen.
 Our landlord informed us they were parrots, and
 that they were common upon the Great Miami;
 and to gratify our curiosity he shot one. It was
 about the size of a dove, and its plumage resem-
bled the green parrot of South America, the
 head red, and the wings tipped with the same
 color, the tail long and the bill and tongue of
 the same description as the chattering parrot.
 As they alighted from the trees, they made a
 hoarse noise resembling the chattering of the
 common parrot. There is also a woodcock here resembling the
 red headed woodcock of Maryland, except that
 its head is black and its bill ivory. At this place General Wayne erected a
 fortification when on his march against the In-
dians, a part of which is now standing. Our
 landlord occupies one of the houses which was
 at that time built and enclosed within the stock-
ade. From the late period in the day at which
 our supply of corn arrived for the horses, we
 have concluded to remain at our quarters; the
 landlord tells us we shall be welcome to sleep
 upon his floor, and has promised to make us a
 good fire to sleep by. This is a kind of lodgment to which we have
 become well accustomed, having heretofore in
 our journey often had to wrap ourselves in our
 blankets and to lie upon floors, always observing
 the necessary precaution of laying our feet to the
 fire; we have in no instance taken cold. 27th. This day rode fourteen miles, and on
 our way passed a larger prairie than the one we
 saw yesterday, which is called the Upper Piqua
 Plains. We have also passed a body of land
 heavily timbered, but its very level situation
 renders it not desirable. Through this tract we
 have found a very deep and miry road, and
 have regretted the neccesity of a slow movement.
 Our hired man has to lead his horse, the bag of
 corn being too heavy for the horse to bear his
 weight also. We reached a place called Lora-
mier's store, where we found a shelter and
 lodged, having through the latter part of the
 day rode through rain. On our way we twice
 crossed a considerable water of the Miami called
 Loramier's Creek. At this place there is a very large fortification
 made by General Wayne called Fort Loramier.
 And here it is that the line of division between
 the white people and the Indians passes agree-
ably to the treaty of peace* *Treaty of Greenville, for which see Appendix. between the Indians
 and General Wayne . I may here remark that
 for many days in passing along, we have ob-
served hunting camps erected by the Indians,
 but no Indians in them. It is probable they are at present at or near
 their towns. We have observed from day to
 day many curious, and to us unitelligible In-
dian hieroglyphics cut upon the trees. We have
 also been entertained in examining these figures,
 sometimes cut, at other times painted on the 
wood after cutting away the bark, the figures of
 elks, the horns of the elk, the figures of buffaloes,
 bears, wolves, deer, raccoons, and various other
 wild beasts, and birds of different species; turtles
 and reptile creatures; also the representation of
 men, women and children, boys with bows and
 arrows shooting game, and men with their
 guns aiming at game, or in the act of pursuing
 it, &c. &c. As a testimony in favor of the virtue and
 modesty of these men of the woods, I note, that
 we have not yet observed amongst this variety
 of figures, one unchaste representation. 28th. Rode twenty-two miles through a flat
 country, heavily timbered; at night we encamped
 in the woods, made a large fire, fared sumptu-
ously upon wild pigeons, wrapped ourselves in
 our blankets and slept soundly. Our pigeons
 were shot by one of our company who carries a
 gun. There are at this time vast numbers of
 this fowl scattered over the woods. They breed
 here undisturbedly. Squirrels are also very
 numerous. We now and then see a few deer.
 They are not plenty here. Wolves, opossums,
 reaccoons, and some other descriptions of wild
 game are abundant. We have not yet seen a
 bear, though they are very plenty throughout
 the region we have passed over. This is owing
 to a remarkable fact in the history of this crea-
ture. They betake themselves to dens in the
 holes of trees, at an early period of the winter,
 where they remain till the 1st of the 4th month.
 During this interval they never leave their holes,
 and as they lay up no store for the winter sup-
ply, it is certain they live without eating. The
 Indians say they live by sucking their paws.
 The means by which their lives are supported
 in their recluse situation, I shall not undertake
 to determine. I shall however observe that when
 taken from their dens they are always very fat.
 We have met with much of their meat, and can
 assert that we have seen the thickness of four
 inches of fat between the skin and the lean which
 covers the ribs. During the winter the Indians
 find the bears by searching for their dens in the
 trees, which they know by the marks made by
 the claws of the bear in climbing. We have now reached the waters of the lakes,
 having to day forded one of the forks of the St.
 Mary's river. On our way we passed for a few
 miles along a road one hundred feet wide, cut
 by General Wayne's army for transporting pro-
visions from the great Miami to the St. Mary's
 river. The road is now grown up with briars
 and shrubs. Shortly after we had made our fire, and with
 the approach of night we heard at a short dis-
tance from us, a whooping in the woods. We
 had reason to believe from the shrill and uncom-
mon whoop, that it was the voice of an Indian,
 and having understood that it was a custom
 among them when about to approach a camp, to
 give notice by a whoop, we failed not to return
 the ceremony also by a whoop. In a few mo-
ments two Indian men upon a horse, followed by
 two women and a girl upon another horse, rode
 up to our camp. Their countenances were smil-
ing and indicative of friendship. As we reached
 them our hands, they shook them saying, Saga,
 Saga, niches, which we have since learned was
 the salutation, How do you do, brothers. They
 could not speak English, but putting their hands
 to their breasts expressed, Delawares, Dela-
wares, from which we gathered they were
 Delaware Indians. They had their hunting ap-
paratus with them, and pointing several times
 to the south, we concluded they wished to make
 us understand that their camp was in that direc-
tion, and that they were on their way to it.
 After looking upon us for some minutes they
 left us. 29th. Very early this morning we again pro-
ceeded, and this day rode thirty miles, a laborious,
 fatiguing journey to ourselves and horses. Our
 path leading through a flat country we find the
 travelling miry and deep. Our horses are to be
 pitied, the stock of corn we procured for them
 is exhausted, and the only food they can
 now get is the grass in the woods. For several
 nights past we have turned them loose to graze.
 These poor creatures feed around our camps and
 appear afraid to leave us. This day we crossed the St. Mary's where its
 width was about one hundred and fifty feet, it is
 said to be a very deep river. An old Indian
 and his squaw reside here, and he undertook to
 ferry us across in a canoe. Our horses swam
 the river, and got over well. The old Indian,
 whose name is Stephen , very unintentionally
 swam also. This accident was owing to the mis-
conduct of some of the packers, who, on their
 way to Fort Wayne with provisions, gave Stephen 
 too much whisky. Philip Dennis was in the
 canoe with him when he accidentely fell over-
board; we were greatly alarmed for his safety,
 knowing that he was intoxicated, but after dis-
appearing for a few seconds, he rose to the sur-
face of the water, and soon convinced us that he
 could swim. Philip caught him by his blanket,
 and got him again into the boat. The old man
 laughed very heartily at the accident, saying to
 us in broken English, No fear, me ferry you
 in de canoe yet. Our blacksmith having in-
formed Stephen of his expectation of settling in
 the Indian country for the benefit of the red
 people, and the old man finding also that our
 company were all prosecuting their travels for
 benevolent purposes, exercised his gratitude by
 telling us You pay one quarter dollar de man;
 nobody keep canoe here but Stephen ; he make
 the white people pay dollar, I make dem packers
 pay me de rest. In Stephen's hut we observed
 several Indians who were asleep. He says they
 are Indians who have come a great distance and
 are tired. During the greater part of this day
 we have rode through a heavy rain. The rain
 continuing with the approach of night, we made
 a large fire, and erected a shelter in imitation of
 the Indian hunting camps, covering it with our
 blankets. Under this we slept, and were but
 little incommoded, notwithstanding the rain
 continued during the greater part of the night. I must not omit to mention that we to-day
 passed through a very level plain containing
 many thousand acres. This plain is almost with-
out trees. The soil nearly hid by weeds and
 grass of last year's growth; the luxuriance of
 which plainly demonstrates its extraordinary fer-
tility. In this plain we observed a small pond
 or lake in which were wild geese and ducks in
 abundance. We are informed that this is one
 of the places where wild fowl raise their young. 30th. Pursued our path and travelled twenty-
three miles through a very fertile, heavily tim-
bered and beautiful country, being a little more
 inclined to hills. The ride to-day has been a
 pleasing one, in part doubtless from the reflec-
tion that the day would probably close a long,
 tedious and arduous journey. We at last reached
Fort Wayne. As we approached the Fort,
 having reached it within about thirty rods, we
 were saluted by a sentinel with the word Halt.
 We obeyed the command. A sergeant was de-
spatched from the commanding officer, who en-
quired of us on his behalf, Where are you
 going, and What is your business. We de-
sired him to inform the commandant that we
 were strangers, and that we had an introductory
 letter directed to him which would explain our
 business. The officer shortly returned to us with an in-
vitation to advance; we accordingly proceeded,
 and were met very politely by the commanding
 officer, Capt. Whipple , to whom we handed the
 following letter from the Secretary of War. War Department, February 20, 1804.Gentlemen,- This will be handed you by
 Messrs. George Ellicott , Joel Wright , and Gerard
 T. Hopkins, who are a deputation from the So-
ciety of Friends in Maryland, for visiting the In-
dians in the western country for the laudable
 purpose of affording them assistance in the intro-
duction of the arts of civilization. They are men of high respectability, are ac-
tuated by the best motives, and are entitled to
 all the civilities in your power to bestow. You
 will please to afford them all necessary aid, and
 treat them with such marks of respectful atten-
tion as are due to citizens whose disinterested
 services deserve the plaudits of every good man. I am, very respectfully, your humble servant, Henry Dearborn.* *General Dearborn was well acquainted with the
 members of the mission who resided at Ellicott's 
Mills, and letters frequently passed between them.
 He was deeply interested in the improvement of the
 Indian tribes, and having heard of the deputation
 about to be sent from the Friends of Maryland to
 Fort Wayne, he drew up this letter, and also the one
 which will be seen in the following pages to the com-
manding officer, and the Indian agent at Detroit, and
 wishing to impart all the information he possessed,
 to relieve a journey to a place then considered so dis-
tant a settlement, he took the trouble to deliver
 them in person at Ellicott's Mills, and suggest the
 return of the mission by the way of Lake Erie and
 Niagara. The General was a noble looking man, and
 although he had been actively engaged in our Re-
volutionary war, still appeared to be in the vigor of
 life; he made the trip from Washington to Ellicott's
 Mills on horse-back attended by his son and a ser-
vant, a distance of forty miles, and returned the
 next day in the same way. T.
 
To the commanding officer at Fort Wayne. 
 Mr. John Johnson , Indian Factor.
 Mr. William Wells , Indian Agent. After delivering this letter we proceeded to
 the house of a Canadian trader, who we had pre-
viously been informed would furnish us with
 accommodations. In the evening the Commandant followed us
 to our quarters, discovering marks of great re-
spect and attention, and appears to be a gentle-
man. He has urgently pressed us to dine with
 him to-morrow, and we have accepted the invi-
tation. 31st. This morning the commanding officer,
 accompanied by John Johnson and William
 Wells, the two other persons named in the letter
 to the Secretary of War, waited upon us. They 
 expressed to us they were glad to see us, and
 invited us with marks of earnestness, each one,
 to make his house our home. We thanked them
 for their kindness, and accepted the invitation
 of the Factor, John Johnson , whom we accom-
panied to his house. In an interview with these three persons we
 communicated to them more fully the object of
 our visit, and consulted with them respecting
 the best mode to pursue, in order to effect our
 purpose. It was deemed advisable that an ex-
press be sent to the Little Turtle and to the Five
 Medals. The former residing at his town called
 Turtle's Town, about eighteen miles from this
 place, situated upon Eel river, a water of the
Wabash, and the latter on the river St. Joseph
 of Lake Michigan, about forty miles hence, in-
forming them of our arrival at Fort Wayne, and
 that we wished to see each of them there at an
 early period. This charge William Wells readily
 took upon himself, and we have no doubt he will
 comply with his engagement. We fulfilled our promise in dining to-day with
Capt. Whipple , the commanding officer. We
 were all accompanied to his house by John
 Johnson, who dined with us. The officer behaved
 with a freedom and gentility becoming a well
 bred man. After dinner he showed us more
 fully the fort. This fortification which was
 built by General Wayne , is large and substantial,
 and is situated opposite to the junction of the
 St. Mary's and St. Joseph's rivers, and precisely
 the place from which those waters take the name
 of the Miami of the Lake,* *Now called the Maumee river. bearing that name
 to Lake Erie. The fort commands a beautiful
 view of these rivers, as also of an extent of
 about four miles square of cleared land. Much
 of this land has been cleared by the army of the
 United States, and much of it was formerly done
 by the Miami Indians; they having had a large
 town here. It is said that in the year 1785, the
 Indian town then at this place contained upwards
 of one thousand warriors. The garrison kept
 here at present contains about forty officers and
 soldiers It being a time of profound peace with
 the Indians, government have withdrawn the
 large force formerly kept at this station. The spot where Fort Wayne is situated is ren-
dered famous in Indian history. It was here
 that the Indians gave the army of General Har-
mar a second defeat by which several hundred
 of his men fell. Their bones lie scattered upon
 the surface of the earth, and we are told that
 the route by which the army made an escape
 can be readily traced for the distance of five or
 six miles by the bones of those slain by the In-
dians. The grave of the Toad , nephew to the Little
 Turtle, a distinguished young chief, who with
 the Little Turtle and other chiefs visited the 
Friends of Baltimore two years ago, is here; he
 died very suddenly on his return from that jour-
ney. His death was greatly lamented by the
 Indians, and for a long time after his burial his
 grave was visited by them, and many singular
 ceremonies performed over it. They buried with
 him his rifle, his hunting apparatus, his best
 clothing, all his ornaments, trinkets, &c. &c.,
 their value being not less than three hundred dollars. 4th month 1st. This day is the first day of the
 week, and the inhabitants of Fort Wayne appear
 to pay no respect to it. The soldiers are on
 duty, and the Canadians who are settled here
 are busied with their several occupations. After
breakfast we paid a visit to William Wells , and
 after spending several hours with returned
 to our quarters. In the afternoon we observed
 three Indians advancing toward our lodgings,
 and soon discovered that one of them was the
Five Medals , the other two were his sons. He
 had not heard of our arrival till he reached Fort
 Wayne, and the only information he had ob-
tained was that some Quakers had come. Busi-
ness had brought him to the fort. They were
 invited into our room, when the chief instantly
 recognized us both. He appeared glad to see
 us, and shook hands with both of us very hearti
ly. A person being present who understood the
Pottowattamy language, he said to him pointing
 to me, This is the man who wrote our talks in
Baltimore. The Five Medals very deliberately and can-
didly replied to our inquiry after his health as
 follows: That in the course of last fall he went
 to Detroit, that whilst there the white people
 made him drink whiskey. That after he had
 accomplished his business there, he set out for
 his home, and got upon his horse whilst the
 whiskey was in his head. That he had not rode
 far before he fell from his horse, and was very
 much hurt by the fall, and that ever since that
 time he had not been well. After some further mutual inquiries, relative
 to the welfare of red and white acquaintance, we
 we informed him through an interpreter that we
 had come to see our red brethren, that we had
 messages for both the Little Turtle and himself,
 and were glad that it had so happened that we
 had come. That we hoped the Little Turtle 
 would come to-morrow, and that we wished to
 see them together, having something to say to
 them. He appeared pleased with this informa-
tion, and expressed that he had made a camp
 not far off, where he would wait for the arrival
 of the Little Turtle . After some general con-
versation he withdrew, bidding us farewell. 4th mo. 2d. Being invited to dine to-day with
William Wells , who is interpreter for the In-
dians, we went to his house accordingly, having
 the company of our very worthy and kind land-
lord. About mid-day the Little Turtle arrived. He
 approached us with a countenance placid be-
yond description; took us by the hand with cor-
diality, and expressed himself in terms of great
 gladness at meeting with us. He inquired very
 particularly after his friends and acquaintance of
Baltimore, after our own welfare, the path we
 had come, and the difficulties we had encoun-
tered on our journey through the wilderness.
 Having answered his questions, he replied in
 turn to our inquiries as follows: That since he
 saw us it had pleased the Great Spirit to take
 away two of his brothers and a nephew. That
 his nephew was the Toad , a young chief who
 was with him in Baltimore. That he died on
 his return from that visit, and within a few miles
 of home, of which circumstances he had desired
William Wells to inform us. That with respect
 to himself, he was but half well, having been
 very sick last fall and expected to die. That
 his white brothers at Fort Wayne, hearing of
 his illness, sent a doctor to him who gave him
 physic and made him better. That he had now
 seen fifty-three winters, and two of his brothers
 being dead, made him think of death, and that
 his time would soon come. He also told us that he had left a brother at
 his town who would have accompanied him,
 being desirous to come with him, but could
 not find his horse in time. After this, other
 conversation took place of a general nature. The
 interpreter informs us that his complaint is the
 gout, and that in the time of his illness he (the
 interpreter) had told him that his complaint be-
longed to great folks and gentlemen. Well,
 said the Turtle , I always thought I was a
 gentlemen.* *By the suffrage of all who became acquainted with
 the Little Turtle during his visits to Baltimore in
 1801, and also in 1807, he was acknowledged to be
 a gentleman in character, appearance, and manners.
 His estimate of himself therefore was not too high.
 For his speech before the Indian Committee in Balti-
more in 1801, and other information concerning him,
 see appendix. T. About 2 o'clock we dined. At the head of the
 table sat the interpreter's wife, who is a modest,
 well-looking Indian woman, and the daughter
 of a distinguished chief. She had prepared for
 us a large well roasted wild turkey, and also a
 wild turkey boiled, and for these she had pro-
vided a large supply of cranberry sauce. The
Little Turtle sat at table with us, and with
 much sociability we all partook of an excellent
 dinner. In the afternoon the Five Medals , attended by
 his sons, visited us at William Wells' house,
 and the opportunity being a suitable one, we
 proposed to them that a formal conference should
 then take place between us. This proposition
 meeting their assent, we opened the conference
 by desiring the interpreter to inform them that
 we had received their talk sent to us last fall,
 informing us that the implements of husbandry,
 which we had sent to them last year, had come
 to them safely, and that we had carefully ob-
served all that was contained in that talk. That
 we were deputed by their brothers and friends of
Baltimore to come to see them. That we had
 accordingly come, and had with us a letter di-
rected to them, which we thought ought in the
 first place to be read, and after that we might
 have something to say to them. A short pause
 having taken place, they expressed a desire that
 the letter should be read, which was accordingly
 done, and interpreted to them as follows: From the Committee appointed for Indian
 Affairs by the Friends of Maryland to the Little
 Turtle and the Five Medals , Chiefs of the Potto-
wattamy and Miami nations of Indians: Brothers and Friends- We have received
 your talk, communicated by our friend William
 Wells, after the reception of the implements of
 husbandry sent last spring for your use. In
 that speech, as well as when you were in Balti-
more, you have told us that you thought it best
 for some of us to go out to see yoou, that we
 might be better capable of judging what could
 be done further for the benefit of our red breth-
ren. Brothers and Friends,-In compliance with
 your request we have named our beloved friends
George Ellicott , Gerard T. Hopkins , Joel Wright ,
 and Elisha Tyson , to go and visit you and to take
 you by the hand on our behalf. And we desire
 that you will receive them, or any of them that
 may be enabled to perform the journey as your
 brothers, in whom we have confidence, and that
 you will receive any communications from them
 as being from us, who are desirous of assisting
 you in what may add to your comfort, and that
 of your women and children. Your friends and brothers, William Stabler, Isaac Tyson, Benjamin Ellicott, John Ellicott Edward Stabler Philip E. Thomas Andrew Ellicott, Jr., Evan Thomas, Elisha Tyson, Jonathan Wright, Elias Ellicott, Jonathan Ellicott, Thomas More, Samuel Snowden. Baltimore, 2d. mo. 4th, 1804. At the contents of this letter they expressed
 their satisfaction, and after a pause of several
 minutes we addressed them through an interpre-
ter as follows: Brothers and Friends.- You observe that
 the letter which has just been read, makes men-
tion of four of us appointed to visit you. One
 of these was an infirm man who thought he
 could not endure the fatigue of so long a jour-
ney, and therefore did not come. The other
 did not omit to come for the want of love to his
 red brethren; family circumstances rendered it
 inconvenient for him to leave home. You see,
 brothers, that it has pleased the Great Spirit
 that two of us mentioned in the letter, should
 reach the country of our red brethren. Brothers,
 we thought it right in the first place to send for
 you, and to show you the letter which has just
 been read. We are glad that you are now come,
 and that we have this opportunity of taking you
 by the hand. Brothers, we believe that we have some things
 to say to you which are of great importance to
 our red brothers, to their old men, to their young
 men, to their women, and to their children. Brothers, we may now mention that we have
 not come merely to talk, but we hope we have
 come prepared to do a little for the welfare of
 our red brethren. Brothers, in looking over our business, we
 have thought that we should be glad to have an
 opportunity of seeing our red brethren together,
 and are willing to propose for your consideration,
 that you should now fix upon some place, and
 agree upon some time to meet us again, and that
 our brothers invite their old men, their young
 men, their women and their children to meet us,
 when we shall have something to say which it
 may not be necessary now to say. Brothers and Friends,- Should you think
 that the proposal which we have now made is
 proper, and conclude to meet us in the manner
 we have pointed out, we expect we shall have
 but little more to say at present. Here a pause 
 for some minutes took place, when the Little
 Turtle inquired, If the Friends had more to
 say. He was answered in the negative. After a further pause and some conversation
 between the two chiefs, they rose from their
 seats, and perceiving that they were advancing
 toward us, we also arose from our seats. On meet-
ing them, they took us by the hand, and with
 countenances indicative of great gravity, shook
 hands with us and returned to their seats. The Five Medals then commenced a speech
 as follows:- Brothers and Friends: My friend, the Lit-
tle Turtle, and myself, together with my two
 sons, who are present, rejoice to have this oppor-
tunity of seeing you, and of taking you by the
 hand. My Brothers: We are glad to be informed,
 that you received our talk sent to you last fall,
 and to find that you are now come to the country
 of your red brethren. My Brothers and Friends: We rejoice that
 the Great Spirit has conducted you safely to our
 country, and figure to ourselves that in you we
 see the rest of our brothers and friends of Balti-
more, and that in taking you by the hand, we
 take them by the hand. Brothers: We know that you have come a
 long distance to see the situation of your red
 brethren. We have no doubt that you have
 things to say which are of great importance to
 us, and which do not belong to a few only but
 to many. Brothers: Your brethren the Indians do
 business not as the white people do. We con-
vene our chiefs, and things of importance are
 considered by them. But, brothers, you have
 come to see the situation of your red brethren.
 It is our wish that you should see it. You shall
 not be disappointed. The proposal you have
 made to us we think right, and have concluded
 that this place (Fort Wayne,) is the best place
 to be fixed upon for the purpose you wish. We
 are pleased to find that you have a desire that
 our young men should be present to hear what
 you have to say, and as it is your wish to see our
 women and children, we desire that you may
 have an opportunity of seeing them. Brothers and Friends: Our young men are
 out hunting, and our women and children are
 now at work at their sugar camps. The time is
 not far off when they will all return to our
 towns, when it is usual to meet together. We
 hope, brothers, that you will not be in a hurry,
 but will allow us time to collect our people to-
gether. Here a pause took place, when we inquired if
 they had any thing further to add. And being
 answered in the negative, we addressed them
 again in substance as follows: Brothers and Friends: When we left our 
 homes, we knew it was early in the season, and
 expected that we should ge to the country of
 our red brethren at a time when their young
 men, their women and children would be busy.
 But brothers, a part of the service* *The Friends were desirous that their agricul-
turist, Philip Dennis , should arrive amongst the
 Indians in time to plant corn. T. which we de-
sign to render to you, required that we should
 come early, and makes it also necessary that we
 should now be in a hurry. Brothers: We will also add that when we
 were chosen by our friends at home to pay a
 visit to our red brethren, our women and chil-
dren consented that we should leave them, but
 charged us that we should not stay away from
 them longer than circumstances really required.
 A long time has already past since we left them,
 we therefore hope, brothers, that in three or four
 days it will be in your power to get together
 some of your people. Those that are far from
 home we do not wish that you should send for. The Little Turtle then observed that the res-
sons we had given were good. The Five Medals 
 next remarked that at the time proposed, they
 could easily convene a considerable number of
 their indolent people, who were too lazy to hunt
 or make sugar, but such they did not wish us to
 see. Their industrious young men and women 
 were too far from home to be convened in so
 short a time. Here a short conversation took place between
 the chiefs, and afterwards they proposed seven
 day's hence as the time; desiring that to-morrow
 might not be counted, as it would take them a
 day to return home. To this we consented. The Five Medals then expressed as follows: Brothers, it would have been very desirable
 to us if you could have met us at the time of our
 counsel. We have very often told our people
 of the Quakers. They listen to us, but are at a
 loss to know what sort of people the Quakers
 are. If you could stay, brothers, they would
 have an opportunity of seeing the Quakers, and
 of hearing words from your own mouths. After this the Little Turtle added: Brothers: We hope the words that you
 may say to us at the time we have appointed to
 meet will be upon paper. From that paper we
 can at some future time have your words de-
livered to our people. This, brothers, will in some
 measure answer the end. During a pause which occupied several
 minutes we asked them if we understood each
 other. The Turtle replied, Yes, perfectly; we
 have nothing further to do now than to look for-
ward to the day appointed. After this we took each other by the hand
 and very cordially bade farewell. We then re-
turned to our lodgings. In the evening we again had the company of
 the chiefs, they having been invited by our
 landlord to take supper with us. 3d. This day rainy, and spent chiefly at
William Wells '. Besides the garrison stationed here, there is a
 large store of goods established by the United
 States, for the purpose of suppplying the Indians.
 The store is kept by our landlord. Several
 Canadian traders also reside here, who exchange
 goods with the Indians; some of them have re-
sided here for more than thirty years. The In-
dians are daily arriving with their peltry, some
 of them exchange them for goods, others re-
quire money. The women bring sugar, which
 is generally neatly packed in a square box made
 of bark, containing about fifty pounds. It is
 made from the sugar tree. This art has long
 been known to the Indians. They make and
 use large quantities of sugar. We have seen
 very white and clear looking sugar of their manu-
facture. 4th. Rode about two miles up the St. Mary's
 river and viewed the remains of old Indian
 houses, also the fields on which they cultivated
 corn, where the corn hills are still discernible.
 We also observed large numbers of Indian graves.
 These are now discernible only by the sunken
 cavities in the surface of the earth. In the
 course of our route we have seen many Indian
 graves of more recent date. They bury their 
 dead about three feet below the surface of the
 earth; and over the grave they either place a
 heap of stones or a pen of logs. If the de-
ceased has been a person of distinction, they
 plant posts at the head and foot which they orna-
ment very curiously. In a review of the many circumstantial evi-
dences which have fallen under our observation
 of the former population of this western world,
 I am ready to adopt the expressions of pious
 author: Where is the dust that hath not been alive!
The spade, the plough, disturb our ancestors;
 From human mould we reap our daily bread.
 Young 's Night Thoughts. 4th month 5th. Spent the day with Captain
 Wells. We walked with him up the St. Joseph's
 river, and were shown the ground upon which
 the Indians under the command of the Little
 Turtle defeated a part of the United States army
 under General Harmar , killing 300 out 500
 men. We also followed for a considerable dis-
tance the route which the soldiers took in their
 retreat, and saw many of their bones. Amongst
 these were skulls which had marks of the
 tomahawk and scalping knife. Many of them
 had fallen on the east bank of the river, and
 also within the river. The Indians being sta-
tioned behind trees on the west side shot them
 in their attempt to get across. We were shown the tree behind which the
 Little Turtle took his station, as also a tree near
 it behind which his nephew fell. This was a
 second defeat, the United States troops having
 been routed the day before on Eel river. 6th. Spent the day in the neighborhood of
 Fort Wayne, in the course of which we visited
 Captain Whipple . This afternoon several In-
dians from different tribes arrived, bringing
 with them skins and furs. These are mostly
 brought by the women upon their backs, the
 men thinking it sufficient to carry their guns
 and hunting equipments. We saw this evening a white woman, who,
 when a small girl, had been taken captive, and
 has ever since lived amongst the Pottowatamy
 tribe of Indians. She tells us (through an in-
terpreter) that she has no knowledge of the
 part of the country from which she was taken,
 nor of her family. That she remembers her name
 was Dolly, which is the only distinct recollec-
tion she retains of herself previous to her cap-
tivity. This woman is dressed in Indian habit,
 is painted after the Indian order, and has so
 effectually adopted Indian manners, that a nice
 observer would not discover from external ob-
servation her origin, except from the color of
 her eyes, which are grey. 7th. Visited William Wells , and rode with
 him up the St. Mary's about five miles. On
 our way we passed several sugar camps, at which
 were Indian women and children who were em-
ployed in making sugar. Their huts were large,
 and covered with the bark of the Buck Eye
 wood. Their troughs for catching the sugar
 water as it is called, are made of the bark of the
 red elm, they are made thin, and the ends tied
 together. We were shown the places where
 stood the houses of several distinguished char-
acters amongst the Indians. Captain Wells also
 took us to the ground, where the Little Turtle 
 reviewed his men, and gave them their orders
 before going against the army of General St.
 Clair. It is an extensive plain near the river.
Wells was then one of the number, and says the
Little Turtle had one thousand four hundred
 men; St. Clair's army consisted of a much larger
 number, and were about fifty miles distant at
 the time. The Little Turtle divided his men
 into bands or messes, to each mess twenty men.
 It was the business of four of this number alter-
nately to hunt for provisions. At 12 o'clock
 each day it was the duty of the hunters to re-
turn to the army with what they had killed. By
 this regulation, his warriors were well supplied
 with provisions, during the seven day's in which
 they were advancing from this place to the field
 of battle. It is well known that at day break
 the Indians commenced an unexpected attack
 upon St. Clair's forces, killed nine hundred of
 his men, and put his whole army to flight.
Wells says, that only about thirty Indians were
 killed in the battle, and that about twenty died 
 afterwards of their wounds. He also related
 the following anecdote: A considerable altercation arose amongst the
 Indians on the review ground, relative to a
 Commander-in-Chief. Some were in favor of
 Buckangehelas , a principal chief amongst the
 Delawares, whilst others were in favor of the
 Little Turtle . At length Buckangehelas himself
 decided the controversy by yielding to the Little
 Turtle, saying that he was the youngest and most
 active man, and that he preferred him to him-
self. This reconciled the parties, and the Little
 Turtle took the command. We also rode to view a prairie which extends
 from the St. Mary's river to the Little river, a
 branch of the Wabash. The distance from one
 to the other is not more than four miles, and
 the highest ground is not more than five feet
 above the water in either river. The Indians
 say that in high freshets they have passed from
 one water to the other in their canoes. A canal
 might easily be cut here, and at a small expense,
 by which the waters of the lakes and the waters
 of the Ohio, (and of course the Mississippi)
 would be connected. An abundance of furs
 and skins taken on the waters of the Ohio and
 the Wabash, are brought up the latter river in
 boats by the Canadians and the Indians, and
 thence taken across a portage of eight miles to
 the Miami of the Lakes,* *The Maumee river. whence they are
 again conveyed by water to Detroit; goods suit-
able for the Indian trade are also transported
 back again by the same route. After spending some time in viewing the re-
mains of several old Indian towns, graves, hiero-
glyphics, &c. &c. &c., we returned to William
 Wells' house, where we dined, and in the even-
ing returned to our lodgings. 8th. Paid a visit to the carpenter and black-
smith who accompanied us as before mentioned.
 They are both at work. The blacksmith is re-
pairing Indian guns, and the carpenter is at
 work upon a council house which the govern-
ment has ordered to be built for the Indians at
 their request. The house is to be built of hewn
 logs, fifty feet in length, and twenty-five in width.
 We also amused ourselves in attending to the
 manner of packing furs and skins. Our friend
 Jonathan has several Canadians now employed
 in that business. They are packed by a ma-
chine constructed for the purpose, by which the
 work is performed expeditiously. The packs
 are made in squares of about two and a half feet,
 and contain from thirty-five to forty deer skins,
 or about two hundred raccoon skins. 9th. On the evening of this day, we received
 a message from the Little Turtle , informing us
 that the Indians had arrived, and that they
 would be ready to meet us at 10 o'clock the next
 morning. 4th mo. 10th. At 10 o'clock this morning we 
 proceeded to William Wells ', who, as we before
 observed, is interpreter for the Indians. We
 were accompanied by our friend John Johnson ,
Captain Whipple , Lieutenants Campbell and
Simms , and several other reputable persons, and
 were met by the following chiefs: O-bas-se-a, (or the Fawn,) a village chief of
 great distinction in the Miami nation. Os-so-mit , a village chief of the Pottowattamy
 nation, and brother to the Five Medals . Me-she-ke-na-que , or the Little Turtle , a war
 chief of the Miami nation. They were attended by a considerable num-
ber of their principal young men, and by several
 women. The Five Medals was not present. He had
 informed us on taking leave, that circumstances
 required him to return to his town, and that the
 distance would be too great for him to return in
 time to meet us, his infirmities occasioning him
 to travel slowly, but that he would send his
 brother, who would report to him faithfully all
 the proceedings of the council. After we had taken each other by the hand,
 the chiefs took their seats by the side of each
 other. Their principal people next seated them-
selves according to the rank or distinction which
 they held. After them, their young men in
 circular order, seat after seat,- and lastly, the
 women,- who occupied seats separate from the
 men, being placed near the centre of the room. We took our seats on the opposite side of the
 house and in front of the Indians. Being all thus seated- I speak literally, when
 I say my heart palpitated- I felt the importance
 and dignity of our mission; I wished our heads
 were wiser, and feared for the result of so in-
teresting an opportunity. After a few minutes had passed, the Little
 Turtle observed, that when we met before, they
 had informed us of the difficulty there was in
 convening the Indians at so early a period in
 the season, and that those of their people then
 present with him were all who were likely to
 attend to listen to what we had to say. We then proposed that the letter from our
 friends and brothers at home, read to the Five
 Medals and the Little Turtle at the time of our
 first meeting, should be again read for the in-
formation of our Indian brethren now attend-
ing. This proposal was deemed proper, and the
 letter was accordingly read. After a short pause, we addressed them as
 follows: Brothers and Friends: We know that the
 most of our Red Brethren are, at present, at
 their hunting and sugar camps, and did not ex-
pect to see a large number at so short a notice.
 We have, therefore, agreeably to your request,
 put upon paper the things we have to say, and
 hope you will not fail to have them communi-
 cated, when, at some future time, you may be
 more generally assembled. One of us, then standing up, read to them the
 following address: The interpreter, also standing
 between us and the Indians, interpreted our com-
munication: The Address of George Ellicott 
 and Gerard T. Hopkins , delivered to the Little
 Turtle and the Five Medals , Chiefs of the
 Miami and Pottowattamy nations of Indians, and
 others. Brothers and Friends: When we were to-
gether, eight days ago, with the Little Turtle 
 and the Five Medals , the letter was read to
 them, which has just been read. That letter,
 you observe, says that we were appointed by
 the people called Quakers, of Baltimore, to visit
 you, and to take you by the hand on their be-
half, desiring that you would receive any com-
munications from us, as coming immediately
 from them. Brothers: After that letter was read, our
 hearts were filled with so much love for our Red
 Brethren, that, on looking over and considering
 the business upon which we had come, we felt
 a desire to see as many together as could be
 convened- and this day was that agreed upon
 for us to meet you. Brothers: We believed that the things we
 had to say were of great importance to our Red
 Brethren, and therefore it was that we request-
ed to see you together, that you all might have
 an opportunity of hearing what we have to say. Brothers: Our hearts are filled with thank-
fulness to the Great Spirit, that He has
 brought us safely to the country of our Red
 Brethren, and protected us through the journey.
 We also rejoice that He has given us this oppor-
tunity of seeing you, and of taking you by the
 hand. Brothers: It is now a little more than two
 years since your Brothers of Baltimore had an
 opportunity of becoming acquainted with the
Five Medals , the Little Turtle , Tuthinipee , and
 some other chiefs. They were glad of that op-
portunity of having a talk with them, and of
 enquiring after the situation of their Red
 Brethren. Brothers: We had for some time entertain-
ed apprehensions, that the many changes which
 were taking place in circumstances, must greatly
 change the situation of our Red Brethren, and
 that the time was fast approaching, in which it
 would be necessary for them to alter their mode
 of living. Brothers: After our talk with the chiefs
 whom we have just mentioned, we were fully con-
vinced that the time was come, in which our Red
 Brethren ought to begin to cultivate their lands;
 that they ought to raise corn and other grain,
 also horses, cows, sheep, hogs, and other animals.
 We then proposed to afford them some assist-
ance. They appeared to be glad of the proposal,
 and informed that many of their people were
 disposed to turn heir attention to the cultiva-
tion of the earth. They also expressed a desire
 to be assisted by their Brothers of Baltimore. Brothers: Having been encouraged by the
 opportunity which we then had, we sent to the
 care of the Agent for Indian Affairs some ploughs,
 harness for horses, axes, hoes, and other imple-
ments of husbandry, which were made for the
 use of our Red Brethren, and desired that they
 might be distributed amongst them as tokens of
 our friendship. Brothers: We received last fall, through
 the hands of the Agent for Indian Affairs, a
 talk from the Little Turtle , the Five Medals ,
 and others, informing us that they had received
 the implements of husbandry, and requested
 that their Brothers of Baltimore would send
 some of their people into the country of their
 Red Brethren for the purpose of seing their
 situation, and showing them how to make use of
 the tools, saying they did not know how to
 begin. Brothers: It is for these purposes that we
 have now come; and we again repeat, that we
 rejoice we have the opportunity of seeing you,
 and of taking you by the hand. Brothers: In coming into the country of our
 Red Brethren, we have come with our eyes open.
 And although we are affected with sorrow, in
 believing that many of the Red Brethren suffer
 much for the want of food and for the want of
 clothing, yet our hearts have been made glad, in
 seeing that it has pleased the Great Spirit to
 give you a rich and valuable country. Because
 we know that it is out of the earth that food
 and clothing come. We are sure, brothers, that
 with but little labor and attention, you may raise
 much more corn and other grain than will be
 necessary for yourselves, your women and chil-
dren, and may also, with great ease, raise many
 more horses, cows, sheep, hogs and other valuable
 animals, than will be necessary for your own use.
 We are also confident, that if you will pursue
 our method in the cultivation of your land, you
 will live in much greater ease and plenty,
 and
 with much less fatigue and toil, than attend
 hunting, for a subsistence. Brothers: We are fully convinced, that if
 you will adopt our mode of cultivating the earth,
 and of raising useful animals, you will find it to
 be a mode of living, not only far more plentiful
 and much less fatiguing, but also much more
 certain, and which will expose your bodies less
 to the inclemencies of the weather than is now
 attendant upon hunting. It will lead you,
 brothers, to have fixed homes. You will build
 comfortable dwelling-houses for yourselves, your
 women and children, where you may be shelter-
ed from the rain, from the frost, and from the
 snow, and where you may enjoy in plenty the
 rewards of your labors. Brothers: In laying these things before
 you, we have no other motive than a desire of
 heart for the improvement, the benefit and the
 welfare of our Red Brethren- and therefore it
 is that we speak with freedom, and we hope,
 that what we have to say, will go in at one ear,
 and not come out the other, but that it will be
 remembered by our Red Brethren. For we
 know, brothers, that we shall not be ashamed of
 what we say, when, in time to come, you com-
pare the things we are saying to you with your
 experience in practising them. Brothers: We will here mention, that the
 time was, when the forefathers of your brothers,
 the white people, lived beyond the great water,
 in the same manner that our Red Brethren now
 live. The winters can yet be counted when
 they went almost naked, when they procured their
 living by fishing, and by the bow and arrow in
 hunting- and when they lived in houses no bet-
ter than yours. They were encouraged by some
 who came from the sun-rising, and lived amongst
 them, to change their mode of living. They
 did change- they cultivated the earth, and we
 are sure the change was a happy one. Brothers and Friends: We are not ashamed
 to acknowledge that the time was when our fore-
fathers rejoiced at finding a wild plumb tree, or
 at killing a little game, and that they wandered
 up and down, living on the uncertain supplies
 of fishing and hunting. But, brothers, for your 
 encouragement, we now mention that, by turn-
ing their attention to the cultivation of the
 earth, instead of the plumb tree, they soon had
 orchards of many kinds of good fruits- instead
 of wild game, they soon had large numbers of
 cattle, horses, sheep, hogs, and other valuable
 animals,- and in many places, instead of their
 forests, they had large fields of corn and other
 grain, as also many other valuable productions
 of the earth. Brothers: We hope your eyes will be open
 to see clearly, the things which are best for you,
 and that you will desire to pursue them. We
 believe, brothers, that it is in the heart of your
 father, the President of the United States, to
 assist his red children in the cultivation of the
 earth, and to render them services which will be
 greatly for their benefit and welfare. We hope
 that your exertions to change your present mode
 of living will be so plain to him, that he will
 see them. This will encourage him to continue
 to aid you, in your endeavors. Brothers, we have spoken plainly; we de-
sire to speak plainly. We will now tell you
 that we have not come merely to talk to you.
 We have come prepared to render you a little
 assistance. Our beloved brother, Philip Dennis ,
 who is now present, has come along with us.
 His desire is to cultivate for you a field of corn;
 also, to show you how to raise some of the other
 productions of the earth. He knows how to use
 the plough, the hoe, the axe, and other imple-
ments of husbandry. Brothers, we here ask you, are you still de-
sirous to be instructed by us, in the cultivation
 of your lands? If you say you are, our brother,
 whom we have just mentioned, will continue
 with you during the summer. We shall leave
 it to you to show him the spot where to begin
 to work. Brothers, he has left a farm, he has left a
 wife, and five small children, who are very dear
 to him; he has come from a sincere desire to be
 useful to our red brothers. His motives are
 pure, he will ask no reward from you, for his
 services, his greatest reward will be in the satis-
faction he will feel in finding you inclined to
 take hold of the same tools which he takes hold
 of, to receive from him instruction in the culti-
vation of your lands, and to pursue the example
 he will set you. Brothers, we hope you will make the situa-
tion of our brother as comfortable as circum-
stances will admit. We hope, also, that many
 of your young men will be willing to be taught
 by him, to use the plough, the hoe, and other
 implements of husbandry. For we are sure,
 brothers, that as you take hold of such tools as
 are in the hands of the white people, you will
 find them to be to you like having additional
 hands. You will also find that by using them,
 they will enable you to do many things which,
 without them, cannot be performed. Brothers, there is one thing more which we
 wish to add. The white people, in order to get
 their land cultivated, find it necessary that their
 young men should be employed in it, and not
 their women. Women are less than men. They
 are not as strong as men. They are not as able
 to endure fatigue as men. It is the business of
 our women to be employed in our houses, to
 keep them clean, to sew, to knit, spin, and
 weave, to dress food for themselves and families,
 to make clothes for the men and the rest of their
 families, to keep the clothes of their families
 clean, and to take care of their children. Brothers, we desire not to mention too many
 things to you, but we must add a little further.
 We are fully convinced that if you will turn your
 attention to the cultivation of the earth, to rais-
ing the different kinds of grain, to erecting mills
 for grinding grain, to building comfortable dwell-
ing houses for your families, to raising useful
 animals- amongst others, sheep, for the advan-
tage of the wool, in making clothing- to raising
 flax and hemp for your linen; and your young
 women learn to spin and weave, that your lives
 would be easier and happier than at present,
 and that your numbers will increase, and not
 continue to diminish. As we observed,
 brothers, your land is good. It is far better
 than the land the white people near the great
 water cultivate. We are persuaded that your
 land will produce double the quantity of any
 kind of grain, or of flax, or of hemp, with the
 same labor necessary near the great water. Brothers and Friends: We shall now end
 what we have to say, with informing you that
all the corn, and other productions of the earth,
 which Philip Dennis may raise, we wish our
 red brethren to accept of, as a token of our
 friendship. And it is our desire that the chiefs
 of Pottowatamy and Miami nations, who
 are now present, added to our brothers, the Five
 Medals, Tuthenipee , and Philip Dennis , make
 such a distribution thereof as they may think
 proper. * The address was published in pamphlet form in
 Baltimore, by the Indian Committee in 1804, and also
 appeared in the newspapers of the period, and was
 much commended for its earnest and enlightened
 simplicity. T. The Indians observed great gravity and de-
corum, during the time of our addressing them,
 and seemed to reiterate the sentiments delivered
 by repeated shouts. At the close of our communication, a short
 pause took place, during which we informed
 them that we had no more to add at present,
 but wished them to speak freely. After which
 a conversation, occupying several minutes took
 place between the chiefs, and some of their
 principal men, which being in the Indian lan-
guage was to us unintelligible. They then rose
 upon their feet, and shook hands with us with
 great solemnity, and returned to their
 seats. In a few moments the Little Turtle arose and
 delivered the following speech, which one of us* Gerard Hopkins , who was a fine short hand
 writer. T.
 wrote in short hand, from the mouth of the In-
terpreter. Brothers, it appears to me to be necessary
 that I should give you an immediate answer, as
 you are about to return to your families from
 whence you came. My Brothers and Friends, we are all pleased
 to see you here, and to take our brothers, the
 Quakers, through you by the hand. We re-
joice that the Great Spirit has appointed that
 we should this day meet. For we believe, that
 this meeting will be of the utmost consequence
 to your red brethren. Brothers, what you have said, we have care-
fully gathered up, we have placed it in our hearts,
 in order that it may be communicated to our
 posterity. We are convinced that what you
 have said is for the good of your red brethren.
 We are also convinced that our chiefs and war-
riors, our women and children will be all of our 
 opinion, and will be glad when they have heard
 what you have said. Brothers, we take you now by the hand, and
 through you we take the people who sent you
 here by the hand, and assure you we are pleased
 that the Great Spirit has let us see each other,
 and converse together upon the subjects which
 you have communicated to us. Brothers, you see there is not a large num-
ber of us here. What you have said to us will
 not remain with those who are here alone. It
 will be communicated to all your red brethren
 in this country. And I again repeat, that I am
 convinced they will be glad to hear what you
 have said to us, to our women and children. Brothers, when we saw you with the rest of
 our brothers in Baltimore, upwards of two years
 ago, I expect you recollect perfectly the conver-
sation between us at that time and place. I,
 there with my brother chiefs, told you that we
 were glad to find you so much disposed to assist
 us, our women and children. We told you that
 your good wished should be made known to all
 your red brethren in this country, which has
 been done. Brothers, ever since that time, I, as well as
 some others of my brother chiefs, have been en-
deavoring to turn the minds of our people to-
wards the cultivation of the earth, but I am
 sorry to say we have not yet been able to effect
 any thing. Brothers, there are so few of our chiefs now
 present, it would not be proper for us to under-
take to give a pointed answer to your talk. We
 expect that in a few moons there will be many
 of our people together. At that time it will be
 proper that we should return an answer to all
 the subjects you now mention to us. Brothers, the things you have said to us re-
quire the greatest attention. It appears to me
 to be really necessary to deliberate upon them.
 In order to do so, we must beg to leave the paper
 upon which they are written, that we may com-
municate them to our chiefs when they assemble. Brothers, all the words which you have said
 to-day were certainly calculated for our good.
 You have enumerated to us the different kinds
 of grain and animals we ought to raise for our
 comfort. You have told us that if we all adopt
 the plan you have proposed, we should want for
 nothing. This, brothers, myself and many of our
 people believe is true, and we hope we shall
 finally be able to convince our young men that
 this is the plan we ought to adopt to get our
 living. Brothers, you have come a long distance to
 render service to us. We hope that you will
 meet with the success you wish, you have been
 very particular in pointing out to us what will
 be for our good. You have also been very par-
ticular in pointing out to us the duties of our
 women, and you have told us that in adopting
 your mode of living, our numbers would increase
 and not diminish. In all this I perfectly agree
 with you. And I hope the other chiefs will
 also agree with you. Brothers, we are pleased to hear you say
 you are going to leave one of your brothers with
 us, to show us in what manner you cultivate the
 earth. We shall endeavor, brothers, to make
 his situation amongst us as agreeable to him as
 will be possible for us. Brothers, we are convinced that the plan
 you propose will be highly advantageous to your
 red brethren. We are also convinced that you
 have observed very justly that we shall not then
 be liable to sickness. We are certain that we
 shall then be able to make a more comfortable
 living with less labor than at present. And I
 hope that this will be the opinion of us all. Brothers, assure your people who sent you
 here, tell your old chiefs that we are obliged to
 them for their friendly offers to assist us in
 changing our present mode of living; tell them
 that it is a work which cannot be done immediate-
ly,- that we are that way disposed, and we hope
 it will take place gradually. Here the speaker sat down for a short time,
 and then rose again, saying, Brothers, my heart is so overjoyed and
 warmed with what you have said, that I find I
 had forgot to mention one of the most important
 things. Brothers, at the time we first met at this
 place, the Five Medals and myself formed some
 idea of your business. We expected you had
 come to do for us the things you had proposed
 to us when in Baltimore. We consulted each
 other upon the answer necessary to return to
 you in every respect, and I now find that our
 idea was right. Brothers, the sentiments which I have de-
livered to you were his sentiments. You have
 now told us, that your brother has a mind to
 live amongst us to show us how to cultivate the
 earth, and have desired us to show him the spot
 where to begin. We agreed then, that he should
 be at neither of our villages, lest our younger
 brothers should be jealous of our taking him to
 ourselves. We have determined to place him
 on the Waash, where some of our families will
 follow him,-where our young men I hope will
 flock to him, and where he will be able to in-
struct them as he wished. This is all I have to
 say. I could all day repeat the sentiments I
 have already expressed; also how much I have
 been gratified in seeing and hearing my brothers;
 but that is not necessary. I am sorry, brothers,
 that the chiefs of our country are not all present,
 that they might all hear what you have said, and
 have an opportunity of talking to you. At the close of this speech we were informed
 that nothing would be added by the Indians to
 the communication made by the Little Turtle .
 We then told them that the words spoken by
 the Little Turtle should be carefully carried
 home to our brothers and friends who had sent
 us. We also informed them that notwithstanding
 we were now desirous to return to our homes as
 soon as possible, yet we wished to see the place
 which they designed to be the station of our
 brother, Philip Dennis , and hoped some of them
 would show it to us. We further added, that
 this did not arise from any jealousy in our
 minds that the place fixed upon was not suitable.
 On the contrary, we had no doubt that they had
 judged wisely; but that the love and respect
 which we bore to our brother, led us to desire to
 bear him company to the place, and also to ren-
der him every assistance in our power before we
 left him. They then informed us that they would con-
sult and fix upon some one to go with us. The
 business of the council being then at an end, we
 in turn rose from our seats, and shook hands
 with them, which concluded the formalities of
 the opportunity. After entering into a little
 conversation, we told them we should now bid
 them farewell, as we expected we should not see
 them again. They then took us separately by
 the hand, and with marks of great affection and
 friendship bade us farewell, and we returned to
 our quarters. 4th month 12th. Being a fine pleasant morn-
ing we set out for the place on the Wabash as-
signed by the Indians to Philip Dennis . We
 were accompanied by Wiliam Wells and Mas-
sanonga, (or Clear Sky,) a handsome young man
 of the Wea tribe, deputed by the Indians to
 pilot us, who (by the bye) says he shall be the
 first young man to take hold of Philip Dennis '
 plough. After riding eight miles, we came to the place
 called the Portage, on the Little river, a navigable
 water of the Wabash. Then down the margin
 of the river, leaving it to our left. At the end
 of four miles, crossed Sandy Creek, another navi-
gable water of the Wabash; then proceeded
 through the woods, and at the end of thirteen
 miles further again came to Little river, at a
 place called the Saddle. This name is derived
 from a large rock in the bed of the river in the
 shape of a saddle. From the Saddle we pro-
ceeded six miles along the margin of the river
 to its junction with the Wabash. The bed of the Wabash here is of limestone.
 After riding five miles further, we came to a
 vein of land about one mile in width, the sur-
face of which is covered with small flint stones,
 and which we are told extends for several miles.
On examining these flints, we found them of
 excellent quality. Here the Indians supply themselves with flints
 for their guns and for other purposes, and here
 formerly they procured their darts. It has cer-
tainly been a place abundantly resorted to from
 time immemorial. This is evident from the sur-
face of the ground being dug in holes of two and
 three feet in depth, over nearly the whole tract.
 This flinty vein is called by the Indians Father
 Flint. They have a tradition concerning its
 origin which is very incredible. From this we
 proceeded, and after riding two miles, reached
 the place proposed by the Indians. This place is thirty-two miles rather south of
 west from Fort Wayne, and is situated on the
 Wabash, at a place called the Boat-yard, which
 name it obtained from the circumstance of
 General Wilkinson having built some flat,
 bottomed boats here, for the purpose of tran-
sporting some of the baggage of the American
 troops down the river. It was formerly the seat
 of an Indian town of the Delawares, and we are
 pleased to find there are about twenty-five acres
 of land clear. The Wabash here makes a beau-
tiful appearance, and is about sixty yards wide.
 A little above is an island in the river, on one
 side of which the water runs with a strong cur-
rent, and affords a good mill seat. We viewed
 the land in this neighborhood for a considerable
 distance, and found it high and of superior
 quality, being covered with sugar trees of enor-
mous size, black walnut, white walnut, hack-
berry, blue ash, oak buckeye trees, &c., all very
 large. The land appears to be equal in quality
 to any we have seen, not excepting the bottoms
 of the Scioto and Paint Creek. About half a
 mile below, a handsome creek falls into the river
 from the north, which we traced for a consider-
able distance, and are convinced it affords a good
 mill seat. This creek bearing no name, we called
 it Dennis' Creek in honor of Philip Dennis . As night approached, Massanonga , taking his
 knife, left us, and in about fifteen minutes re-
turned with a remarkably fine turkey. This he
 prepared and roasted for us in a very nice and
 expeditious manner, on which we fared sumptu-
ously. At 9 o'clock we wrapped ourselves in
 our blankets, and laid down to sleep before the
 fire, having no shelter. The night was frosty;
 we, however, slept tolerably and took no cold. In the night the otters were very noisy along
 the river, the deer also approached our fire and
 made a whistling noise; the wolves howled, and
 at the dawn of day turkies gobbled in all direct-
tions. 13th. Early this morning we arose, and
 breakfasted on the remains of the turkey cooked
 last evening, after which we fixed upon the place
 for Philip Dennis ' farm; we also staked out the
 situation for his wigwam, which is about one
 hundred feet from the banks of the Wabash, and
 opposite to a fine spring of excellent water issuing
 out of the bank of the river. We are told by several persons well acquainted
 with the country, that from hence to St. Vin-
cennes, on the Wabash, a distance of two hun-
dred miles by land, and three hundred and fifty
 by water, the land on both sides of the river
 embracing a very extensive width, is not inferior
 to the description given of this location in yes-
terday's notes. At Mississinaway, a large Indian town of the
 Miami's, situated about thirty miles below us,
 on the Wabash, stone coal is found, which with
 limestone continues for two hundred miles down
 the river. There are no Indians between this and Fort
 Wayne, neither any between this and Mississin-
away. Philip Dennis' nearest neighbors will be
 at the Little Turtle's town, eighteen miles dis-
tant. Whilst here we have seen four peroques
 loaded with peltry, manned by Canadians and In-
dians, on their way up the river to be tran-
sported to Detroit. I may here observe that the Wabash affords
 an abundance of large turtles, called soft shelled
 turtles, the outer coat being a hard skin, rather
 than a shell. They are esteemed excellent food.
 It affords a great variety of fine fish, and
 we saw ducks in abundance; we are told it is re-
sorted to by geese and swans. About 8 o'clock in the morning we set out
 for Fort Wayne, where we arrived about 3 o'clock
 in the afternoon, and after dining with William
 Wells returned to our lodgings. 14th. I may here observe that some days ago
 we came to a conclusion to return home by the
 way of the lakes; to this we have been induced
 from a hope that we shall be subjected to fewer
 difficulties and much less fatigue than to retrace
 the way by which we came; and I may also
 add, that we have been encouraged to this by
 the advice of our kind friends heretofore named,
 who have with much apparent cheefulness
 offered to prepare a way for us; and this morn-
ing being informed by our worthy friend, Cap-
tain Whipple, that the boat intended for us
 would be in readiness against to-morrow, we
 spent the day in making preparations, and in
 writing to our families. 15th. This morning we bade both a joyful
 and sorrowful farewell to Philip Dennis , and
 the two young men who accompanied us out.
 We also took leave of those generally with whom
 we had formed an acquaintance, first breakfast-
ing with Captain Whipple , whose hearty kind-
ness to us has been so often repeated, that his
 name will deservedly claim a place in our re-
membrance. He has fitted out a perogue for us
 and manned it with a corporal and private
 soldier from the fort; and, joined by John John-
son and William Wells , has stocked it with an
 apparent superabundant supply both for eating
 and drinking. About 8 o'clock we embarked for Detroit, pro-
ceeded about thirty miles down the Miami of the
 lakes, and in the evening encamped under a tent
 near the margin of the river. With respect to
 the appearance of the country, the same old
 phrase must be continued; land of excellent
 quality. We several times went ashore to view
 the river bottoms, they were extensive and ap-
peared to be first rate land. The timber, buck
 eye, ash, elm, sugar tree, oak, hickory, black
 and white walnut, &c. We saw ducks in abun-
dance, and Corporal King says they breed here
 in great numbers. This river affords a variety
 of fine fish, and mostly of descriptions very dif-
ferent from those found in our salt waters. Of
 these the following are some of the names;
 black, yellow, and white bass, covers, pickerel,
 suckers, herrings, muscanago, gar, pike, catfish,
 sheeps-head, carp, and sturgeon. These are all
 caught with the hook except the two last. The sturgeon are now on their way from the
 lake to the head waters of the St. Joseph's and
 St. Mary's rivers. In company with the Little
 Turtle, our friends, John Johnson , William
 Wells, and some others, whilst at Fort Wayne,
 the conversation turned upon fish, and the then
 running up of the sturgeon; the Little Turtle 
 very humorously proposed to Johnson a project,
 which was to join in building a stone dam at the
 junction of the two rivers, to prevent the sturgeon
 from getting back again to the lake, and then said
 he you and I will live on them this summer. We observed to-day (15th,) several hunting
 and sugar camps, and went on shore to visit two
 of the latter. The camps were well supplied
 with jerk venison, dried raccoon, sturgeon, &c.;
 one man only was at the camp, and he was em-
ployed with his knife in making a paddle for his
 canoe. A squaw was knitting a bag, and an-
other was preparing the bark of the buckeye for
 thread, strings, &c., by beating it with a piece
 of wood. We saw amongst them several fat and
 healthy looking children, who were playful and
 did not appear to be afraid of us. The children
 presented us with a quarter of fresh venison, for
 which we returned them some salt meat and bis-
cuit, with which they were pleased. Here we
 saw a child about six months old fixed to a board
 in the genuine Indian fashion. The board was
 straight, about fifteen inches in width, and two
 and a half feet in length, having at its head a
 circular handle, and at the foot a small ledge
 To this the child was lashed by cloth bandages,
 and so tight that it could not move hand or foot.
 The board was placed against a tree, almost per-
pendicularly, and the infant asleep- of course in
 a standing position. The child was painted very
 red, and had silver bandages about its wrists,
 and ornaments of the same metal in its ears.
 The Indians are very fond of their children, and
 put about them very costly silver ornaments. I have seen Indian children dressed in a calico
 frock which was stuck with silver broaches from
 neck to heel, besides ornaments on the wrists,
 in the ear, and about the neck and head. 4th month 16th. Proceeded very pleasantly
 down the river about fifty miles, and at night
 encamped under our tent. In the evening a
 severe thunder gust came on, with heavy rain,
 which continued for several hours after night,
 but having a good tent we did not get much
 wetted. In the course of the day we saw wild
 fowl in abundance, also passed by several Indian
 hunting and sugar camps. Our Corporal is very
 fond of saluting the camps with an imitation of
 an Indian whoop, which they are sure to answer
 by a similar not. This whoop very nearly re-
sembles the shrill yelp of a dog. The land ap-
pears to be of an excellent quality, and deer and
 turkies are very numerous. Here also
 The prowling wolf howls hideous all night long,
 And owls vociferate the dread response. 17th. Proceeded about thirty-five miles, and at
 night encamped under our tent. We have been
 entertained to-day with a diversified scene. The
 river covered with wild fowl, fish jumping up
 around us, and turkies flying. We stopped a short time to view the remains
 of Fort Defiance. This fort was built by Gene-
ral Wayne, in the course of his march to attack
 the Indians. The situation is very beautiful and
 commanding, at the junction of the river Great
 Au Glaize with the Miami. The two rivers
 make a large body of water, the width being
 about two hundred yards. A Canadian trader
 only resides here. We also went on shore several
 times to visit Indian towns and camps. Great
 numbers of Indians are settled upon the banks
 of the Miami; they are chiefly of the Ottoway
 and Shawnese tribes. They appeared pleased
 at receiving visitors. Their children were very
 antic, and seemed to leap for joy on seeing us
 land; doubtless from a hope of receiving some
 presents. The hunters are returning to their
 towns, and many of their wigwams are stocked
 with peltry, dried raccoon, and jerk venison.
 They are on their way to the foot of the rapids.
 The women are mostly employed in knitting
 bags and belts and in making moccasins. A
 considerable number of Indians are on the river
 in bark canoes loaded with peltry. They are on
 the way to the foot of the rapids and other places
 for the purpose of exchanging their peltry with
 the traders for goods. Most of the wigwams we
 have seen to-day are covered with rushes sewed
 together, which are procured from the shores of
 Lake Erie, and so put together, that the covering
 will turn any fall of rain. An Indian house is
 constructed by putting two forks into the ground,
 and a horizontal piece from one fork to the
 other. Upon this piece rest long pieces of bark,
 with the other end upon the earth at a conveni-
ent distance, thus sheltering them from the
 weather. Sometimes they make circular wig-
wams, by putting small saplings into the ground
 in circular order, then bringing the other ends
 to a point, they tie them together. These they
 either cover with bark or with the rush mats
 before described. To-day we passed a place called Girty's town,
 noted for the former residence of Simon Girty . 18th. Proceeded about thirty-three miles. In
 the earlier part of the day we passed several
 creeks and small streams, and at length reached
 what is called the head of the rapids. The river is
 here about four hundred yards wide. The noise
 of the falls informed us of our approach, long be-
lieve that our peroque was manned by careful
 hands, we resolutely entered the rapids and de-
scended with great velocity down the fall for the
 distance of eighteen miles to the foot of the
 rapids. The whole of this distance is a continued
 fall, the land falling with the same regularity,
 and generally elevated but a few feet above the
 surface of the water. It is needless to say that
 we went swiftly down, when I add, that it is a
 trip occupying but one hour and a half. The bed of the river is a solid limestone rock,
At the foot of the Rapids we lodged all night at
 the house of a Canadian trader, who treated us
 with great respect, and, though a tavern-keeper,
 would receive no pay from us for our supper,
 lodgings, or breakfast. A considerable encamp-
ment of Indians, who had come to trade with
 him was near his house. They were very merry
 for a great part of the night, keeping up a con-
tinued sound of their favorite instruments of
 music, amongst them the drum and fife. The
 former is made of part of the body of a hollow
 tree, with the ends covered with deer skin, upon
 which they beat with sticks, the latter they
 make of reed into which they bore holes some-
what in imitation of a fife. The foot of the
 Rapids is rendered well known in American his-
tory, as having been a place of frequent ren-
dezvous by the Indians, previous to their defeat
 by General Wayne . Here also the Indians burnt
 many of the white men who were taken prisoners
 by them. To this place Wayne marched, and
 here he met and defeated the Indian army. About eight miles above the foot of the Rapids
 and near the centre of the river, in a very rapid
 situation, is a noted rock called by the Cana-
dians, Rochede Bout, (or standing rock.) This
 rock is about thirty feet in height above the
 surface of the water, and the same in diameter.
 The top has the regular appearance of the roof
 of a house, and the body of the rock is circular.
 Its appearance is additionally handsome from
 the circumstance of the roof, as it is called, being
 covered with cedar. Fish are now passing up the Rapids in great
 numbers from the lakes, in so much that the water
 smells strongly of them. They are taken very
 abundantly by the Canadians and Indians. The
 fisherman without seeing them strikes his barbed
 spear to the rocks, which often passes through
 several at a time, and frequently of different
 kinds. The muscanonje are taken here in great
 numbers; they are a fish from three to five feet in
 length. 19th. This morning we proceeded with diffi-
culty ten miles; owing to high winds, and a rain
coming on, prudence seemed to dictate that we
 should put into a harbor, which we did at the
 mouth of Swan creek, where is a small fort and
 garrison lately established by the United States.
 Introductory letters were given us at Fort
 Wayne, to Lieutenant Rhea , the Commandant,
 which we delivered. He treated us with respect,
 and with him we spent the remainder of the day
 and lodged. On our way we stopped to view an
 old fort, called Fort Miami, which was garrisoned
 by the British at the time Wayne defeated the
 Indians. Many Indian villages and wigwams are seated
 on both shores of the river, and many Canadian
 traders are to be found residing amongst them.
 They have generally intermarried with the In-
dians, and adopted their manners. Some of the
 Indian houses which we passed to-day are built
 of small round logs, and are roofed with bark.
 Near the mouth of Swan creek is an extensive
 valley of which we took a particular view. Here
 the Indians placed their wives and children at
 the time they agreed to make battle with Gene-
ral Wayne. The river increases in width from the foot of
 the Rapids toward the lake. It is more than
 half a mile wide opposite Swan creek, and at
 present has the appearance of tide water; a
 strong east wind having brought a heavy swell
 from the lake, which has in a short time raised
 the river more than three feet in perpendicular
 height. We saw to-day geese and swans in
 great abundance. 20th. This morning notwithstanding the very
 unfavorable appearance of the weather, it being
 rainy and wind high, we again proceeded.
 At the end of three miles we reached the mouth
 of the river, where we entered a beautiful circu-
lar bay, about six miles in diameter, called Miami
 bay.* Now called Maumee Bay. The wind continuing high, we proceeded
 along the margin of the bay, for about ten miles
 to a point called Bay Point. This is the ex-
treme point of land, between Miami Bay and
 Lake Erie. We attempted to turn the point in
 order to enter the lake, but the situation being
 bleak and the wind high, occasioned a heavy
 swell, and apprehending danger, we thought it
 most advisable, however reluctantly, to put to
 shore and encamp. The shore of that part of the bay which we
 have passed, as also of the lake now in view, is
 elevated but a little above the surface of the
 water. The country is level and appears rich.
 The bay is resorted to by vast numbers of wild
 fowl. 21st. The last night has been very stormy and
 rainy. Our tent, though a good, one did not
 shelter us altogether from the rain. The high
 swells in the course of the night, breaking over
 our peroque, filled and sunk her, which has oc-
casioned our men much labor and difficulty. And
 during this day the storm continuing, we have
 been obliged to remain under our tent. 22d. About midnight the clouds dispersing,
 wind becoming calm, and the moon shining very
 refulgently, we were encouraged again to embark,
 notwithstanding a considerable agitation of the
 lake from the storm, and were successful enough
 to turn Bay Point, after which we proceeded
 without difficulty to Point Raisin, near the mouth
 of the river Raisin, (or Grape river,) making a
 distance of about twelve miles, when the wind
 rising we made an unsuccessful attempt to get
 round the Point, and were again obliged to seek
 a harbor and wait for a calm. Shortly after we
 had put into harbor a fish approached the shore
 very near to us and seemed to be at play. One
 of our men advanced toward it very cautiously,
 and with an oar, gave it a blow upon the tail,
 which so disabled it that he caught it. We
 found it to be a muscanonje, measuring four feet
 two inches in length and proportionally thick.
 The muscanonje is from head to tail very beau-
tifully spotted, and is I think not inferior to any
 fish I ever tasted. For several days past we have been not a little
 mortified at being confined to a harbor, whilst
 the Indians are passing us very frequently in
 their bark canoes. It is astonishing to see these
 canoes riding large swells without danger. It is
 certain that they will ride waves whose height
 exceeds their length. Many of the bark canoes of the Indians have
 fallen under our observation. They are gene-
rally made of the bark of the birch tree, and
 shaped differently. We have seen bark canoes
 loaded with two thousand five hundred weight,
 which were so light that two men could carry
 them on their shoulders with great ease. The
 construction of the smaller description of these
 boats is so simple, that in an hour they will
 have a canoe made which will carry several per-
sons across their rivers. We have also seen many
 of their rafts. These are made for crossing
 rivers at those seasons of the year when it is not
 easy to strip the bark from the trees. In all the
 river bottoms the buckeye wood is to be found.
 This they prefer for making a raft, on account
 of its lightness when dried, it being a wood nearly
 as light as cork. The Indians tie together small
 logs of the buckeye wood, to form a square of
 about five or six feet, this they cross by pieces
 of any other description of wood, confining piece
 to piece by bark strings, splits of hoop ash, &c.
 Upon a raft of this description, three or four
 persons will cross their rivers even though the
 currenthe against them. We had not been long in harbor, before our
 anxiety to proceed exceeded our patience, and
 observing in view at an apparent distance of one
 and a half to two miles from us, about fifty
 houses resembling a village, we concluded to
 abandon our peroque, walk to the settlement,
 and then endeavor to procure horses to take us
 to Detroit. At 11 o'clock this morning we set out for this
 purpose, followed by our men with our baggage
 on their backs, and after walking over a wet
 prairie, through mud and water, half a leg and
 more in depth, for the distance of nearly six
 miles, we reached the place. Viewing this set-
tlement from the lake, and over a tract so level
 that the elevation between it and us did not ex-
ceed two feet, occasioned us to be so greatly de-
ceived in the distance. On arriving we found
 that, instead of a village, it was a settlement of
 French farmers situated along the river Raisin,
 and presenting a very beautiful scene. The
 farms contain from sixty to eighty acres, laid off
 in parallelograms. The buildings are good, and
 the gardens and orchards handsome. We un-
derstand that about two miles higher up the river
 there is another settlement composed of about
 forty families, and upon Otter Creek, about four
 miles distant, a third settlement containing about
 thirty families. These people are Roman Ca-
tholics. We were soon informed that the dis-
tance from here to Detroit was thirty-six miles
 by land, and that the road passed through so flat
 and wet a country, for the greater part of the
 way, that at this season of the year, it was almost
 impossible to travel it on horseback, and were
 advised to wait on the wind for a passage by water.
 We, therefore, concluded to take lodgings at
 the house of John Bedient , who has offered to
 entertain us, and dispatched our men to the boat,
 with instructions to come up the river Raisin for
 us, as soon as wind and weather permitted; being
 so wearied and overcome with our "Jack-o-Lan-
tern" excursion, that we could not consent to
 retrace our steps to the boat. 23d. A strong west wind, attended with heavy
 rain last night and this day, have prevented our
 men from getting to us. It is a fact well-known
 here, that northwest and west winds are as certain
 to produce cloudy weather as easterly winds with
 us. This is doubtless owing to the humidity of
 the vast western lakes. The same winds are
 severely cold in winter, no doubt from the im-
mense bodies of ice then accumulated upon those
 lakes. 24th. This morning our men arrived about 8
 o'clock, with the peroque, the wind having abated
 and weather fair. We again embarked, and
 on our way down the river Raisin were amused
 with the great numbers of wild geese, which
 were at play in the ponds near the margin of the
 river. They feed here so undisturbedly, that
 though we were within gun shot of them, they
 took but little notice of us. We again entered
 the lake, and encouraged our men to make the
 best of its smooth surface. They proceeded with
 great industry, and at night we reached a Wyan-
dot town, called Brown's town, making a distance
 of about thirty miles. Here we concluded to
 lodge at the house of William Walker , who is
 interpreter for those of the Wyandot nation who
 are settled on this side of the lake. He is
 married to an Indian woman who speaks good
 English, and is very conversible. She gave us
 for supper bacon, bear's meat, and eggs fried,
 also a dish of tea. Brownstown is situated at the mouth of the
 Detroit river, and on the American side. The
 river Detroit is a vast body of running water.
 Its mouth is two miles in width, and the water
 passes out of it into the lake with a strong cur-
rent. Its channel is wide, generally ten fathoms
 in depth, and in many places much deeper. The
 name Detroit river is a corruption. Detroit, a
 French word, signifies the Strait, a name much
 more appropos, it being but an outlet from the
 waters of the western lakes to Lake Erie. 25th. This morning our curiosity led us to
 take a view of Brownstown. The village contains
 about one hundred houses, which are generally
 built of small round logs, and roofed with elm
 bark. These Indians cultivate a considerable
 quantity of corn, and their fields are enclosed
 with rails of their own splitting. We saw a
 sample of the wheat which they had raised the
 last season, which looked well. They have gar-
dens and a considerable number of fruit trees.
 They have a small number of cattle, and raise a
 large number of hogs. The interpreter says they
 are greatly disposed to civilization, and have re-
quested of the United States to furnish them
 this year with cattle, instead of goods or money
 for their annuity. After taking breakfast, we again embarked
 and proceeded up the river Detroit, passing by
 another Indian town called Walk-in-the-Water
 village, a name derived from the principal chief
 of the settlement. The village contains about
 twenty houses, and bears the same civilized ap-
pearance as Brownstown. After passing the river Le Cas and the river
 Range, we came opposite to a British town
 called Sandwich, where, upon an elevated position,
 we beheld the horrible spectacle of two men
 hanging in gibbets. The white settlements, on both the American
 and British shores of the Detroit, are so near
 together, that the farms resemble villages.
 Nearly opposite Sandwich is Detroit, which we
 reached about 5 o'clock in the afternoon, and
 proceeded to the boarding house of the widow
Harrison, to whom we had been recommended,
 having come eighteen miles. In the evening,
 Charles Jewett and several others came to see
 us; they told us they had heard of the arrival of
 some strangers, and expected we were from the
 interior of the United States; that for a long
 time they had received no account from the seat
 of government, and were anxious to hear the
 news. Having an open letter from the Secre-
tary of War, directed to Charles Jewett , and to
 the commanding officer at Detroit, we embraced
 the opportunity to present it. The letter was as
 follows:
 War Department, February 20th, 1804. Gentlemen,- This will be handed you by
 Joel Wright , George Ellicott , and Gerard Hop-
kins. They are amongst the most respectable
 members of the Society of Friends in Maryland.
 Their object is to visit some of the western In-
dians, for the laudable purpose of encouraging
 and aiding them in the introduction of agricul-
ture and other improvements essential to the
 happiness of the red people. They are men of
 science, information and property, and are en-
titled to the civilities and attention of all good
 men. You will please to afford them every aid,
 and should they wish to cross the lake from De-
troit to Niagara, and a public vessel being about
 to sail for that place, accommodations should be
 afforded them free of expense, and letters of in-
troduction given them to Major Porter . I am respectfully
 Your humble servant, H. DEARBORN. . 
To the Commanding Officer at Detroit, and Charles
 Jewett, Esq., Indian Agent. Charles Jewett received us with great civility,
 and has invited us to dine with him to-morrow,
 to which we have consented. 4th month 27th. This morning Charles
 Jewett again called upon us, and at his request
 we accompanied him to the garrison, and
 were introduced to the commanding officer,
 Major Pike , who appears to be a genteel and
 clever old man. He informed us that a public
 vessel would sail for Niagara, about the first of
 the ensuing month, and recommended us very
 strongly to take passage in her, in preference to
 any other vessel, she being in good order, and
 under the management of mariners well ac-
quainted with the lake. This vessel is under his
 superintendence. Agreeably to engagement, we dined to-day with
Charles Jewett . The revenue officer for the port
 of Detroit, Captian Ernest , also dined with us. 28th. This day we dined with Major Pike , in
 compliance with an invitation which he gave us
 yesterday. He treated us with great respect and
 attention, and appeared to be pleased with our
 company. New Jersey being the place of his
 nativity, he has considerable knowledge of our
 Society. In the course of conversation he in-
quired after Peter Yarnall , and says that Peter 
 and himself were in the same military company
 during the Revolutionary war; he had not heard
 of his death. The following circumstance, as related by him,
 making at the time considerable impression upon
 me, I have thought proper to record it. He told
 us that several officers with Peter and himself
 were lodging together; that one night Peter 
 alarmed them all with loud screams to such a de-
gree that on first awaking he supposed the enemy
 had fallen upon their army with bayonets. Peter 
 was on his feet, and appeared to be awake. They
 spoke to him repeatedly, and endeavored to ap-
proach him, but every advance they made in-
creased his alarm. Finally he recovered himself
 and became composed, and for several days after-
wards, instead of satisfying their inquiries, ap-
peared to be sunk in distress and gloom. He
 afterwards told them he considered his alarm as
 a warning to him, and that his fright arose from
 a plain representation of the devil, come to take
 him off. Peter in a short time left the army,
 and (said the Major ) I always believed that his
 reformation had its rise from that circumstance. 28th. This day we dined with Robert Monroe ,
 factor of the United States in the Indian Depart-
ment. At his table we met our friend Charles
 Jewett, the revenue officer before named, Judge
 Henry and Lawyer Sibley . 29th. This day we dined with Frederick
 Bates, at his lodgings. He is descended from
 Friends, and discovers great partiality for our
 company. He is a young man of superior under-
standing, and is much esteemed in Detroit. I
 feel and fear for the situation of this young
 man. It is not in human nature to support good
 principles unblemished, when left alone to stem
 the torrent of fashionable and fascinating vices.
Detroit is a place of great corruption. 30th. This day we rode nine miles up the
river Detroit to take a view of Lake St. Clair.
 This lake is thirty miles in length, and twenty
 miles in width. We had a beautiful prospect of
 it, from a commanding situation. I ought to
 have mentioned that bordering the river, the
 whole distance from Detroit to the lake, the land
 is handsomely improved. The houses are so
 near each other that the margin of the river
 looks like a village. These farms are grants
 made by the French government nearly a cen-
tury ago. They uniformly lie in parallelograms
 containing about one hundred acres. Added to
 tolerable dwelling houses are the handsomest
apple orchards I ever saw. The extraordinary
 healthfulness of the trees, indicates a suitableness
 of climate or soil, or both. The pear trees also are very large and hand-
some; but their cherry and peach trees do not
 thrive well, the climate being too cold for them. In this little excursion we were accompanied
 by Frederick Bates , and returned in time to com-
ply with an invitation we had received to dine
 with Doctor Davis . Major Pike , and several
 others, dined with us. 5th month 1st. We this day dined with Dr.
 Wilkinson, who removed from the lower part of
 the State of Maryland. Were we as fond of
 eating and drinking as the people of Detroit ap-
pear to be, it would be no marvel if we should
 forget our homes, and think ourselves well enough
 entertained where we are; but whilst we have
 been under an apparent necessity of yielding to
 the invitations we have received during (shall I
 say?) our imprisonment here, we know we have
 been very anxious for the time to arrive, in which
 we may embark homewards, and hope that to-
morrow morning the vessel for which we have
 been waiting will sail. 2d. This morning, wind and weather appear-
ing to permit, we were informed that at 9 o'clock
 the vessel would sail. We accordingly bade
farewell to our acquaintance, and went on board
 the United States brig called the John Adams,
 commanded by Commodore Brevoort . About 9
 o'clock sail was hoisted, and we proceeded to
 the mouth of the river Detroit, when night com-
ing
 on, and the wind being unfavorable, we
 anchored near the British shore, and opposite to
 the town of Malden. 3d. Weighed anchor. Winds light and op-
posite; anchored again about 8 o'clock in the
 evening, near an island called the Middle Sister. 4th. About 4 o'clock this morning again
 weighed anchor, and a calm coming on about 10
 o'clock, we anchored again near Middle Bass
 Island, where we were confined the remainder
 of the day. In the afternoon some of us amused
 ourselves with fishing. The small boat was
 rowed by several hands around the island, whilst
 we cast our lines, about thirty feet in length, hav-
ing hooks baited with the skin of pork and
 covered in part with the skin of pork and
 covered in part with a piece of red cloth. In a
 short time we caught upwards of five dozen
 black bass, justly esteemed an excellent fish, and
 weighing from four to six pounds. The lake
 water is so clear, that fish can be seen from
 twelve to fifteen feet below the surface. Many
 of the fish we caught, we saw advancing to our
 hooks. 5th. At 4 o'clock this morning again hoisted
 sail. Weather windy, attended with rain. We
 had not proceeded far before a head wind opposed
 our sailing, and we cast anchor at an island
 called Middle Island. At 4 o'clock in the after-
noon a heavy rain and thunder gust coming on,
 it was deemed safest to return back a few leagues
 to a harbor called Put-in-Bay, where we lay dur-
ing the night. 6th. This morning at 6 o'clock we again
 hoisted sail; wind and weather clear and pleasant.
 We are now, 9 o'clock at night, under sail. 7th. Have been under sail last night and this
 day until evening, when we cast anchor opposite
 to Presqueile, for the purpose of landing a part of
 our passengers. 8th. During last night lay at Presqueile, and
 this morning put on shore the passengers bound
 for that place, after which, the wind heading us,
 we lay at anchor the rest of the day. Presqueile
 is a town on the American side of the lake, con-
taining about forty houses, several of which are
 stores. A small garrison of the United States is
 stationed here. 9th. About 10 o'clock last night, a light favor-
able breeze sprung up, which encouraged us to
 proceed. The vessel has been all night and du-
ring the day under sail. At 8 o'clock in the
 evening we dropped anchor, within four miles of
Niagara river. Our commander says that the
 channel leading into the harbor, is rocky and
 dangerous, and deems it imprudent to attempt
 an entrance at night. It is a pleasing reflection, that we are so near
 to the end of our passage over the lake; and we
 are gladdened with the hope, that we shall shortly
 prosecute the remainder of our journey over
 terra firma, where we shall not be subject to
 the impediments of opposing winds, and be freed
 from the dangers of storms. Lake Erie is a
 very beautiful body of water, 300 miles in
 length and generally from 50 to 60 in width.
 Much of the distance we have sailed has been out
 of sight of land. The water of the lake appears
 to be of a beautiful deep green color, but when
 taken up in a glass vessel, is to be admired for
 its transparency. I think it is, without exception,
 the sweetest water I ever drank. 10th. At 4 o'clock this morning our anchor
 was again hoisted, and in about half an hour we
 were safely moored at Fort Erie. This is a small
 fort on the Canadian shore of the lake, garrison-
ed by the British. Immediately on our arrival,
 we set out on foot for Buffalo, distant 5 miles, a
 town situated at the junction of Buffalo Creek
 with Lake Erie, and near the commencement of
 the outlet of the lake, commonly called Niagara
 river. The object of this excursion was to ob-
tain a conveyance across the country to the near-
est line of public stages. We were successful in
 an application to one of the inhabitants, who
 agreed to furnish us with a light wagon, to be
 in readiness two day's hence. Here we met with
Erasmus Granger , an agent of the United States,
 in the Indian Department. We had conversa-
tion with him at considerable length on Indian
 affairs. He tells us that many individuals
 amongst the Indians of his district, (who are of
 the Six Nations,) are turning their attention to
 agriculture. About mid-day we returned in a small boat to
 our vessel. After dining on board, we went on
 shore at Fort Erie, and joined by our Commodore 
 and Lieutenant Cox , a passenger with us from
 Detroit, we engaged a light wagon to return with
 us at 4 o'clock to-morrow morning, to view the
 Falls of Niagara, distant about eighteen miles. We
 extended our walk for a considerable distance
 along the shore of Lake Erie; it is here composed
 of a solid body of limestone, beautifully marbled. 11th. This morning we sat out for the Falls
 of Niagara; our road passed near the margin of
 Niagara river, from the lake to the Falls, a dis-
tance of 18 miles, which afforded us a view
 both of the river, and of the adjacent improve-
ments. The land is generally under cultivation,
 and is tolerably improved. The soil appears
 rather cold and stiff; but some of the meadows
 are nearly equal to the best I ever saw; some of
 the farms belong to members of our society, and
 we are told that there is a meeting of Friends
 not far distant from the Falls. Considerable
 emigrations are making from the United States,
 to this as well as other parts of Upper Canada,
 owing to the very advantageous terms upon
 which the British Government dispose of the
 land, being scarcely removed from a gift. We reached a Canadian town called Chippewa, 
 to breakfast, after which we walked to the Falls,
 a distance of two miles. This was a walk, of
 which every step seemed to increase curiosity
 and surprise. Our attention was soon arrested
 by a cloud which hangs perpetually over the
 Falls for the height of 600 feet, arising from the
 dashing of the waters. As we advanced to the Falls the solid earth
 and rocks shook, or seemed to shake, under our
 feet, whilst the roar of the waters so overpowered
 every other sound that, notwithstanding we were
 tete-a-tete, it was necessary to raise the voice to
 a very loud key in order to be heard. Mean-
while the cloud above mentioned issued contin-
ually in what we sometimes hear called a Scotch
 mist. There is a common saying, Those who know
 no danger, fear none. This was our case on re-
turning to the extremity of an overjutting rock,
 called Table Rock, opposite to the great cataract,
 in order to gratify our curiosity, in a peep down
 the precipice which is more than 150 feet per-
pendicular. In passing afterwards a short dis-
tance below this rock, we were alarmed with the
 discovery, that the place on which we had stood
 was but a thin shell, the Falls having under-
mined the rock for many feet. Proceeding a
 little lower down the Falls, we again found that
 our second stand was almost as baseless. We
 however supposed that the danger was not equal
 to our apprehensions, as the names of great num-
bers of visitors were cut in these rocks, near their
 extremities. I shall not attempt to give a par-
ticular description of the Falls of Niagara, which
 has been done by persons who have visited them,
 for the especial purpose of gratifying the curious.
 After we had gratified our curiosity in a view of
 them we returned to Fort Erie, and after
 night were rowed in a small boat to Buffalo town,
 in order to be in readiness for setting out home-
ward in the morning. 12th. The person who has engaged to take us
 on our journey this morning has disappointed us.
 The circumstance is a trial, as we have become
 very anxious to reach our homes. Being at lei-
sure we accompanied the Indian agent in a ride,
 four miles above Buffalo Creek, to an Indian vil-
lage of the Senecas, one of the tribes of the Six
 Nations. They are making considerable progress in
 agriculture, live in tolerable log houses, and have
 a number of cattle, horses and hogs. We saw
 many of them at work; they were preparing the
 ground for the plough by rolling logs, taking up
 stumps, &c. We also saw among them a large plough at
 work, drawn by three yoke of oxen, and attended
 by three Indians. They all appeared to be very
 merry, and to be pleased with our visit. The
 land upon which these Indians are settled is of
 a superior quality. We saw amongst them Red
 Jacket, Farmers Brother , and several other dis-
tinguished Chiefs. Many of these Indians wor-
 in their ears, and round their necks, strung upon
 strings, several descriptions of Lake shells. Here
 we met with Saccarissa , a principal chief of the
 Tuscarora tribe. He has come for the purpose
 of being assisted by the agent in vesting fifteen
 thousand dollars in the purchase of land from the
Holland Land Company. They have greatly de-
clined hunting, and are becoming agriculturists.
 The Tuscarora Indians removed from North Caro-
lina many years ago, and were received into the
 then Five Nations, or Iroquois Indians, who gave
 them a small tract of country, which they now
 think wants enlarging. It is a fact, that the
Six Nations have stock in the Bank of the
 United States to the amount of more than one
 hundred thousand dollars, from which they draw
 regular dividends. This is money which they
 received some years ago from our Government
 for the sale of their lands. The Chiefs and principal people took the advice
 of General Washington , in making bank stock of
 their money. 13th. This morning we set out from Buffalo
 in a farm wagon drawn by two horses, and tra-
velled 32 miles through a rough and inferior
 country. 14th. Proceeded 23 miles and reached Bata-
via, a new town, handsomely situated. We have
 had a muddy, disagreeable road, through a coun-
try too flat to be desirable. The land is pretty
 rich, and very heavily timbered. We have been
 all day followed by millions of mosquitoes;
 crossed a handsome stream called the Tantawan-
tae, and were told at the Ford that a little dis-
tance above us 120 rattle snakes lay dead. These
 snakes were killed by some fishermen with their
 spears, the warm weather having brought them
 out of their dens. People are making settle-
ments here very rapidly. 15th. Travelled 33 miles, and lodged at War-
ner's Tavern. The land for the most part tol-
erable. The New England people are making
 many handsome settlements here. They have
 built fine farm houses, planted handsome or-
chards, and emigration is increasing. The stone
 is mostly limestone. We passed for several miles
 over a tract covered with limestone, which con-
tained a great variety of curious marine shells.
 The country affords many fine springs; one
 which we passed contains water sufficient to turn
 a mill. We also passed through a large Indian
 town, near the Genesee river, and to-day crossed
 that river, where its width is about 100 feet. 16th. At 6 o'clock this morning we again
 proceeded; passed near Hemlock lake, and
 Honey lake, of which the waters empty into the
 Genesee river. The face of the country is gen-
erally tolerable, but stony. We to-day also saw
 the same appearances of marine shells as yesterday.
 About mid-day we reached the town of Canan-
daigua; situated upon a lake of that name, about
 20 miles in length, and from one to two
 miles in width; its waters empty into Lake
 Ontario. The improvements on this tract are
 astonishingly handsome for a new country, par-
ticularly through a settlement called Bloomfield.
 At Canandaigua, we exchanged a rough wagon,
 for the public stage, a circumstance additionally
 gratifying to us from the hope that we shall now
 proceed homewards with expedition. At 2 o'clock
 set out in the stage, and reached the town of
Geneva where we lodged. This is a handsome
 new town situated upon Seneca lake, a body of
 water forty miles in length, and from three to
 three and a half miles in width. 17th. Travelled about fifty miles and lodged
 at the village of Onandagua. On our way we
 reached a handsome wooden bridge one mile in
 length, over Cayuga Lake. 18th. Travelled fifty miles to the handsome
 town of Utica, situated on the Mohawk river.
 Passed near Oneida Lake, and through a large
 settlement of Indians of the Oneida tribe. Their
 town consists of about seven hundred Indians.
 They have good houses, a meeting house, barns
 and orchards. Their land is under cultivation,
 is level, and appears to be of good quality. We
 saw many of them in their fields preparing for
 corn. These Indians have been greatly aided in
 agriculture, by the Friends of Philadelphia. 19th. This morning we again proceeded, and
 at night lodged at a small village called George-
town, making a distance of fifty miles. Our road
 led us the whole distance along the Mohawk
 river. The Bottoms along this river are called the
German Flats, and are very rich and handsome.
 They were settled many years ago by the Germans.
 We stopped to view the Falls in the river, where
 the navigation is made easy by locks; a very
 romantic place, there being limestone rock of
 enormous size, both in the water and upon the
 hills. In proceeding along the bottoms of this
 river there are many marks which indicate that
 at some period of time there was a vast body of
 water covering these Flats. The Flats are gen-
erally from half a mile to a mile in width; their
margins are a continuation of hills on each side,
which are from two to three hundred feet in
height; the surface of the hills show stones of
 great size, which are washed into all shapes;
 added to this, the hills discover evident appear-
ances of those indentures common to river shores. 20th. Again prosecuted our journey, passing
 along the Mohawk river to the town of Schen-
ectady, where we crossed the river, and in the
 evening reached the town of Albany upon the
 North river, making a distance of forty eight
 miles. I cannot but observe here, that in pro-
ceeding along the Mohawk river to-day, we came
 to the end of those high chains of hills mention-
ed yesterday, where the country made quite a
 level appearance; so that we were puzzled to
 conjecture what became of the earth which had 
 enclosed so great a body of water, as the hills
 seem to declare once washed their summits. I
 may add, in humble confession, that in the course
 of our long journey, I have had frequent occasions
 to acknowledge, in a view of those extraordinary
 and inexplicable natural curiosities, which have
 fallen under our observation, the truth of that
 excellent sentiment of a religious poet, Nature is wrapt up,
 In tenfold night, from reason's keenest eye.-YOUNG . Between Schenectady and Albany the coun-
try is the poorest I ever saw. The surface is a
 body of sand, producing scarcely a tree. Surely
 one of Churchill's lines, relative to a part of
 Scotland, may with propriety be applied to this
 tract, Here half starved spiders feed on half starved flies. 21st. Having concluded to go by water from
Albany to New York, at 3 o'clock this afternoon,
 we set sail, and at six o'clock in the evening of
 the 23d reached New York, a distance of one
 hundred and sixty miles. 24th. At 8 o'clock this morning, we took
 public stage, and passing through the city of
Philadelphia, reached Baltimore on First-day
 the 27th of 5th month, 1804. Here reader, allow
 me to add I was gladdened with the favor of being
 permitted safely to return to my home, and
 grateful for the additional blessing of finding my
 dear wife and infant children all well. We were absent on this visit three months
 and four days, and travelled about two thousand
 miles. 
 APPENDIX. Whilst engaged in taking a copy of the pre-
ceding journal, I have been induced to examine
 the manuscripts left by the late George Ellicott ,
 of Ellicott's Mills, the companion in this em-
bassy of the author of the narrative, to discover
 if I could find amongst them any matter concern-
ing the Indians, and of the care manifested by
 the Friends of Baltimore Yearly Meeting on
 their behalf. In the course of this investigation
 a variety of material on the subjects mentioned
 has presented, from which I have gleaned some
 fragments, which, as they promise to be inter-
esting to the readers of the present day, are
 herewith presented. The first extracts are from the unpublished
 account of a journey to Upper Sandusky, in 1799,
 performed by some of the members of the In-
dian Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting,
 and written by George Ellicott . He appears
 to have considered that any narrative of the
 kind should be preceded by information con-
cerning the Indians, as they were in former
 years; and had therefore prepared a preface to
 this work, compiled from the writings of Jeffer-
son, and other authorities, from which the fol-
lowing is taken: When the first effectual settlement was
 made in Virginia,* *See Jefferson's Notes on Virginia. which was in the year 1607,
 the country from the sea coast to the mountains,
 and from the Potomac to the most southern
 waters of James river, was occupied by upwards
 of forty different tribes of Indians. Of these,
 the Powhatans, the Mannahoacs, and Mona-
cans, were the most powerful. Those between
 the falls of the rivers and the mountains were
 divided into two confederacies; the tribes in-
habiting the head waters of the Potomac and
 Rappahannock being attached to the Manna-
hoars, and those on the upper part of James
 river to the Monacans. But the Monacans and
 their friends were in amity with the Mannahoars
 and their friends, and waged joint and perpetual
 war against the Powhatans. We are told that
 the Powhatans, Mannahoacs, and Monacans,
 spoke languages so radically different, that in-
terpreters were necessary when they transacted
 business. Hence we may conjecture that this
 was not the case between all the tribes, and prob-
ably that each spoke the language of the nation
 to which it was attached, which is known to
 have been the case in many particular instances.
 Very possibly there may have been anciently
 three different stocks, each of which multiplying
 in a long course of time, had separated into so
 many little societies. This practice results from
 the circumstance of their never having submitted
 themselves to any laws, any coercive power, or
 any shadow of government. Their only con-straints
trasts are their manners, and that moral sense of
 right and wrong which, like the sense of tasting
 and feeling in every man, makes a part of his
 nature. An offence against these is punished
 by contempt, by exclusion from society, or, where
 the case is serious, as that of murder, by the in-
dividuals whom it concerns. Imperfect as this spe-
cies of coercion may seem, crimes are very rare
 amongst them, in so much that were it made a ques-
tion whether no law, as among the native Ameri-
cans, or too much law, as among the civilized Euro-
peans, submits men to the greatest evil; one who
 has seen both conditions of existence would pro-
nounce it to be the last, and that the sheep are
 happier of themselves, than under the care of
 wolves. It will be said that great societies can-
not exist without the aid of government. The
 savages therefore break themselves into small
 ones. The territories of the Powhatan confede-
racy south of the Potomac, comprehended about
 8000 square miles, 30 tribes, and 2400 hundred
 warriors. Captain Smith tells us that within
 60 miles of Jamestown were 5000 people, of
 whom 1500 were warriors. From this we find
 the proportion of their warriors to their whole
 inhabitants was as 3 to 10.
 The Powhatan
 confederacy then would cosist of about 8,000
 inhabitants, which was one for every square
 mile; being about the twentieth part of our
 present population in the same territory, and the
 hundreth of that of the British Islands. The
 numbers of some of them are stated as they
 were in the year 1669, when an attempt was
 made by the Assembly to enumerate them.
 Probably the enumeration is imperfect, and in
 some measure conjectural, and that a further
 search into the records would furnish many more
 particulars. What would be the melancholy
 sequel of their hsitory, may, however, be
 augured from the census of 1669, by which we
 discover that the tribes therein mentioned and
 enumerated, were, in the space of 62 years re-
duced to about one-third of their former number.
 Spirituous liquors, the small pox, war, and an
 abridgment of territory, to a people who lived
 principally on the spontaneous productions of
 nature, had committed great havoc among them.
 That the lands of this country (Virginia,) were
 taken from them by conquest, is not so general
 a truth as is supposed. We find in our histo-
ries and records, repeated proofs of purchase
 which cover a considerable part of the lower
 country, and many more would doubtless be
 found on further search. The upper country,
 we know, has been acquired altogether by pur-
chases made in the most unexceptionable form,
 westward of all these tribes, beyond the moun-
tains, and extending to the great lakes on the
 Massawomics, a most powerful confederacy, who
 harassed unremittingly the Powhatans and Man-
nahoacs. These were probably the ancestors
 of the tribes known at present by the name
 of the Six Nations. Very little can now be dis-
covered of the subsequent history of these tribes
 severally. The Chickalaminies removed about
 1661 to Mattapony river. Their chief, with one
 of each of the tribes of the Pamunkies and Mat-
tahonys, attended the meeting at Albany, in
 1685; this seems to be the last chapter in their
 history. The Monacans and their friends, better
 known latterly by the name of Tuscaroras, were
 probably connected with the Massawomics, or
 Five Nations; for though we are told that their
 languages were so different that the interven-
tion of interpreters was necessary between them,
 yet we also learn that the Erigas, a nation for-
merly inhabiting the Ohio, were of the same
 original stock with the Five Nations, and that
 they partook also of the Tuscarora language.
 Their dialects might, by long separation, have
 become so unlike as to be unintelligible to each
 other. We know, that in 1712, the Five Na-
tions received the Tuscaroras in their confede-
racy, and made them the Sixth Nation. All the
 nations of Indians in North America, lived in
 the hunter's state, and depended for subsistence
 on hunting, fishing, and the spontaneous fruits
 of the earth, and a kind of grain, which was
 planted and gathered by the women, and is now
 known by the name of Indian corn. Long po-
tatoes, pumpkins, and squashes of various kinds
 were also found in use among them. They had
 no flocks, herds, or tamed animals of any kind.
 Their government a kind of patriarchal confede-
racy. Every town or family has a chief, who is
 distinguished by a particular title, and whom we
 commonly call Sachem. The several towns
 or families that compose the tribes have a chief
 who presides over it, and the several tribes com-
posing a nation have a chief who presides over
 the whole nation. Those chiefs are generally
 men advanced in age, and distinguished for their
 prudence and abilities in council; the matters
 which merely regard a town or family, are settled
 by the chief and principal men of the town,
 those which regard a tribe, such as the appoint-
ment of head warriors or captains, and settling
 differences between tribes and families, are reg-
ulated at a meeting of the chiefs from the differ-
ent towns; and those which regard the whole
 nation, such as making war, concluding peace, or
 forming alliances with the neighboring nations.
 are deliberated and determined in a national
 council, composed of the chiefs of the tribes, at-
tended by their head warriors, and a number of
 chiefs from the towns, who are his counsellors.
 In every town, there is a council house, where
 the chiefs and men of the town assemble when
 occasion requires, and consult what is proper to
 be done. Every tribe has a fixed place for the
 chief of the towns to meet and consult on the
 business of the tribe. And in every nation,
 there is what they call the central council house,
 or council fire, where the chiefs of the several
 tribes, with the principal warriors, convene to
 consult and determine on their national affairs.
 When any matter is proposed in the national
 council, it is common for the chiefs of the seve-
ral tribes to consult thereon apart with their
 counsellors, and when they have agreed, to deliver
 the opinion of the tribe at the national council.
 And as their government seems to rest wholly
 on persuasion, they endeavor by mutual conces-
sions to obtain unanimity. Such is the govern-
ment that still exists among the Indian nations
 bordering on the United States. To the north-
ward of these, there was another powerful nation,
 which occupied the country from the head of
 the Chesapeake Bay, up to the Kittatinny
 mountain, and as far eastward as Connecticut
 river, comprehending that part of New York,
 which lies between the Highlands and the ocean.
 All the State of New Jersey, that part of Penn-
sylvania which is watered below the range of
 Kittatinny Mountains, by the rivers or streams
 falling into the Delaware, and the County of
 New Castle, in the State of Delaware as far as
 Duck Creek. It is to be observed that nations
 of Indians distinguish their countries one from
 another, by natural boundaries, such as ranges
 of mountains or streams of water. But as the
 heads of rivers frequently interlock or approach
 near to each other, as those who live upon a stream
 claim the country watered by it, they often en-
croached on each other, and this was a constant
 source of war between the different nations. The nation occupying the tract of country
 last described, called themselves Lenapi, and
 among us they are better known as Delawares;
 this nation consisted of five tribes, who all spoke
 one language; first, the Chihohocki, who dwelt
 on the west side of the river, now called Dela-
ware, a name given to it by Lord De-la-War ,
 who put into it on his passage from Virginia,
 but which was called by the Indians, Chicho-
hocki. Second, the Wanami, who inhabited the
 country called New Jersey, from the Raritan to
 the sea. Third, the Munsey, who dwelt on the
 upper streams of the Delaware, from the Kitta-
tinny mountains down to the Raritan. Fifth, the
 Mahicon or Mahattan, who occupied Staten Isl-
and, York Island, (which, from its being the prin-
cipal seat of their residence, was formerly called
 Mahattan.) Long Island, and that part of N. York
 and Connecticut, which lies between Connecticut
 and Hudson rivers, from the highlands, which is
 a continuance of the Kittatinny ridge down to
 the sound. The nation had a close alliance
 with the Shawanese, who lived on the Susque-
hanna and to the westward of that river, as far as
 the Alleghany mountains, and carried on a long
 war with another powerful nation of Indians,
 who lived to the north of them, between the
 Kittatinny mountains, or highlands, and Lake
 Ontario, and who call themselves Mingoes, and
 are called by the French writers, Iroquois, by
 the English, Five Nations, and by the Indians to
 the southward, with whom they were at war,
 Massawomic; this war was carrying on in its
 greatest fury, when Captain Smith first arrived
 in Virginia. The Mingo warriors had pene-
trated down the Susquehanna to the mouth of
 it. The Mingo nation consisted of five tribes;
 three, who are called the Elder, to wit: the
 Senecas, who live to the west, the Mohawks, to
 the east, and the Onondagoes between them;
 and two, who are called the younger tribes,
 namely, the Cayugas and Oneidas. All these
 tribes spoke one language, and were thus united
 in a close confederacy, and occupied that tract
 of country from the last end of Lake Erie to
 Lake Champlain, and from the Kittatinny and
 highlands to the Lake Ontario and the river
 St. Lawrence. This nation turned their arms
 against the Lenapi, and as this war was long
 and doubtful, they, in the course of it, not only
 exerted their whole force, but put in practice
 every measure which prudence or policy could
 devise to bring it to a successful issue. For
 this purpose they bent their course down the
 Susquehanna, warring with the Indians in their
 way, and having penetrated as far as the mouth
 of it, they, by the terror of their arms, engaged
 a nation, known by the name of the Nanticocks,
 Coneys and Lutetocs, and who lived between
Chesapeake and Delaware Bays, and bordering
 on the territory of Chihohocki, to enter into an
 alliance with them; they also formed an alliance
 with the Monahans, and stimulated them to
 war with the Lenapi, and their confederates.
 At the same time the Mohawks carried on a
 furious war down the Hudson against the Mo-
hiccons and river Indians, and compelled them
 to purchase a temporary and precarious peace,
 by each acknowledging them to be their supe-
riors, and paying an annual tribute. The Lenapi being surrounded with enemies
 and hard pressed, and having lost many of their
 warriors, were compelled at last to sue for peace,
 which was granted them on the condition that
 they should put themselves under the protection
 of the Mingoes, confine themselves to raising
 corn, hunting for the subsistence of their fami-
lies, and no longer have the power of making
 war. This is what the Indians call making them
 women. Under this condition the Lenapis were
 when William Penn first arrived, and began the
 settlement of Pennsylvania in the year 1682. In Sept. 1700, the Indians residing on the
 Susquehanna, granted to William Penn all their
 lands on both sides of the river. The Indians
 living on the Susquehanna and Potomac and
 the Shawanese, enetered into articles of agreement
 with Wm. Penn , by which, on certain conditions
 of peaceable and friendly behaviour, they were
 permitted to settle about the head of Potomac,
 in Pennsylvania. The Conestoga chiefs, also,
 in 1701, ratified the grant of the Susquehanna
 Indians made the preceding year of 1700. Wm.
 Penn obtained from the Sachems of the country
 a confirmation of grants made by former Indians
 of the lands from Duck Creek to the mountains,
 and from the Delaware to the Susquehanna; in this
 deed the Sachems declared that they had seen
 and heard read divers prior deeds which had
 been given to Wm. Penn by former chiefs. In the year 1672, Gov. Lovelace , of New
 York, by proclamation, ordered that four white
 grains or beads, and three black ones shall pass
 for a penny or stiver; this proclamation was
 published at Albany, Esopus, Delaware, Long
 Island, and at the ports adjacent; and that
 wampum was a passing medium of the country
 at that time. A treaty was entered into at the mouth of
 the Great Miami, between the United States and
 the Shawanese Nation, in the year 1786, by
 which the United States do allot them lands
 with their territory to live and hunt upon. Be-
ginning at the south line of the lands allotted
 to the Wyandots and Delawares, at the place
 where the main of the Great Miami and of the
 Ohio intersects said line, then down the Miami
 to the forks of that river below the old fort
 taken by the French in 1752, thence due west
 to the river De-la-Panse; thence down that river
 to the Wabash, beyond which line none of the
 people or citizens of the United States shall
 settle or disturb the Shawanese in their settle-
ment and possessions; and the Shawanese do
 relinquish to the United States all title they
 ever had to lands, east, west, and south, of the
 east, west, and south of lines before described.
 Signed by G. Clark , Richard Butler , Saml. H.
 Parsons, and eight Indians, and witnessed by a
 number of Indians and whites. The Indian
 witnesses were of the Delaware and Wyandot
 nations; Isaac Zane (a Wyandot), and the Crane 
 of the Wyandots are among them. The first movement made by the Society of
 Friends of Baltimore Yearly Meeting for the
 benefit of the Indians, after the conclusion of
 the Revolutionary was, was commenced about
 one year subsequent to the treaty of Grenville; 
 whereby a peace had been concluded between
 the United States and the hostile tribes, north-
west of the river Ohio. For many years those
 Indians had proved themselves to be the for-
midable enemies of the white emigrants who
 settled near them, and of the armies of the
 United States, sent out to compel them to sub-
mit to the occupation of a territory which they
 continued to regard as their own property. Hav-
ing been greatly improved in warlike discipline,
 and in the use of European firearms, by serving
 under the French commanders in former wars,
 they adhered to any pacific agreements no longer
 than their fears or their interests restrained
 them; and rested in the determination never to
 abandon their lands northwest of the Ohio river.
 They had defeated General Harmer , with the
 loss of the greater part of his army, on the banks
 of the St. Joseph's river in 1791; and an ex-
pedition sent against them shortly after, under
 the command of General St. Clair , was com-
pletely routed. In this engagement the Little
 Turtle,* * Michikiniqua, was the Indian name of this chief. so often alluded to in the foregoing
 pages, was the commander-in-chief of the Indian
 forces, and displayed feelings of humanity to-
wards his retreating foes, of which few exam-
ples have been furnished in the history of Indian
 warfare, and which reflects honor on his cha-
racter. On beholding the white soldiers fleeing before
 the exasperated Indians, and at every moment
 cut down by the weight of their tomahawks, his
 heart revolted at the sight, and ascending an
 eminence, he gave the singular signal cry, which com-
manded his men to cease from further pursuit
 and return to their camps; he also sent out mes-
sengers to inform them, wherever scattered,
 that they must be satisfied with the carnage,
 having killed enough. By this effort on his
 part many lives were spared. After this defeat, so unlooked for by the
 United States, General Wayne , who had suc-
ceeded General St. Clair , arrived with his army
 upon the location where that officer had been
 defeated, in the 9th month, (Sept.) 1793, and
 immediately built Fort Wayne. The next year
 he brought the Indians to a decisive engage-
ment in the vicinity, in which they were over-
thrown with great slaughter. This humiliation
 lessened their high estimate of their own strength
 and disposed them to peace, and a treaty was
 concluded between them and General Wayne ,
 who acted as a commissioner of the United
 States, at Grenville, (1794), by which the tribes
 northwest of the river Ohio, gave up the lands
 so long the object of contention, and accepting
 a reservation in the neighborhood of the Lakes,
 came under the protection of the United States,
 upon terms at that time considered mutually
 satisfactory and beneficial. The Little Turtle , who appears to have had a
 just idea of the importance of the lands about
 to be ceded to our government, remained for a
 long time inflexible, resolved upon procuring
 more favorable conditions. He was deeply at-
tached to the country which had been his birth-
place, and in common with all his brethren
 considered it belonged to the Indians by right
 of possession from the Great Spirit, who, they
 believed, after he had made the earth, sun,
 moon and stars, had placed the red man on this
 continent, and bestowed it upon him and his
 children. He knew also, that the whole region
 around was made dear to them by every cher-
ished remembrance; their recollections of the
 happy abode of the red people therein for many
 generations before the coming of the white men
 to settle amongst them; as connected also with
 the sports and pastimes of their youth, and with
 the enjoyments of their more manly pursuits in
 maturer years, and moreover as containing the
 graves and other monuments of their fathers.
 These recollections were all quickened and in-
creased in importance by the knowledge that, in
 relinquishing the possession of this fine territory,
 they yielded up forests filled with herds of deer,
 and other game which, by the addition of the
 fruits of their grounds, rich and fertile almost
 without precedent, gave them, even with their
 rude mode of tillage, an ample supply for their
 simple wants. He seemed also to be filled with
 apprehension, lest when settled within the con-
fined boundaries, which were to be theirs by the
 conditions of the treaty, that his countrymen
 would be too slow in adopting the habits of civil-
ized life; and as the supply of wild animals must
 soon be exhausted, would suffer many privations
 in consequence of the change. As such were
 his feelings, can any thoughtful person be as-
tonished at his resolutions? Convinced at last, that no alternative awaited
 him, he consented to sign the compact, remark-
ing to the officers present, as he affixed his sig-
nature, I have been the last to consent to this
 agreement; I will be the last to break it. He
 remained true to his affirmation. The following extracts are selected from a
 brief account of the Indian Committee of Balti-
more Yearly Meeting, from its appointment in
1795 to the completion of the journey to Fort
 Wayne, by G. T. Hopkins and George Ellicott ,
 in 1804. The Yearly Meeting of Baltimore, and, also,
 that of Philadelphia, appear to have directed
 their attention almost simultaneously to an effort
 for the improvement of the Indians, and a com-
mittee was accordingly appointed in each of
 these Yearly Meetings, in the autumn of 1795,
 to take the subject under care. In Baltimore Yearly Meeting, held by ad-
journments, from the 12th day of the Tenth
 month to the 16th of the same, inclusive, 1795,
 Evan Thomas being clerk, and John Cox assist-
ant clerk, the exercise with regard to the In-
dians commenced by a weighty concern being
 opened, concerning the difficulties and distress
 to which the Indian natives of this land are sub-
ject; and many observations were made on the
 kindness of their ancestors to the white people,
 in the early settlement of this country, exciting
 a deep consideration and enquiry, whether under
 the influence of that exalted benevolence and
 good will to men, (which our holy profession re-
quires,) anything remains for us to do to pro-
mote their welfare, their religious instruction,
 knowledge of agriculture, and the useful me-
chanic arts. A solemnity and uniting calm
 prevailing over the meeting, the further consid-
eration of the subject was referred to another
 meeting, when the condition of the distressed
 Indian natives being again revived, the senti-
ments of many brethren expressed, and a pre-
vailing sympathy felt, it appears to be the united
 sense of this meeting, that it be recommended
 to our Quarterly and Monthly Meetings to take
 this concern into serious consideration, and open
 subscriptions among our members for their relief
 and the encouragement of school education, hus-
bandry, and the mechanic arts, amongst that
 people. As it appears their situation demands
 immediate attention, we hope a spirit of liber-
ality will be manifested;* * This call of Baltimore Yearly Meeting upon
 its members was promptly met. But the sums of
 money, thus collected, do not appear to have been
 often used to defray the travelling expenses of the
 Friends appointed by the Indian Committee to visit
 the tribes North-west of the river Ohio. Those who
 accepted such commissions prepared their own out-
fit and defrayed their own charges, except in one,
 two, or at the most, three instances, where such an
 expenditure would have been oppresive to the indi-
viduals concerned, on which occasions the necessary
 funds were supplied by the committee. and those who find
 freedom to subscribe, are desired to put their
 contributions into the hands of the following
 Friends, who are appointed to receive and
 apply the same, in such manner as will best
 answer the benevolent designs of this meeting,
 carefully guarding against giving offence to gov-
ernment, viz:- John Wilson, Joseph Bond John M'Kim, Joseph Beeson, Bianson John Branen, Brown John Butcher, Evan Thomas, Benjamin Walker, Allan Farquhar, Israel Janney, John Love, David Branen, Brown Caleb Kirk, Gouldsmith Chandlee, Jonathan Wright, of Moses Dillon, Monallen, Elias Ellicott, Thomas Matthews, Nathan Heald, David Greane. Greaves The Friends above named composed the first
 Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting for In-
dian Affairs, and their appointment was wit
nessed by John Wigam , a minister from North
 Britain, who attended with a certificate from
 Aberdeen Monthly Meeting, dated 17th of
 Fourth month, 1794, and endorsed by the Half-
year's Meeting, held at Edinburgh, 28th of
 same month; and, also, a certificate from the
 Yearly Meeting of Ministers and Elders, held in
 London, dated 17th of Fifth month, 1794, all
 expressive of the unity of the Friends of those
 meetings in his visit to these parts. Deborah Darby and Rebecca Young also
 produced certificates to the Yearly Meeting at
 the same time, both from the Monthly Meet-
ing held at Coalbrookdale, in Shropshire, En-
gland, dated the 20th of Third month, 1793,
 endorsed by the Yearly Meeting for Wales, held
 at HCarmarthan, the 25th of Fourth month, 1793.
 Also certificates from the Yearly Meeting of
 Ministers and Elders, held in London, the 18th,
 20th, 23d and 29th of Fifth month, 1793.
 The company and labors of love of these
 Friends from Great Britain, are acknowledged
 to have been satisfactory to Baltimore Yearly
 Meeting.* * The records of Baltimore Yearly Meeting for 1796,
 contain minutes, almost precisely similar to those
 given above, of the appointment of the Indian Com-
mittee, and the presence of the Friends from Great
 Britain at the time. They were partakers with them in
 their exercises for the advancement of truth
 and righteousness, and sympathized in all their
 concerns. The first important meeting of the Indian
 Committee was held at Pipe creek, (where the
Meeting for Sufferings of Baltimore Yearly Meet-
ing then frequently convened,) the 22d of the
 Fifth month, 1796; ten members being present.
 The meeting was opened by the expression of a
 desire, by one of the committee, that every mem-
ber of the Society of Friends would be willing
 to give sanction to the benevolent experiment
 recommended by the Yearly Meeting; a senti-
 ment which was united with by all present.
 These good resolutions were much strengthened
 and encouraged by a letter they then opened
 and read, from the Indian Committee of Philadel-
phia, dated Third month 24th, 1796* * Rebecca Jones , in a letter to a son of Catherine
 Phillips, of England, dated in the autumn of 1795,
 mentions the appointment of the Philadelphia Com-
mittee for Indian Affairs. which
 set forth that they had addressed their Quar-
terly and Monthly Meetings, and, also, Particular
 Meetings, on the sufferings of Indians, and
 had sent them, with the minutes from Philadel-
 hia Yearly Meetings extracts from divers
 speeches and letters from Indian Chiefs; all
 tending to spread useful information, and draw
 the attention of our members to the situation
 of these distressed people; some of them had
 also visited the President of the United States,
 George Washington , (at the time in Philadel-
phia,) and acquainted him with the views of our
 religious Society, on behalf of the Indians. They
 had, also, conferred with the Secretary of State,
 who had manifested a desire to co-operate with
 the Friends, in promoting the interests of the In-
dians. They had addressed a circular letter to
 the different tribes of those called the Six Na-
tions, representing a desire to assist them in
 attaining a more comfortable, quiet, and peacea-
ble mode of life, and expressed an opinion
 that the distresses and difficulties the Indians
 labor under may, in a great degree, be attributed
 to their propensity to the use of spirituous
 liquors, introduced among them by traders and
 evil-minded persons, and suggested a plan by
 which the trade in liquors might be checked in
 part, if not fully. They conclude:-As, in
 our attention to this concern, anything shall
 arise that may be deemed useful and proper to
 communicate, we mean to impart the same, de-
siring like care may rest with you, that what
 may occur useful herein may be intimated to
 your loving friends. Addressed to John Brown , Elias Ellicott ,
John M'Kim , and others, Members of the Com-
mittee of the Yearly Meeting of Maryland, on
 the Indian Concern, &c. Signed by John Parrish, William Savery, Henry Drinker, John Hunt, Benjamin Sweet, John Pierce, Warner Mifflin, John Biddle, Thomas Harrison, Joseph Sansom, John Elliott. Any communication to the Philadelphia Com-
mittee on Indian Concerns, was to be addressed
 to Thomas Wistar , Clerk of the Committee, who
 had authority to call a meeting of their Sub-
Committee of fifteen Friends, on necessary
 occasions. The committee remained two days in session
 at Pipe Creek, deliberated on their benevolent
 purposes, addressed a reply to their Friends,
 John Parrish and others, in Philadelphia,
 through Thomas Wistar , and appointed John
 Brown, Jonathan Wright , Israel Janney , Moses
 Dillon, and Joseph Bond , to pay a visit to the
 Delawares, Shawanese, Wyandots, and other
 nations northwest of the river Ohio, or to such
 parts of them as they shall find freedom; appro-
bation of the government being first obtained.
 They also addressed a letter to the Indians to
 whom they were about to send a mission, in
 which they informed them that the Quakers,
 at their general religious council in Philadel-
phia, having agreed to take some of the Six
 Nations, who live in the North, by the hand,
 our religious council held last fall in Baltimore
 were also concerned for your welfare who reside
 in the West. They have told us to endeavor to speak
 with you and get acquainted with your nations.
 For this purpose we have sent our beloved bro-
thers, John Brown , Israel Janney , Jonathan
 Wright, Moses Dillon , and Joseph Bond , to
 shake hands with you in your tent, and to ask
 if you wish to be instructed how to raise corn
 and wheat for bread, on your own land, as we do;
 and to get meat at home without hunting, and
 to weave blankets and clothes for yourselves,
 your wives, and your children; and also to en-
quire whether you wish to have your children
 taught to read and write, and to do such other
 things as will make you live comfortably under
 the shade of the great tree of peace. We wish you
 to speak to us freely with the mouths of your na-
tions, and if it is agreeable to you we will talk to
 you again. Farewell. Signed on behalf of our aforesaid Religious
 Council of the people called Quakers, the 23d
 of 5th month, 1796, by
 Allen Farquhar, Benjamin Walker, David Brown, Elias Ellicott, Caleb Kirk. Previous to the departure of this delegation to
 the Indian settlements, they were furnished
 with permission for the purpose by the
 United States government, expressed in two let-
ters from the Secretary of State, and addressed
 to Governor St. Clair , and to General Wayne ,
 being as follows. DEPARTMENT OF STATE,
 Philadelphia, May 31st, 1796. SIR,- Mr. Henry Drinker of this city, whose
 respectable standing among the Society of
 Friends, and as our fellow citizen, you well know,
 has informed me, that a delegation of five pru-
dent, judicious men, of religious character, have
 been deputed by their brethren of that Society
 in Maryland to visit the Indian Tribes N. West
 of the river Ohio, for the purpose of learning
 their situation and disposition, and thence to
 judge of the practicability of introducing among
 them the simplest and most useful arts of civil
 life. The result of their inquiries and observa-
tions they are to report on their return to the
 Society. The approbation of the President has been
 asked and obtained. The object of this letter
 is to communicate the same to you, and request
 of you to afford the delegation all the protection
 and countenance to which their respectable char-
acters and philanthropic views entitle them.
 Most of the attempts at civilizing the Indians,
 which I have heard of, have been preposterous.
 We have aimed at teaching them religion and
 the sciences, before we have taught them the
 simple and essential labors of civil life. I am very respectfully your most obedient
 servant, TIM. PICKERING . The delegation proceeded to the Indian coun-
try, but found the chiefs, the hunters and war-
riors of the tribes with whom they desired to
 confer, much dispersed over the country, engaged
 in their various pursuits, and consequently were
 unable to hold any communication with them
 collectively; under this disappointment they
 made their report to the Committee on Indian
 Affairs. During the next Baltimore Yearly Meeting,
 the Indian Committee suggested, (in a report
 they made to that body, in which they alluded
 to the inability of their late mission to obtain an
 interview with the tribes whose improvement
 and preservation they desired,) that if a notice
 of the intention of Friends was intimated to the
 Indians in a suitable manner, and they were re-
quested to fix a time and place of meeting, a
 satisfactory conference might be obtained; as
 the disposition of such of them as they had had
 an opportunity of conversing with appeared fa-
vorable. The report was dated 10th mo. 13th, 1796,
 and signed by EVAN THOMAS , JOHN WILSON . On the 15th of 10th month, 1796, the Com-
mittee on Indian Affairs was officially informed
 that the Yearly Meeting had made an addition
 to that Committee, by the appointment of Reese
 Cadwallader, Thomas Farquhar , Joel Wright ,
James Mendenhall , George Ellicott , and James
 M'Grew. At the next meeting Joel Wright was ap-
pointed Clerk of the Committee, and no busi-
ness presenting, adjourned. At a meeting of the Indian Committee, held
 at Pipe Creek the 20th of 5th month, 1797, im-
mediately after the conclusion of the Meeting
 for Sufferings, which convened at that place, a
 very serious consideration of the important
 charge entrusted to them impressed the minds
 of the Friends in attendance, and Joel Wright 
 expressed a willingness, if provided with suita-
ble company to undertake a journey to the N.
 West of the river Ohio, for the purpose of fur-
nishing the Committee with more full informa-
tion respecting the situation and disposition of
 the Indians. The Committee approved his
 proposalm and he was left at liberty to make the
 journey. The Committee on Indian Affairs met again
 on the 7th of Tenth month, 1797, and received
 a most interesting account from Joel Wright 
 and the companions of his journey,-Reese Cad-
wallader and David Greaves ,-of their visit to
 the Indian country, dated the 15th of Ninth
 month, 1797, from which communication the
 following extract was copied:* * On a recent examination of the Records of the
 Indian Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting, in
 order to test the correctness of the abridgment now
 published, the incidents, dates and names were found
 to be exactly similar. In the course of this journey, after having
 visited a number of Indian hunting camps and
 several of their towns, we had a large oppor-
tunity to discover their present situation; often
 exposed to the inclemency of the seasons, with
 a very precarious and frequently a scanty sup-
ply of food and clothing. From the knowledge
 we have obtained of the extensive and valuable
 country they have lately given up to the United
 States, and of the narrow strip of land yet re-
served for their own use, between the line of
 the American garrisons and from Detroit to the
 mouth of the Kentucky river, we were im-
pressed with a belief that the Wyandots, Shawa-
nese and Delawares who dwell there, will, unless
 they alter their present mode of living, be re-
duced, in a few years, from the scarcity of game,
 to a state of extreme want and distress. At the upper end of Sandusky Town, they
 held a council with two of the principal chiefs
 of the Wyandot nation and several of their
 former warriors and young men, when Isaac
 Zane interpreted to them the address prepared
 by the Friends of Baltimore Yearly Meeting.
 He also interpreted the reply of one of the
 Chiefs, which was brief but friendly. They found that the Wyandots were the
 principal nation; that everything of importance
 must be transacted in their council; they can
 transact business by themselves, but the Dela-
wares and Shawanese have to apply to them when
 any business of consequence is laid before their
 people. This reply of the Indians, was presented to
 Baltimore Yearly Meeting of Friends with the
 Report of the Committee on Indian Concerns,
 and was published in the newspapers of the day. Afterwards, at a meeting of the Indian Com-
mittee in Baltimore, the 16th of Eighth month,
 1798, they received a letter from John Hecke-
welder, agent for the Moravian Society, repre-
senting the distressed condition of the Indians
 under his care, in consequence of their having
 been driven from their settlement on the Mus-
kingum river, during the late war, and were
 now returning thereto in want of provisions and
 necessary implements of husbandry; whereupon
Reese Cadwallader , Nathan Heald and Joel
 Wright were appointed to inspect into the
 circumstances of those Indians, with liberty, if
 they shall believe it necessary, to afford them
 some assistance by furnishing them with such
 articles as they may be in immediate want of.
 This delegation reported to the Indian Commit-
tee, at a meeting held in Baltimore the 2d of
 Fourth month, 1799, in a communication bear-
ing date, Redstone, Twelfth month 21st, 1798,
 and signed by Reese Cadwallader and Joel
 Wright. They had proceeded on their mission
 as far as Georgetown on the Ohio, sixty-five
 miles from Redstone, but ascertaining that John
 Heckewelder had lately gone to Bethlehem, and
 had procured the Indians under his charge a
 supply of provisions for the winter before his
 departure, and that the principal Indians of the
 settlement were then dispersed, and at their
 hunting camps (no date given), they turned
 their attention to eight of ten families of other
 Indians of the Tuscaroras, who were very de-
sirous of being instructed in farming, but were
 without agricultural implements, and were also
 in want of provisions; these they would have
 visited, in order to meet their active men,
 who had invited them to an interview, but were
 prevented from doing so by the situation of the
 Ohio river, which was in flood, with vast masses
 of ice passing down it. They, however, left a
 supply for their relief with Thomas Smith , who
 lived near Georgetown, and also engaged a black-
smith to make them some farming utensils.
Reese Cadwallader and Joel Wright , from all
 they had heard and seen on their journey, be-
lieved it would be right for the Indian Com-
mittee to send a deputation to the General
 Council of the Indians to be held the next
 spring. The Committee on Indian Concerns met again
 on the 23d of Third month, 1799, being a spe-
cial meeting; when a letter from Thomas Wistar 
 and a speech from the principal chief of the Wyan-
dot nation, called Tarhie (the Crane) , was read.
 This chief, in his speech, which was delivered at
 Detroit on behalf of the whole Wyandot nation,
 on the 8th day of September, 1798, reminds
 the Friends that they once met the Indians at
 a certain place where a great many good things
 were said and much friendship professed between
 them; that they had no place of security for
 their speeches, as their white brethren had, and
 that their belts of wampum were their only re-
cords; and adds, but, if you examine your
 books and papers, you will there find written all
 that passed between your forefathers and ours.
 He speaks further of a belt of wampum given
 to us by your forefathers, with a piece of parch-
ment affixed thereto; when you see the belt of
 wampum and read the writing on the parch-
ment, you no doubt will then perfectly know us,
 and will consider us as brethren united by a chain
 of friendship which can never be broken whilst
 memory lasts. He informed the Friends that
 he understood some of them wished to pay his
 people a visit, and adds, We are much pleased
 to hear that you still hold us in remembrance. The letter of Thomas Wistar ,* Notwithstanding friendly relations continued ever
 after to be maintained between the Indian Committee
 of Philadelphia and that of Baltimore, the manu-
scripts I have overlooked furnish no account of fur-
ther correspondence between them, until some years
 after the date of this letter of Thomas Wistar . clerk of the
 Committee on Indian Concerns in Philadelphia,
was dated 27th of Second month, 1799, and
 states that the Miami nation had made a re-
quest of their Committee for some Friends to
 settle amongst them, and a speech from the
Delawares left no doubt that a similar request 
 would be made from them; that they had
 proceeded no further than to furnish the Mi-
 ami's with two ploughs, a harrow, gears and
 other articles, but had no prospect of making
 an early settlement amongst them. Thomas
 Wistar mentions that he was informed by
 Jonathan Shefflin that the Wyandot speech
 was in answer to a few lines left (and signed
 by two or three Friends) at their village, and
 supposes it must have been the Friends of
 your Committee who were in that country, as
 from us none have been sent as yet amongst
 the nations west of the River Ohio. He con-
cludes with the following caution to the Balti-
more Committee: We are aware that Indians
 very generally take as promises what may be
 suggested to them for their consideration, as
 probable to take place, if they unite with it;
 we have of late been very guarded in our com-
munications with them, as the more we become
 acquainted with the Indian character the greater
 necessity we perceive for it. On considering the speech of the Wyandot
 cheif, the Baltimore Committee on Indian Con-
cerns made an enlargement on their former ap-
pointment by the addition of Evan Thomas and
 George Ellicott , who were directed to co-operate
 with Reese Cadwallader , Joel Wright and Na-
than Heald. They were desired to endeavor
 to visit those Indians in order to cultivate their
 friendship, and, if way should open, to offer
 them assistance. A reply was also written and forwarded to
 the Indian Committee of Philadelphia Yearly
 Meeting in part as follows: Dear Friends,- The correspondence has,
 on our part, been suspended till the account
 should be received from the Western Indians,
 which is now communicated by you; they pro-
bably conceiving that Friends, wherever situ-
ated, act as one body united. As the Friends
 of Pennsylvania have had a correspondence with
 them at times, from the first settlement of the
 country, and as they, in their present address,
 have alluded to former transactions, it seems
 the more necessary for us to apply to you for
 information on that head. We have been aware
 of our own inability at present to do any great
 matters, and have endeavored to guard against
 raising their expectations. A speech was some
 time ago communicated to some of the chiefs
 of the Wyandot nation, at the Upper Sandusky,
 with a view to inform them that we were de-
sirous of turning their minds to some of the
 most simple arts of civil life; and we wished
 to know of them whether it would be agreeable
 to them to make such a movement. They in-
formed us that they would lay the subject be-
fore their council and return an answer. A
 copy of the speech was left with them addressed
 to the chiefs of the Wyandot, Shawanese and
 Delaware nations, and of which we herewith
 hand you a copy also. We should have been pleased with the re-
ception of the original speech of the Wyandot
 Chiefs and the belt of wampum they speak of,
 with a copy of that from the Delawares and
 Miamis, the latter being, we suppose, of the
Shawanese nation. Five of our number are ap-
pointed to attend at Sandusky at the time of
 the great Indian Council, of which you will
 please inform the Superintendent,* * The seat of Government of the United States had
 not then been removed to the City of Washington.
The Superintendent resided in Philadelphia. and com-
municate such further information on the sub-
ject as you may conceive to be necessary. We
 also suggest the propriety and usefulness of
 your appointing a few Friends to unite in the
 visit, since the prudent conducting of the mat-
ter may be of great importance. As you are better acquainted than we are
 with the mode of conducting business with the
 Indians, if you think a belt of wampum will be
 necessary on our part, you will please to pro-
cure one for us suitable for the purpose, to be
 forwarded with the original speech and belt
 received by you, and we will remit the amount
 so soon as you advise us thereof. Signed on behalf of the Indian Committee
 of Baltimore, by JOEL WRIGHT , Clerk. BALTIMORE, Third month 24th, 1799. The deputation left their homes on the 7th of
 5th mo. 1799, on horse-back and with pack
 horses to carry a tent, provisions for the jour-
ney which would be necessary after leaving the
 settlements of Friends of Ohio, and useful pres-
ents to the Indians. It may be as well to men-
tion at this point, as the subject has not been al-
luded to before in this Appendix, that of all the
 missions we have referred to as sent out by the
 Indian Committee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting,
 the Friends engaged in them travelled on horse-
back, and experienced privations which in this
 day of railroads and telegraphs cannot be appre-
ciated. Valuable gifts for their Red brethren,
 their wives, and children, were never omitted on
 these occasions. At the next meeting of the Indian Commit-
tee, which was held in Baltimore, the 15th and
 16th of 10th month, 1799, the Friends who had
 been appointed to visit the Indians made their
 report, viz: Pursuant to our appointment we
 sat out on a visit to the Indians, the 7th of 5th
 month last, and arrived the 3d of the next
 month at Upper Sandusky, the principal village
 of the Wyandots; we were met there by a
 friendly reception from Tarhie, (the Crane,) the
 head chief, and others of the nation who hap-
pened to be at the village. On conferring with them they found that a
 mistake in translating their language had led to
 a misunderstanding respecting the time of hold-
ing the Grand Indian Council, which they now
 understood began every year at the full moon,
 in the 6th month; they were, therefore, too
 early in their visit, and with the impossibility
 of collecting the other Indians who would not
 be likely to assemble until the council, they
 concluded to hold a conference with Tarhie and
 the other chiefs then at Sandusky, in his house;
 and had a free conference with them on the sub-
ject of their visit. Their communication was
 kindly received, and an answer delivered on
 four strings of wampum, expressive of their
 gratitude for the care and friendship of the
 Quakers;* *Tarhie continued ever after to devote himself to
 the improvement of his people, and lived to be the
 oldest Indian in the West. He had signed a treaty
 between the United States and the Indians as early
 as 1786, and although obliged by his warriors to take
 part in the revolt which soon after took place, and
 in the battles subsequently fought, he appears to
 have been the first to persuade the Indians to make
 a virtue of neccesity, to bury the hatchet, and
 yield to the superior power of the white men. He
 was cruelly executed by the order of Tecumseh , in
1810. and as soon as the Grand Council
 met, they would communicate to it the concern
 the Friends now felt for their improvement, and
 inform us by a written speech of their conclu-
sion thereon. They conclude their report by remarking: While we were at Sandusky and in other In-
dian villages, our minds were often deeply af-
fected under the sorrowful consideration of the
 baneful effect of spirituous liquors on them, being
 abundantly supplied with it in almost every vil-
lage by Canadian traders residing among them;
 and we are confirmed in the opinion, that unless
 the traders can be restrained from furnishing
 them with this destructive article, in exchange
 for their skins and furs, they will not easily be
 persuaded to turn their minds towards agricul-
ture and the useful arts. At the same time, we
 have no doubt that these unprincipled men will
 make use of the great influence they have over
 the Indians to keep them in their present mode
 of living, as most conducive to their own in-
terests. Notwithstanding this cause of dis-
couragement, the great affection which the In-
dians have always manifested for our Society,
 induces us to desire that Friends may endeavor
 to keep under the weight of the concern, and
 be prepared to proceed in the benevolent work
 before them, whenever the way may open for
 service among them. Signed by EVAN THOMAS ,
 JOEL WRIGHT ,
 REESE CADWALADER ,
 GEORGE ELLICOTT .
 Dated Monongahela, 6th mo. 26th, 1779 In the manuscript journal of George Ellicott to
 the Plains of Sandusky, the following relation of
 the interview between the Friends and the
Wyandot Chiefs is preserved: After Evan Thomas had concluded his dis-
course, which was delivered by paragraphs
 through an interpreter, Tarhie, (the Crane,) the
 principal chief, took into his hand four strings
 of wampum, and began his speech. As he
 proceeded, he continually kept the strings of
 wampum moving, and spoke in a methodical
 way, and with the force and manner of an orator.
 I make no doubt, if the interpreter had been
 able to do justice to the sentiments expressed,
 we should have pronounced a verdict highly in
 favor of the eloquence of this son of the forest. After he had finished his speech, he desired
 his wife (who occupied an apartment above the
 council room, so situated that she could hear
 what passed), to hand down to him the papers,
 which he had; which she did. We read them,
 and found among them Wayne 's treaty, and a
 long paper containing much good advice from the
 Secretary of War. When the Indians hold a council, they have
 some of their principal women placed in a little
 room, either adjourning or overhead, where they
 can hear perfectly all that passes. This they
 treasure up in their minds, and as they are apt
 to have retentive memories, their traditions are
 faithfully preserved. The manuscripts in my possession furnish no
 record of the proceedings of the Indian Com-
mittee, from the reception of this report to the
 17th of 4th month, 1801, when an account is
 given of a meeting, at which a committee was
 appointed to draft a letter to Tarhie , Buck-
ingehelas, and other chiefs of the Wyandot and
 Delaware nations of Indians, in return for a let-
ter and speech which had been received from
 them, which did not contain a full reply to the
 proposition made to the Indians in 1799. The
 committee supposed their communication had
 not been faithfully translated, and again inquired
 of their Red brethren: Are you willing to
 have your children instructed at home, on your
 own lands, how to raise plenty of corn, to make
 clothes, and to build houses; to keep your old
 men, your women and children warm when the
 weather is cold; and that you may not suffer
 from want when the game gets scarce in your
 country? Signed by GEORGE ELLICOTT ,
 JOEL WRIGHT ,
 ISRAEL JANNEY ,
 GOULDSMITH CHANDLEE . Dated Baltimore, 4th month 17th, 1801. At their next meeting the Indian Committee
 of Baltimore was informed by a communication
 from Joel Wright , that nothing had been re-
ceived from the Indians since the last meeting,
 and no business was transacted. The next meeting of the committee was a
 special one, and held at Pike Creek, the 24th of
 the 5th month, 1802. This meeting was called
 in consequence of a part of the committee hav-
ing had a conference with a number of Indian
 chiefs in Baltimore. The chiefs were on their
 way to Washington, the seat of Government,
 and were waited on at their lodgings, the
 Fountain Inn, Light Street, by the members of
 the Indian Committee of Baltimore and Ellicott's
 Mills, to confer with them on subjects of deep im-
portance to their Red brethren, viz: the introduc-
tion into their tribes of some of the arts of civil-
ized life, and to remonstrate against the use of
 spirituous liquors. The Baltimore members pre-
sented to the General Indian Committee the
 whole account of their conference, and the
 memorial they had presented to Congress
 against the introduction of spirituous liquors
 into the Indian settlements. As the account of
 the conference was published in several of the
 newspapers, I give the following extract from one
 of them: The editors having obtained a genuine copy
 of the proceedings of the committee appointed
 by the Yearly Meeting of the respectable So-
ciety of Friends, in two conferences with the
 Indian Chiefs from the banks of the Wabash,
 Lake Erie, and Lake Michigan, being from the
 Pottowattomy, Miami, Delaware, Shawanese,
 Weas, Eel River, Piankshaw, Kickapoo
 and Kaskaskia tribes of Indians, who lately
 passed through this city on their way to the
 Federal Government, feel no small degree of
 pleasure in having it in their power to gratify
 an inquisitive public with the interesting con-
tents. Besides the members of the Society of Friends,
 many respectable persons of different religious
 persuasions were present, and the communica-
tions were taken down with accuracy by Gerard
 T. Hopkins,
 a stenographer of great ability.
 William Wells , agent for the United States
 amongst the Indians North-west of the Ohio,
 was the interpreter. He was a native of Ken-
tucky, and had been taken captive by the
 Miamis when only eight years of age,-had
 afterwards been adopted by one of the chiefs,
 and continued to reside amongst them. On this
 occasion he had attained his thirty-fifth year,
 and being possessed of good talents, not only
 spoke the language of the Tribes represented by
 the Little Turtle , the Five Medals , and other
 Indians present, but also the English language
 with fluency, and wrote well. On the first interview of the committee with
 the Chiefs, which was on the 26th of the 12th
 month, 1801, the exercises commenced by the
 following short, but expressive address from
 Elisha Tyson , in whose house the Indian Delega-
tion, the Indian Committee and their friends, were
 convened; he was not at the time a member of
 the committee, but was interested in all philan-
thropic movements. Brothers and Friends: I am desirous in the
 early part of this opportunity, that you may be
 informed, that the people called Quakers con-
sider all mankind as their brothers: that they
 believe the Great Spirit and Father of all man-
kind created all men of one blood; and that it
 is the will of Him who also created the sun,
 the moon, and the stars, and causes them to give
 us light,-the Great Spirit and common Father
 of all mankind,-that we should not do one another
 hurt, but that we should do one another all the
 good we can; and it is on this ground, and this
 principle, that we believe it right to take you by
 the hand. Then after a short time spent in silence, an-
other member of the Society of Friends, John
 M'Kim, spoke, declaring that the Quakers be-
lieved it required of them to love all men,
 without reference to location or complexion;
 that they were convinced it was not in their
 power to perform their religious duties to the
 Great Creator of all things without his assistance,
 and therefore felt it their duty, when entering
 upon such important business as that in which
 they were about to engage, to sit down in
 stillness and wait upon Him. After some-
thing more on this subject, and a reference to
 the Yearly Meetings of Philadelphia and Balti-
more, he proceeded to say that the Friends re-
membered the friendship which had subsisted
 between their Society and the Indians, from
 their first settlement in America; and recollect-
ing that the Western country was fast filling up
 with white people, and that game would ne-
cessarily become scarce, they feared the Indians
 would be brought into a state of suffering.
 That, in consequence of the long wars that had
 subsisted between them and some of the white
 people, the Friends for a long time had not had
 an opportunity of taking them by the hand.
 That so soon as an opportunity had presented,
 after a peace was effected, a concern had arisen
 in their council, and several Friends were ap-
pointed to go out into the wilderness and have a
 talk with them. He then called upon the
 Friend who sat at his right hand, Evan Thomas ,
 who had been one of the mission to the Plains
 of Sandusky, to give an account of the move-
ment in this concern. Evan Thomas then gave
 a very concise relation of the journey, and the
 conference with the Wyandot Chiefs, (which
 has been before alluded to, and of which a
 narrative was published some years since by
 Philip E. Thomas ,) and proceeded to inform the
 deputation that the Friends had received no re-
sponse to the proposals then made to the In-
dians; but a belt of wampum and a speech had
 been sent them from a council held at Detroit,
 and an invitation to attend their General Coun-
cil. After he had concluded, another member
 of the Indian Committee, George Ellicott , ad-
dressed the chiefs as follows: Brothers and Friends: We were glad when
 we heard that some of our Red brethren were
 coming to this city, and felt our minds drawn
 to take them by the hand, and have an oppor-
tunity of knowing them. As we have not been
 made acquainted with their circumstances, we
 have not been able to judge whether any thing
 we have had to propose to do for them would be
 accepted? Whether they are really under the
 necessity of applying to some other mode of
 living to obtain a livelihood, and whether game in
 their country is yet plenty? We have thought,
 brothers, that if it should not yet be the case,
 that game is scarce, at the present time, it will
 probably be the case in some future time; and,
 therefore, we have thought it would be best for
 our Red brethren to give some attention to the
 cultivation of the soil. This is one of the subjects
 which has claimed our attention; and as we feel
 in our hearts that we love the Indians and desire
 their welfare, we wish to turn their attention to the
 subject; we also believe, brothers, that we
 derive a very great advantage from reading
 books which contain instruction, we wish that
 our brethren, the Indians, should partake of the
 same means of instruction with ourselves. We
 wish you to let us know with candor, whether
 you desire these things, and if you do so, that
 we may do for you whatever may be in our
 power. After a short pause, the Little Turtle inquired
 if the Friends had any thing more to say, and
 being told that we were all willing to listen to
 him, he rose up and said: Brothers and Friends: My heart returns
 thanks to the Great Spirit above, that has put it
 in our power to speak to each other. My
 brother chiefs and myself are glad that our
 Friends and brothers, the Quakers, have such
 great compassion for their Red brethren. He
 then spoke of the belief of the Indians, in
 one Great Creator of all the men upon the
 earth, and who were made when the earth, the
 sun, moon, and stars were also made, to be useful
 to them and give them light. After referring
 to the desire of the Friends to benefit the In-
dians, and their need of that assistance, he
 added: You have been kept in the straight
 path by the Great and Good Spirit. We
 have been led astray by inferior spirits: we
 now hope that we may come upon your track,
 and follow it. He then said the long and
 destructive wars that have raged in the country
 of our Red brethren, since your fathers first
 came amongst them, have caused their numbers
 to be greatly diminished. Those that have come
 among us, have very much cheated and imposed
 upon us. They found us simple and ignorant,
 and have taken great care to keep every thing
 from us, in order to profit by our ignorance. Friends and Brothers,-We find you are now
 disposed, with open arms to receive us, and we
 hope the Great Spirit will assist you, together
 with the Great Chief of the White People, to
 whom we are about to apply for help. Brothers and Friends,- At the Treaty of
 Grenville, which is now a little past six years,
 we received some presents by the hand of the
 Great War Chief of the Americans (General
 Wayne)-said to be sent to us by our brothers
 the Quakers. After this Treaty I was invited
 by the Great War Chief of the Americans to
 visit them. It is now four years since I visit-
ed them in Philadelphia, whilst the Great Coun-
cil was held in that city. I had there an oppor-
tunity to see our brothers the Quakers, and re-
ceived from their mouths some of their talks:
 all these talks I wrapped up in my heart, and
 when I returned home to my brothers I told
 them all those good things which you had told
 us you were desirous to do for us. Brothers and Friends,-I am happy to say
 that these my Red Brothers now present with
 me are Chiefs, who in their own country are
 equally great with myself; they were rejoiced to
 hear your words delivered to them through me
 four years ago; and they are equally glad with
 myself to hear from the mouths of our brothers
 the Quakers the same good words again. If we
 understand you right, you wish to add comfort
 to our women and children by teaching us and
 them some of your ways of living. I am glad
 that the Great Spirit has put it into your hearts,
 and am sorry that your efforts have not yet been
 successful. Brothers and Friends,-I now assure you, that
 you hear the voice of the Potowatomy, Miami,
 Delaware, Shawanese, Weas, Eel River, Pianka-
shaw, Kickapoo, and Kaskaskia Tribes of Indi-
ans, and if you wish to do any thing for any of
 these nations we will at all times be ready to
 render any assistance in our power. The Little Turtle then again alluded to the plea-
sure they had received from the words of the
Friends of Philadelphia, and were equally pleased
 to hear the same good words from the Friends of
 of Baltimore. He then mentioned that the Friends
 of Philadelphia had given them some tools, among
 which were two ploughs.* * Alluded to in the letter of Thomas Wistar . I used them,
 and did all I could to keep them from wearing
 out; I was pleased with them; they now need
 repair; we have nobody among us that can mend
 them, and they are now useless to me. He
 then referred to a visit they had made to Phila-
delphia five days since, and the talks they had had
 together with the Quakers there, had concluded
 by inviting the Friends of Baltimore to meet the
 Indian tribes at their next Great Council, held
 annually at Fort Wayne, at the time the Indians
 receive their annuities from the United States;
 and requested that any information intended for
 them should be conveyed to them through their
 interpreter, William Wells , Indian agent at Fort
 Wayne. After taking his seat, this chief appeared to
 have reflected that he had not answered fully
 the questions proposed to them, and rising again,
 said: Brothers and Friends: It is the real wish
 of your brothers, the Indians, to engage in the
 cultivation of our lands, and although the game
 is not yet so scarce but that we can get enough
 to eat, we know it is becoming scarce, and that
 we must begin to take hold of such tools as we
 see are in the hands of the white people. After-
wards he alluded in forcible language to the con-
fidence which the Red men had in the Friends,
 and that they knew they desired no compensa-
tion for their services to them, and added, Bro-
thers, we are a jealously disposed people-almost
every white man that comes among us endeavors
 to cheat us; this has occasioned jealousy among
 us. But your talks, brothers, are different, and
 we believe you. The Five Medals then made a speech, in
 which he reiterated much that the Little Turtle 
 had spoken, and continued: Friends and Broth-
ers, the talks that you have now delivered to
 us shall be carefully collected, wrapped up and
 put in our hearts,-we will not forget them.
 On our return home, we will have them com-
municated from the head to the mouth of
 the Wabash,-from this to the Mississippi, and
 up that river until it strikes the lakes, thence
 round by Michillimackanack until they come
 back again to the same place. What we say to
 you does not come from one, but from many,
 and what you have now said to us, you speak it to
 but a few, but it shall be communicated to many. Brothers and Friends, I observed to our
 friends, the Quakers of Philadelphia, five days
 ago, what I say now to you, that we wish our
 brothers, the Quakers, to render us those services
 they have proposed. We promise that nothing
 shall be wanting on our part to give aid to so
 desirable a thing in our country. Our situation
 at present will not admit of carrying such a
 plan so fully into execution as we could desire,
 but I hope you may not be prevented from ma-
king trial. If we had such tools as you make
 use of, and which add so much to your comfort-
 for we have been lost in wonder at what we have
 seen among you,-if we had these instruments,
 we should, I hope, be willing to use them. From the great things, and astonishing
 wonders, which we have seen among you, and
 finding they all come out of the earth, it makes
 me anxious to try if I cannot get some for my-
self. He then expressed his regret that the move-
ments of the Friends towards the Indians had
 not met with the success which they deserved, allu-
ding to their having received no satisfactory re-
ply from the Wyandots and Delawares, and
 concluded with observing, There is a great
 deal, brothers, in having a good interpreter, and
 beginning at the right end of the business.
 [The Indian Committee who had had the inter-
view with Tarhie, (the Crane,) and a few of his
 chiefs at Sandusky, were under the impression
 that their speech to the Indians was not clearly
 translated, of which a hint had been given, and
 hence the remarks of the Five Medals .] Here the interview with the Indians closed. After reflecting on the subject of their con-
ference with the Indian Chiefs, the members of
 the Indian Committee regretted that they had
 not made use of that opportunity to express
 their opinion on the subject of the use of spirit-
uous liquors. Another meeting of the Com-
mittee and their friends was accordingly called,
 and the chiefs were invited to attend. They met
 again at the dwelling of Elisha Tyson . After a
 brief representation of the reason for another
 interview given by a friend, Evan Thomas ad-
dressed the chiefs in a forcible communication,
 which was full of feeling; after assuring them
 that the love he felt for the Indians, and his
 interest in their welfare, had taken away all
 fear of giving them offence, he proceeded to ac-
knowledge what he had witnessed in his visit to
 the Wyandot Nation, and his belief that the too
 frequent use of spirituous liquors was more in
 the way of their improvement than anything
 else, and appealed to them thus: Are you of
the same mind with us who are your friends, and
 have your good at heart; that it would be right
 for us to take the subject into our serious con-
sideration, to endeavor to discover whether
 there may not be some steps taken that would
 put a check upon this pernicious thing? After calling upon the chiefs to express them-
selves freely in regard to the concern, the
Little Turtle inquired if any of his broth-
ers, the Quakers, had any further communica-
tion to make, and being desired to proceed, rose
 up and said: Brothers and Friends, I am
 happy to find it has pleased the Great Spirit,
 that we should again meet in the same house in
 which we held our council yesterday. I am
 happy to find that it is the will of the Great
 and Good Spirit that we should discover that
 there was something omitted yesterday, that
 was highly necessary for your red brethren. Friends and brothers, I am glad to find that
 it has pleased the Great Spirit to put a wish in
 your hearts on the subject you have mentioned;
 a subject of the greatest importance to us.
 What you have said relative to our being one
 flesh and blood is true. Your brothers, the In-
dians, believe that it is in this light the Great
 Spirit considers all mankind. He afterwards
 remarked, that the Indians had long been aware
 of the great evils which had raged in their
 country, but could obtain no redness; that since
 the introduction of spirituous liquors among
 them, their numbers were greatly diminished,
 and taking advantage of the request which had
 been made, that they should express themselves
 freely, added: I will now take the liberty to
 mention, that most of the evils existing among
 the Red people, have been caught from the white
 people; not only that liquor which destroys us
 daily, but many diseases that our forefathers were
 ignorant of, before they saw you. Brothers and Friends:-I am glad you have
 seen this business as we do, and rejoice to find
 that you agree in opinion with us, and express
 an anxiety to be, if possible, of service to us,
 to remove this great evil out of our country; an
 evil that has had so much ruin in it,-that has
 destroyed so many of our lives, that it causes our
 young men to say, We had better be at war
 with the white people. This liquor that they
 introduce into our country, is more to be feared
 than the gun or the tomahawk; there are more
 of us dead since the treaty of Grenville, than
 we lost by the years of war before, and it is all
 owing to the introduction of this liquor among
 us. This subject, brothers, composes a part of
 what we intend to make known to the Great
 Council of our White brethren. On our arrival
 there, we shall endeavor to explain to our Great
 Father, the President, a great many evils that
 have arisen in our country, from the introduc-
tion of this liquor by the white traders. Brothers and Friends: In addition to what
 I have observed of this great evil in the
 country of your red brethren, I will say further,
 that it has made us poor. It is this liquor that
 causes our young men to go without clothes, and
 our women and children to go without anything
 to eat, and sorry I am to mention now to you,
 brothers, the evil is increasing every day, as the
 white settlers come nearer to us, and bring those
 kettles they boil that stuff in they call whiskey,
 of which our young men are so extremely fond.
 Brothers, when our young men have been out
 hunting, and are returning home loaded with
 skins and furs, on their way, if it happened that
 they come along where some of this whiskey is
 deposited, the White man who sells it, tells them
 to take a little drink; some of them will say
 no, I do not want it; they go on until they
 come to another house, where they find more of
 the same kind of drink; it is there again offered,
 they refuse, and again the third time; but
 finally the fourth or fifth time, one accepts of it
 and takes a drink, and getting one, he wants
 another, and then a third, and fourth, till his
 senses have left him. After this, reason comes
 back to him; when he gets up and finds where
 he is, and asks for his peltry, the answer is, you
 have drunk them. Where is my gun? It is
 gone. Where is my blanket? It is gone.
 Where is my shirt? You have sold it for
 whiskey! Now, brothers, figure to yourselves
 what a condition this man must be in;
 he has a family at home, a wife and children,
 who stand in need of the profits of his hunting,
 what must their wants be, when he himself is
 also without a shirt. After expressing his
 hope that the Great Spirit would aid the
 Friends in their efforts to assist the Indians, and
 that they would use any influence they possessed
 with the great council of the United States on
 their behalf, and again alluding to the baneful
 effects of spirituous liquors, and the bad advice
 of wicked men who wished to keep them in ig-
norance, he finished by declaring that he desired
 all that he had said should be made public,
 provided the Friends had no objection thereto. The Five Medals then rose and said:-My
 Brothers and Friends: I have nothing to say on
 the subject we have now been talking over. My
 friend, the Little Turtle , has given you a full
 answer to those things you have mentioned to
 us; we are but one people, and have but one
 voice. We hope, brothers, that your friendship
 and ours may never be broken. Evan Thomas , then adressed them again as
 follows.-Friends and Brothers: What you
 have communicated at this time, has been
 clearly understood, and we are glad to find we
 see things in the same light that you see them.
 The several matters you have mentioned, and
 the difficulties you have stated, claim our sym-
pathy and solid consideration, and we shall, I
 trust, take the subject up, and if way should
 open for us to move forward, in aiding you in
 your application to the General Government, we
 shall be willing, either on this occasion, or any
 other, to render you any service in our power.
 The conference then broke up, and the Indian
 Committee prepared and forwarded to the Con-
gress of the United States, the following me-
morial. To the Congress of the United States: The memorial of the Committee appointed
 for Indian affairs by the Yearly Meeting of
 Friends held in Baltimore, respectfully repre-
sents: That a concern to introduce amongst some
 of the Indian tribes north-west of the river Ohio,
 the most simple and useful arts of civil life,
 being several years since laid before our Yearly
 Meeting, a Committee was appointed by that
 body, to visit them, to examine their situation,
 and endeavor to ascertain in what manner so
 desirable a purpose could be effected. A part
 of that Committee, after having obtained the
 approbation of the President of the United
 States, proceeded to perform the service assigned
 them, and the result of their enquiries and ob-
servations, as reported to the Yearly Meeting,
 was, that the quantity of spirituous liquors with
 which the Indians are supplied, by traders, and
 frontier settlers, must counteract the effect of
 every measure, however wise and salutary,
 which can be devised to improve their situa-
tion. The truth of this assertion is abundantly
 confirmed by a speech made before us, by a
Miami chief, the Little Turtle , (of which we
 herewith transmit a copy for your consideration.)
 and we also acknowledge our belief, that the
 evil is of such magnitude, that unless it can be
 altogether removed or greatly restrained, no
 national hope of success in the proposed under-
taking can be entertained. We are therefore
 induced to solicit the attention of the National
 Legislature to this interesting and important
 subject; a subject which we consider involves,
 not only their future welfare, but even their very
 existence as a people. Signed on behalf of the Committee, by Evan Thomas, John M'Kim, Elias Ellicott, Joel Wright, John Brown, George Ellicott, David Brown. Baltimore, 1st month, 1802. These Friends soon after repaired to the seat
 of government, presented their memorial to
 Congress, and were gratified by the passage of
 the law, which they so much desired. Whilst
 in Washington they waited on the Secretary of
 War. The law passed by Congress, authorized
 the President of the United States to take
 such measures from time to time, as to him may
 seem expedient, to prevent or restrain the vend-
ing or distributing of spirituous liquors, among
 all or any of the Indian tribes. On the subject of civilization the law states
 that in order to promote civilization amongst
 the friendly Indian tribes, and to secure the con-
tinuance of their friendship, it shall be lawful
 for the President of the United States to cause
 them to be furnished with useful domestic ani-
mals, and implements of husbandry, and with
 goods or money as he shall judge proper, and to
 appoint such persons from time to time, as tem-
porary agents to reside amongst the Indians, as
 he shall think fit; provided that the whole
 amount of such presents and allowance to such
 agents shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars
 per annum. The Committee reported their progress to a
 general meeting of the Committee on Indian
 concerns, which was held in Baltimore, 13th of
 10th month, 1802,* *During the session of Baltimore Yearly Meeting.
 The general meeting of the Indian Committee, of
 Baltimore Yearly Meeting, in consequence of the re-
mote residence of some of the members, met once a
 year. and informed them of the
 conferences which had been held with the Indian
 chiefs; the chiefs of those nations whom Balti-
more Yearly Meeting had it in contemplation to
 visit. Their report presented the speeches of
 the chiefs, the memorial of the Committee to
 Congress, a copy of the law passed by Congress,
 and an account of their interview with the Sec-
retary of War, with the information received
 from him. The War department at this period
 of the government of the United States had the
 care of Indian affairs, and the Secretary informed
 the Friends that, agreeably to the request of the
 Indians, the government had established a tra-
ding house at Fort Wayne, that they were in
 want of several persons of our Society; black-
smiths, carpenters, and superintendents, men
 that could make and mend ploughs, looms, farm-
ing utensils, &c., and wished to employ such
 as were of exemplary conduct, and concerned for
 the promotion of the work in prospect; to such
 the United States offered a liberal compensa-
tion. At the next meeting which was held in Bal-
timore the 7th of 2d month, 1803, the Commit-
tee on Indian Concerns agreed to make the
 following application to the Meeting for Suffer-
ings of Baltimore Yearly Meeting: We of the Committee on Indian affairs ap-
pointed by Baltimore Yearly Meeting, impressed
 with an idea of the importance of our appoint-
ment, and with a full persuasion, that the situa-
tion of our business requires speedy attention,
 as the obstructions that have heretofore prevented
 Friends from moving forward, in extending to
 the Western Indians the benefits some years
 ago contemplated by the Yearly Meeting, are
 now removed, and considering the distant situa-
tion of many of our members from each other,
 and the difficulty and even impracticability of ob-
taining a general meeting; we have been in-
duced to believe it right to submit the subject
 to the consideration of the Meeting for Sufferings
 for their cordial sympathy and advice, and if
 they may believe it right, for their co-opera-
tion also. Signed by Evan Thomas, Moses Dillon, John M'Kim, Jonathan Wright, David Brown, George Ellicott, Elias Ellicott, Joel Wright. The Meeting for Sufferings entered cordially
 into sympathy with the members of the Indian
 Committee in their benevolent enterprise, and
 they were encouraged to appoint a Committee to
 procure agricultural, and other useful implements,
 and have them conveyed in seasonable time to
 Fort Wayne. The Committee on Indian concerns met again
 in Baltimore the 10th of 10th month, 1803, and
 drew up a report for Baltimore Yearly Meeting;
 in which they related that in consequence of
 information received from the Western Indians,
 and the prohibition by the President of the
 United States of the sale of spirituous liquors
 amongst them, the Committee had been im-
pressed with the belief that the time for an
 earnest commencement of the benevolent inten-
tions of the Yearly Meeting had arrived; they
 had accordingly purchased for the use of those
 Indians agricultural implements of various
 kinds which were sent in packages to Pittsburg,
 from whence they were to be immediately con-
veyed to Fort Wayne, and delivered as a present
 from the Society of Friends of Baltimore Yearly
 Meeting, to the Little Turtle , and other chiefs;
 to be disposed of by them, to such of their peo-
ple as they knew were desirous of using them.
 They also reported that they had had some cor-
respondence with William Wells , the Indian
 agent at Fort Wayne, but had not yet heard of
 the arrival of the agricultural implements at
 their destination. William Wells had replied
 to their enquiries on behalf of the Indians, and in-
formed them as his opinion, that the suppres-
sion of liquors in that country is the best thing
 that has ever been done for the Indians, by the
 United States; that within a year, not one In-
dian had been killed; whilst there had never
 been a year before since the treaty of Gren-
ville in which there were less than ten
 killed, and some years as many as thirty. The report was signed on behalf of the Com-
mittee, by Evan Thomas , Joel Wright , and
 James Mendenhall . To this report a postscript was added, that in
 consequence of the decrease of some of the first
 members of the Indian Committee (their names,
 however, not given,) and a distant situation and
 other causes preventing the attendance of many,
 it was believed a benefit might arise from the
 discontinuance of the present Committee, and the
 appointment of another. Their report was read, and their request for a
 new Committee considered at Baltimore Yearly
 Meeting, held by adjournments from the 10th
 day of 10th month, to the 14th of the same in-
clusive, 1803; and at the next meeting of the
 members of the Committee, on the 14th of 10th
 month, 1803, a minute of the Yearly Meeting
 informed them of the appointment of the follow-
ing Friends to constitute a Committee on Indian
 Affairs; they were desired by the minute of
 their appointment, to pay such attention to the
 interesting concern as they may be enabled to
 render, to wit: Evan Thomas, Isaac Tyson, Joel Wright, Israel Wilson, Elisha Tyson, Henry Mills, Edward Stabler, Jonas Cattell, George Ellicott, David Greave, Jonathan Wright, Elias Ellicott, Gerard T. Hopkins, Jonathan Ellicott, John Ellicott, Benjamin Ellicott, Asa Moore, Philip E. Thomas, Caleb Bently, Thomas Moore, William Kirk, Samuel Snowden, Wm. Stabler. of Sandy Spring. Immediately after their organization Philip E.
 Thomas was appointed Secretary, and Elias Elli-
cott Treasurer of the Indian Committee. Philip
 E. Thomas continued to perform the duties of
 Secretary to the Committee, with untiring zeal
 and ability, from the date of his appointment to
 the time of his decrease, which took place the 1st
 day of 9th month, 1861, Elias Ellicott had
 been Treasurer of the Indian Committee from
 the period of its origin in the year 1795. After
 this reappointment he continued faithfully to
 perform the trust confided to him, until his de-
cease in 10th month, 1827. At the next meeting of the Committee on In-
dian affairs, held the 6th of 2d month, 1804, a
 letter was received from the Little Turtle , and
 the Five Medals , Miami, and Wyandot chiefs,
 which resulted in the appointment of a delega-
tion to visit them, of whom Gerard T. Hopkins 
 and George Ellicott alone performed the ser-
vice. The Friends who accomplished this journey
 together have now for many years been num-
bered with the dead. George Ellicott departed
 this life the 9th of 4th month, 1832, aged 72
 years, and Gerard T. Hopkins died nearly two
 years afterwards on the 27th of 3d month, 1834,
 in the 66th year of his age. Philip Dennis , who accompanied them to
 Fort Wayne with the intention of instructing
 the Indians in agriculture, faithfully performed
 the duty, so far as he alone was concerned. The
 Little Turtle had in one of his interviews with
 the Friends told them our young men are not
 so much disposed to be industrious as we could
 desire. Philip Dennis found this represen-
tation of them fully verified in his experience.
 After he had, with some assistance from the In-
dians, enclosed his plantation with a rude fence,
 only one, or at the most two of the red men
 evinced any disposition to labor. They would
 take a seat either on the fence, or in the trees,
 near the premises, and watch him with apparent
 interest in his daily engagement of ploughing
 and hoeing, but without offering to lend a help-
ing hand. He found the land very fertile, and
 raised a large crop of corn and other products,
 which, after gathering into a storehouse he built
 for the purpose in the autumn, he left in charge
 of some of the neighboring chiefs for a winter
 supply for the necessitous members of the tribes
 for whom he had labored, and returned to his
 home at Ellicott's Mills. Philip Dennis lived some years afterwards,
 a respectable member of the Society of Friends,
 and died on his farm in Montgomery County,
 Maryland. The promise made at the commencement of
 the foregoing brief history of the Indian Com-
mittee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting, from its
 appointment in 1795 to 1804, has thus been
 performed, and the limits I had prescribed for
 this Appendix have been already exceeded; but
 the very interesting character of the concern in-
duces me (before producing a copy of the Trea-
ty of Grenville, which from its influence on the
 condition of the Indian Tribes ought to be pre-
sented to the reader) to add the following ac-
count. From the last meeting of the committee, as
 above related, in 1804, to the commencement of
 the war with Great Britain, the affairs of the
 Indians continued to increase in importance, and
 their friends were frequently flattered with the
 hope of a successful and permanent settlement of
 the Tribes, to whom the United States under
 certain conditions had guaranteed their lands, in
 the neighborhood of the Lakes. Philanthropists,
 not only in our country, but, also, of the
 more enlightened European nations, continued
 to accord to the efforts of the Friends of this
 country the meed of their approbation, and from
 members of the Society of Friends in Great
 Britain, the Indian Committees of Phila-
delphia and Baltimore recieved donations of
 money, paid to them in two instalments of several
 thousand dollars each, to be applied to the im-
provement of the condition of the Indians, which
 greatly increased their opportunities of useful-
ness; to these donations was afterwards added
 a bequest from a friend of Ireland, of much less
 amount, it is true, but, nevertheless, a valuable
 contribution to the cause of humanity. Portions of these different sums of money were
 faithfully applied, with those collected from
 their own members, in giving encouragement
 to the civilization of the Indians; in the pro-
motion of a good system of agriculture; in sup-
porting schools; in building small mills for
 grinding Indian corn, and in endeavoring to
 discountenance the hard servitude of their
 women. On the establishment of the Yearly Meeting
 of Ohio, in 1813, which had originally formed
 a part of that of Baltimore, the Indian Com-
mittee of Baltimore Yearly Meeting faithfully
 divided the money remaining on hand, with the
 Indian Committee of Ohio Yearly Meeting, to
 be applied in accordance with the instructions
 received for its expenditure; but the unsettle-
ment produced in the neighborhood of the Cana-
dian frontier, by the war with the British na-
tion, produced its effect on the friendly tribes,
 and, after much consultation among themselves,
 and repeated visits of Chiefs to Washington,
 they concluded to cede all the lands to which
 they had any title, in Ohio, to the United States,
 and remove further west. This was in 1817.* * Emma Willard's American Republic.
 The Indians were at their option to remain on
 the ceded lands, subject to the laws of the State
 or country. Recollections of the Little Turtle and other
 Indians. The Little Turtle , with several other Chiefs,
 spent two days at Ellicott's Mills, during Christ-
mas week of 1807, attended by Wm. Wells , the
 United States Agent for Fort Wayne, as inter-
preter. They had been to Washington on busi-
ness, had had an interview with the Indian Com-
mittee in Baltimore, and were returning home
 through the State of Maryland. George Ellicott called to see them soon after
 their arrival, and gave them an invitation to
 dine the next day, at his house, which was not
 far distant from the hotel where they lodged.
 The delegation was composed of the following
 persons:-The Little Turtle and Rusheville ,
 Chiefs of the Miami nation; the Beaver and
 Crow of the Delawares; two Shawanese Chiefs,
 and Marpau and the Raven , Chiefs of the
 Potowatomies; of the two last named each was
 accompanied by his wife. All accepted the in-
invitation but Marpau , who positively declined
 both for himself and his wife. He was of a very
 warlike disposition, and the brother of Tecumseh ,
 and the Prophet , who, in 1811, openly revolted
 from their allegiance to the United States, and
 were the cause of much bloodshed on the Cana-
dian frontier. Already the spirit of disaffection
 had taken hold of his mind; he refused to wear
 any article of clothing manufactured by the
 white people, and was by no means reserved in
 his expressions of hatred toward the whole race,
 who, he maintained, had violently wrested from
 them all their most valuable possessions. Nor
 did he hesitate to express his determination,
 with aid of his two powerful brothers, to regain
 all the lands which had originally belonged to
 them, after putting to death all those who now
 occupied them. In order to give him favorable impressions of
 the power of the Federal government, and re-
lieve his mind of the idea of taking up arms
 against it, the other members of the delega-
tion, all friendly Indians except himself and
 the Raven , had persuaded him to make the
 journey, hoping he would discover, as he passed
 along, so many evidences of the strength of the
 people he professed to despise, as to be induced
 to prefer peace to war, on any terms. No favor-
able change, however, had been the result. He
 had refused every civility tendered him while in
Washington, remaining shut up with his wife,
 in his apartments, while all the rest of his com-
panions partook of every enjoyment offered them.
 He had refused to meet the Indian Committee
 in Baltimore, (but was afterwards induced to do
 so,) and remained in the same mood on his arri-
val at Ellicott's Mills; and although George
 Ellicott assured him he could promise him a
 welcome and kind treatment at his house, he
 still declined. The Little Turtle endeavored to
 change his purpose; rallied him on his obsti-
nacy, ill-humor and laziness, and told him he
 was too large a man to give so poor a display of
 Indian politeness, and that he would return to
 his home in the same state of ignorance in which
 he had left it; but all to no purpose. He bore
 the raillery with apparent good humor, but re-
mained unmoved. Marpau was of very large
 stature, and in the prime of manly vigor. His
 dress was entirely made up of the skins of wild
 animals, which had been killed by his own
 hands. Having heard so much of the Little Turtle ,
 I determined to be present when he and the
 other Chiefs were introduced at the house, where
 they were to be entertained as guests. He was
 the first to enter the parlor, and bowed grace-
fully as he was introduced to the family, and
 made a short address, in which he acknowledged
 the pleasure it afforded him thus to meet the
 wife and children of a friend to whom he felt
 obliged, and of whom he entertained the highest
 opinion. The interpreter then introduced the rest of
 the party, who shook hands, and took their seats.
 Afterwards a pleasant conversation took place
 between the Miami Chiefs, the Interpreter, and
 some of the residents of the village, in which
 the Indians drew a comparison between savage
 and civilized life, and in favor of civilization.
 The Little Turtle was anxious to have a flour
 mill erected in his town, and appeared earnestly
 desirous of promoting the improvement of his
 people. The Shawanese, the Raven and his
 wife, and the Beaver and Crow listened in
 silence. The dress and mantle of the Raven bore a
 close resemblance to those worn by Marpau ,
 and were of similar material. He was esteemed
 the greatest hunter of the Potowatomies, and
 occasionally visited the Rocky Mountains in
 pursuit of game, and on his last excursion to
 that distant range, had killed a grizzly bear of
 immense weight and size, whose skin, dressed
 with the claws and teeth attached, he wore on
 this occasion, thrown over his shoulders. His
 face was painted; the cheeks and forehead
 black, and across one of his cheeks was a heavy
 dash of vermillion, which looked like a deep and
 gaping flesh wound. His hair, which was thick
 and coarse, was cut about six inches long in
 front, and hung about his face, but was its full
 length behind, and tied in several places with
 bands of buckskin, and powdered with red paint;
 and he wore on the top of his head, a small
 coronet of eagle's feathers, Attached to an
 embroidered belt hung his tobacco pouch, made
 of the entire skin of a beaver, and by its side
 his tomahawk and scalping knife. With his large and muscular proportions, ac-
companied by the disfigurements of the paint,
 he was only saved from the appearance of a bar-
barous and unrelenting savage, by a countenance
 expressive of the utmost good humor. The wife of the Raven was a young and hand-
some woman, of a modest and downcast expres-
sion. She did not seem to entertain the preju-
dices against civilized manufactures, which ex-
isted in her husband's mind, and wore a blue
 cloth habit, though made in Indian style; a hat,
 covered with braided ribbon, feathers of different
 sorts, and tinsel ornaments. Her moccasins were
 beautifully embroidered with moose hair, inter-
spersed with plaited rows of porcupine's quills;
 her necklace was made of several rows of beads
 of many colors, and her ear ornaments, which
 were drooping, and hung nearly down to her
 shoulders, were also of beads; and she wore,
 wrapped around her person, a fine Makinaw
 blanket. The Little Turtle and Rusheville , the Beaver 
 and Crow , and the two Shawanese, were dressed
 in a costume usually worn by our own citizens
 of the time: coats of blue cloth, gilt buttons,
 pantaloons of the same color, and buff waistcoats;
 but they all wore leggings, moccasins, and large
 gold rings in their ears. The Little Turtle ex-
ceeded all his brother Chiefs in dignity of ap-
pearance-a dignity which resulted from the
 character of his mind. He was of medium
 stature, with a complexion of the palest copper
 shade, and did not wear paint. His hair was
 a full suit, and without any admixture of grey,
 although from what he said of his age, at Fort
 Wayne, in 1804, being then fifty-three, he must
 at this time have been fifty-seven years old.
 His dress was completed by a long, red, military
 sash around the waist, and his hat (a chapeau
 bras) was ornamented by a red feather. Imme-
diately on entering the house, he took off his
 hat, and carried it under his arm during the
 rest of the visit. His appearance and manners,
 which were graceful and agreeable, in an un-
common degree, were admired by all who made
 his acquaintance. When seated at table they seemed to enjoy the
 repast which was set before them. A large
 dish of hominy- a national dish with the In-
dians- had with a variety of other dishes been
 served up, especially in reference to their tastes,
 and was acceptable to them. The Raven ,
 on taking his seat, immediately pointed it out to
 his wife, who sat at his side, and spoke for the
 first time since his entrance, to request to be
 helped bountifully to the hominy, having seen
 nothing he liked so well since he had left the woods. The visit ended very agreeably; the deputa-
tion shook hands with the Friends who had en-
tertained them, and returned to their hotel.
 They found Marpau and his wife quietly seated
 by the fireside, but soon understood they had
 just returned from a walk, having passed the
 day on the hills, and in the fields on the banks
 of the Patapsco. We were told that they spent a part of the
 day seated upon the rocks, contemplating the
 scenery before them; they were afterwards at-
tracted to a point where hickory nuts and per-
simmons were abundant, and the Chief was seen
 climbing the trees, and gathering the persim-
mons and nuts, and throwing them down to his
 wife, who seemed fond of them. Thus, they had
 passed the day, and looked refreshed thereby. Both Marpau and the Raven , whilst on their
 journey, were careful to present themselves, on
 all occasions, where there was a chance of their
 being seen, painted and adorned in their most
 approved style. Thus, while in Washington
 and Baltimore, although in comparative retire-
ment, as he did not go out, Marpau was said to
 spend two or three hours daily, in the duties of
 the toilet, painting his face, dressing his hair,
 and arranging his appearance, by a small mirror,
 held up before him by his wife, who stood near him
 for the purpose, pronouncing occasionally on the
 effect produced, and giving instructions. Similar
 attentions were conferred by the wife of the
 Raven on her husband, but as he was of lower
 rank, and rather older than Marpau , his toilet
 was less elaborate, and occupied less time. The next day after this ramble, the Potawo- 
tamies all went together to visit the places where
 Marpau and his wife had walked the day before.
 The other Indians, with the interpreter, examined
 all the objects of interest in the neighborhood.
 They had begun to be aware of the importance
 of mechanical operations, and spoke with as
 much approbation as an Indian ever speaks of
 things which he admires, of the ingenuity ex-
hibited in the flour and paper mills. The next
 day all the deputation left for their homes in the
 west. About a week subsequent to their departure,
 a member of the Indian Committee on passing
 by the hotel at Ellicott's Mills, saw the western
 public stage arrive with a party of Indians and
 their interpreter, and was much surprised to find
 among them the Delaware Chief, the Beaver .
 The Beaver , according to the statement of the,
 interpreter, had left his party at Cumberland,
 and had joined the present deputation in order
 to present the grievances of his nation to the atten-
tion of the President of the United States. For
 several years their annuities, both as regarding
 goods and money, had been badly paid, and during
 his recent visit to Washington, William Wells 
 had uniformly objected to allude to the subject,
 under various pretexts. The Beaver thought
 there was something wrong somewhere, and was
 determined to seek redness. The interpreter
 asked advice of the Friend who met him at the
 hotel, and was encouraged to make a faithful
 statement of wrongs done to the Delaware 
 tribe. An investigation was made in Washing-
ton by the President's orders. William Wells was found to be a defaulter
 to a large amount, and was discharged from the
 agency at Fort Wayne; he shortly after went to
 live in Canada, and in 1811, joined the party of
Tecumseh and the Prophet , in their warfare
 against the United States, very contrary to the
 desires of the Little Turtle , who with his allies
 had remained deaf to all the arguments of Te-
 cumseh, loyal to the government of the United
 States, and faithful in his friendship to his
 friends the Quakers. William Wells after a short residence in
 Canada, was taken prisoner by the Indians whom
 he had defrauded in his agency, and was put to
 death with great barbarity. The Little Turtle 
 had died a short time before, of an attack of the
 gout in the chest. The following matters of interest in the his-
tory of the Indians, together with the copy of
 the Treaty of Greeneville, has been kindly fur-
nished from the records of Washington, by a
 gentleman of that city. The treaty of Grenville* *The treaty purports to have been made at
 Greeneville, but the place is frequently, perhaps
 most generally, written Grenville. was concluded on
 the 3d day of August, 1795, at the Head Quar-
ters of General Anthony Wayne , commanding
 the army of the United States, northwest of the
Ohio, between that officer, acting as Commission-
er for the United States, and the Sachems, Chiefs
 and warriors of twelve tribes of Indians. The
 treaty was mainly the result of a victory ob-
tained by General Wayne over the Indians in a
 battle fought the previous year, near the Mau-
mee* * At the time of the treaty called the Miami of the
 Lake. river, and terminated the hostilities which
 for nearly twenty years had been carried on be-
tween the Indians, northwest of the Ohio, and
 the white settlers in Kentucky and western Vir-
ginia. Sundry abortive efforts had been made
 by the government to procure peace. Partial
 treaties were entered into, which had no
 effect in restraining the great body of the tribes,
 and several military expeditions, which had been
 sent into their country to subdue them, met with
 disasters, and by their failure only strengthened
 the Indians. In April, 1793, three Commission-
ers, with ample powers, were sent to negotiate a
 treaty, and were intrusted to offer much better
 terms than were afterwards granted the Indians
 by the treaty of Greeneville. In the instructions
 given them it was stated, that the Society of
 Friends had, with the approbation of the President
 of the United States, decided to send some of
 their respectable members in order to contribute
 their influence to induce the hostile Indians to
 a peace, but I do not find from the Journal of
 the Commissioners that any Friends attended. The negotiation failed. The Indians insisted
 upon the removal of the white settlements and
 Forts from the country northwest of the Ohio,
 which the Commissioners refused to accede to,
 maintaining the claims of the United States to
 certain portions of the country under treaties
 from other tribes who were believed competent
 to make title to it. By the treaty of Greeneville the Indians ce-
ded to the United States a tract of country com-
prising about twenty five thousand square miles,
 or sixteen million acres, some of which however
 was included in previous grants from other tribes.
 They also ceded sixteen smaller tracts as sites
 for Forts, trading stations, &c. They received
 in consideration of the cession, twenty thousand
 dollars in goods, and permanent annuities amount-
ing to eleven thousand dollars; $9,500 in goods
 delivered, the cost of delivery and distribution
 being $1,500. The annuities, at 5 percent re-
presents a capital of $220,000; thus the entire
 payment would be $240,000 for 16,000,000
 acres of land, or one cent and a half per acre. The annuities of several of the tribes com-
menced at once, and are still paid regularly
 under the treaty of Greeneville, and they re-
ceive additional annuities under other treaties.
 Indeed all the tribes who were parties to the
 treaty of Greeneville, received regular annuities
 from the Government, but I have not been able
 to trace in them the specific amounts granted by
 that treaty. Mem. of the terms of the Treaty. PREAMBLE: that the treaty if to end a de-
structive war, settle all controversies, and restore
 harmony, &c. ART. 1. Peace re-established. ART. 2. Prisoners on both sides to be re-
stored. ART. 3. Indians cede all lands east of a line
 running from the mouth of the Cuyahoga, irreg-
ularlym to the Ohio opposite to the mouth of
 the Kentucky river. And cede 16 specified
 tracts. And free passage to the whites through
 certain routes through their country. ART. 4. The U.S relinquish all land west of
 the boundary, except 150,000 acres granted Gene-
ral Clarke; the post of Vincennes; the French
 settlement on the Illinois, &c.; and Fort Massoe,
 and give $20,000 in goods and annuities, amount-
ing to $9,500. ART. 5. Indians to be protected in the occupa-
tion of their lands as reserved to them; but to
 sell only to the U. States. ART. 6. Indians may expel settlers from their
 lands. ART. 7. Indians may hunt on lands ceded to
 the U.S., [until settled.] ART. 8. Trade to be conducted by licensed
 traders. ART. 9. Neither party to retaliate injuries,
 but offenders to be punished by their own gov-
ernment, and Indians are to give notice of hos-
tile designs. ART. 10; All other treaties within the
 of this treaty cancelled. The following tribes were parties to the treaty
 of Greeneville; the figures prefixed to the name
 of each tribe shows the number of chiefs repre-
senting it, and proves that at the date of the
 treaty, the Indians were a numerous people, viz: 10 Wyandots, 17 Delawares, 9 Shawanese, 7 Ottawas, 11 Chippewas, 24 Potowatamies, 5 Miamis, 3 Eel-river, 3 Weas, 3 Kickapoos, 3 Piankashaws, 3 Kaskaskias. For the United States, Anthony Wayne was
 sole Commissioner. The witnesses were: H. DeButts , Aid and Sec'y to Gen. Wayne ; W. H. Harrison , afterwards President of the
 U.S., Aid to Gen. Wayne ; J. Lewis , Aid to Gen. Wayne ; James O'Hara , Quarter Master General; John Mills , Major, &c.; Caleb Soran , P. M. G. U. S.; George Demeter , Lieutenant, &c.; Vigo , [an old French settler- a very remark-
able man]; P. La Fontaine , Ant. Lasselle , Jno. Beaubien , David Jones , C. U. S. A.; Lewis Beaufait , R. Lachambor , James Pepen , Baties Contien , P. Navarre ; Wm. Wells , Sonora, Interpreter ; Jacques Lasselle , do.; M. Morins , do.; Bt. Sansfrainte , do.; Christopher Miller , do.; Robert Wilson , do., Abraham Williams , do.; Isaac Zane , do. 